"Why whenever they make a covenant with God that they will believe in the Prophet s when he appears or that they will not give assistance to the idolaters against the Prophet s does a party of them reject it? cast it away repudiating it this is the response to the clause beginning with kullamā the interrogative of rebuke. Nay bal indicates a transition but most of them are disbelievers."
"O you who believe do not say to the Prophet s ‘Observe us’ rā‘inā is an imperative form from murā‘āt which they used to say to him and this was a derogatory term in Hebrew derived from the noun al-ru‘ūna ‘thoughtlessness’. They found this very amusing and used to address the Prophet s in this way and so the believers were forbidden to use it; but say instead ‘Regard us’ that is look at us and give ear to what you are commanded and be prepared to accept it; and for disbelievers awaits a painful chastisement that is the Fire."
"Those disbelievers of the People of the Scripture and the idolaters from among the Arabs al-mushrikīna ‘idolaters’ is a supplement to ahl al-kitābi ‘People of the Scripture’ and the min ‘of’ is explicative do not wish that any good any Inspiration should be revealed to you from your Lord out of envy of you but God singles out for His mercy for the office of His Prophet whom He will; God is of bounty abounding."
"When the disbelievers began to deride the matter of abrogation saying that one day Muhammad enjoins his Companions to one thing and then the next day he forbids it God revealed And whatever verse mā is the conditional particle that has been revealed containing a judgement We abrogate either together with its recital or not that is only its judgement but its recital continues; there is a variant reading nunsikh meaning ‘Whatever verse We command you or Gabriel to abrogate’ or postpone so that We do not reveal the judgement contained in it and We withhold its recital or retain it in the Preserved Tablet; a variant reading of nunsi’hā is nunsihā from ‘to forget’ so ‘Whatever verse We abrogate or We make you forget that is We erase from your heart’; the response to the conditional sentence begun with mā is We bring in place a better one that is more beneficial for Our servants either because it is easier to implement or contains much reward; or the like of it in terms of religious obligation and reward; do you not know that God has power over all things? including abrogating and substituting verses? the interrogative here is meant as an affirmative."
"Many of the People of the Scripture long that law ‘if only that’ represents the import of the verbal noun they might make you disbelievers after you have believed from the envy hasadan is the object denoting reason being of their own souls that is to say their wicked souls have prompted them to this attitude; after the truth with regard to the Prophet s has become clear to them in the Torah; yet pardon leave them be and be forgiving stay away and make no encroachments against them till God brings His command concerning fighting them; truly God has power over all things."
"And they that is the disbelievers of Mecca who do not know say to the Prophet s ‘Why does God not speak to us? to say that you are His Messenger; Why does a sign not come to us?’ of the sort we have requested in order to show your sincerity. So in the same way that these disbelievers have spoken spoke those before them from among past communities to their prophets the like of what they say in their obstinacy and demand for signs; their hearts are much alike in terms of unbelief and stubbornness this is meant as consolation for the Prophet s. Yet We have made clear the signs to a people who are certain a people who know that these are God’s signs and so they believe in them for to request other signs would be obduracy."
"We have sent you Muhammad (s) with the truth the guidance a bearer of good tidings of Paradise for those who respond to this guidance and warner of the Fire to those who do not respond to it. You shall not be asked about the inhabitants of Hell-fire that is about why the disbelievers did not believe for your responsibility is only to deliver the Message a variant reading of lā tus’al is lā tas’al ‘do not ask’ with the final apocopation of the vowel on account of it being an imperative."
"And mention when his Lord tested tried Abraham Ibrāhīm also read Ibrāhām with certain words with certain commands and prohibitions with which He charged him it is said that these included the rituals of the Pilgrimage the rinsing of the mouth snuffing up water into the nostrils to clean them cleaning of the teeth trimming facial hair combing of the hair trimming the fingernails shaving armpit and pubic hair circumcision and washing one’s private parts after elimination; and he fulfilled them he performed them thoroughly; He God exalted said to him ‘I make you a leader an exemplar in religion for the people.’ Said he ‘And of my seed?’ my progeny make leaders from among them; He said ‘My covenant of leadership shall not reach the evildoers’ the disbelievers from among them this indicates that the covenant will reach only those who are not evildoers."
"Say this address is to the believers ‘We believe in God and in that which has been revealed to us the Qur’ān and revealed to Abraham the ten scrolls Ishmael Isaac Jacob and the Tribes his sons and that which was given to Moses the Torah and Jesus the Gospel and the prophets from their Lord of Books and signs we make no division between any of them believing in some and disbelieving in others in the manner of Jews and Christians and to Him we submit’."
"When they meet laqū is actually laquyū but the damma has been omitted being too cumbersome for pronunciation; likewise the yā’ is omitted because it is unvocalised and is followed by a wāw; those who believe they say ‘We believe’; but when they go apart away from them and return to their devils their leaders they say ‘We are with you in religion; we were only mocking them the believers by feigning belief."
"The fools the ignorant among the people that is the Jews and the idolaters will say ‘What matter has turned them the Prophet s and the believers from the direction they were facing in their prayers formerly?’ this being the Holy House bayt al-maqdis sc. Jerusalem; the sīn of sa-yaqūlu ‘they will say’ denotes the future tense and informs of the Unseen. Say ‘To God belong the East and the West that is all directions. Thus He commands that they face whichever direction He wills and there can be no objection. He guides whomever He will His guidance being to a straight path’ that is the religion of Islam and you are among these guided ones."
"We have indeed qad ‘indeed’ is for affirmation seen you turning your face about in the direction of the heaven looking around for the Revelation and longing for the command to face the Ka‘ba he the Prophet wished for this because it was the prayer-direction of Abraham and would be more conducive to the submission of the Arabs to Islam; now We will surely turn you to a direction that shall satisfy you that you will love. Turn your face in prayer towards the Sacred Mosque that is the Ka‘ba and wherever you are addressing the Muslim community turn your faces in prayer towards it. Those who have been given the Scripture know that it the change towards the Ka‘ba is the fixed truth from their Lord on account of the description in their Scripture of how the Prophet s would re-orient himself to it; God is not heedless of what you do O believers when you obey His command alternatively ta‘malūna ‘you do’ can be read ya‘malūna ‘they do’ in other words it would be referring to the Jews’ denial of the matter concerning the direction of prayer."
"The following was revealed concerning the Jews Those who conceal from people the clear proofs and the guidance that We have revealed such as the ‘stoning’ verse and the description of Muhammad (s) after We have shown them clearly in the Scripture the Torah — they shall be cursed by God that is He will move them far away from His mercy and by the cursers the angels believers or by every single thing when they supplicate that they be cursed."
"Except those that repent turning back from such deeds and make amends in their actions and show clearly what they were concealing — them I shall turn relenting accepting their repentance; I am the Relenting the Merciful to believers."
"But those who disbelieve and die disbelieving wa-hum kuffār ‘they being disbelievers’ is a circumstantial qualifier — upon them shall be the curse of God and the angels and of people altogether that is they deserve such a curse in this life and in the next; ‘people’ here is said to be either people in general or believers."
"And when it is said to them the disbelievers ‘Follow what God has revealed’ pertaining to affirmation of God’s Oneness and the good things that He has made lawful they say ‘No; but we follow what we found our fathers doing’ in the way of idol-worship deeming unlawful the camel let loose and practising the slitting of the camel’s ear sc. bahīra. God says What? the hamza of a-wa-law is for repudiation do they follow them Even if their fathers do not understand anything concerning religion and they were not guided? to the truth."
"Those are they that have bought error at the price of guidance taking the former in place of the latter in this world and chastisement at the price of pardon the pardon that would have been prepared for them in the Hereafter had they not concealed this matter; what makes them so patient for the Fire? that is how great is the extent of their patience? This statement is intended to provoke amazement in the believers at the way in which they the disbelievers commit sins that necessitate their punishment in the Fire with complete indifference. In reality they would have no patience whatever to endure the Fire."
"Or the likeness of them is as a cloudburst that is the likeness of them is as people are during rain ka-sayyib the term is originally sayyūb from the verb sāba yasūbu meaning ‘it came down’; out of the heaven out of the clouds in which clouds is darkness layer upon layer and thunder the angel in charge of them sc. the clouds; it is also said that this thunder is actually the sound of his voice; and lightning the flash caused by his voice which he uses to drive them — they the people under the rain put their fingers that is their fingertips in their ears against because of the thunderclaps the violent sound of thunder in order not to hear it cautious of fearful of death if they were to hear it. Similar is the case with these when the Qur’ān is revealed in which there is mention of the unbelief that is like darkness the threat of punishment that is like the sound of thunder and the clear arguments that are like the clear lightning they shut their ears in order not to hear it and thereby incline towards true faith and abandon their religion which for them would be death; and God encompasses the disbelievers in both knowledge and power so they cannot escape Him."
"After the Prophet s was prevented from visiting the House in the year of the battle of Hudaybiyya he made a pact with the disbelievers that he would be allowed to return the following year at which time they would vacate Mecca for three days. Having prepared to depart for the Visitation ‘umra he and the believers were concerned that Quraysh would not keep to the agreement and instigate fighting. The Muslims were averse to becoming engaged in fighting while in a state of pilgrimage inviolability in the Sacred Enclosure al-haram and during the sacred months and so the following was revealed And fight in the way of God to elevate His religion with those who fight against you the disbelievers but aggress not against them by initiating the fighting; God loves not the aggressors the ones that overstep the bounds which God has set for them this stipulation was abrogated by the verse of barā’a ‘immunity’ Q. 91 or by His saying below"
"And slay them wherever you come upon them and expel them from where they expelled you that is from Mecca and this was done after the Conquest of Mecca; sedition their idolatry is more grievous more serious than slaying them in the Sacred Enclosure or while in a state of pilgrimage inviolability the thing that you greatly feared. But fight them not by the Sacred Mosque that is in the Sacred Enclosure until they should fight you there; then if they fight you there slay them there a variant reading drops the alif in the three verbs sc. wa-lā taqtilūhum hattā yaqtulūkum fa-in qatalūkum so that the sense is ‘slaying’ in all three and not just ‘fighting’ — such killing and expulsion is the requital of disbelievers."
"Then thumma denotes the sequence intended press on O Quraysh from where the people press on that is from ‘Arafa by standing there together with them for they used to stand at Muzdalifa disdaining to stand with other people; and seek God’s forgiveness for your sins; God is Forgiving Merciful to the believers."
"And there are others who say ‘Our Lord give to us in this world good a grace and good Paradise in the Hereafter and guard us against the chastisement of the Fire’ by not making us enter it. This former statement depicts the manner of the idolaters while the latter the way of the believers and is intended to encourage people to petition for good in both abodes for which one is promised a reward as He says"
"Decked out fair to the disbelievers of Mecca is the life of this world in disguise and they have fallen in love with it; and they deride the believers on account of their poverty the likes of Bilāl al-Habashī ‘Ammār b. Yāsir and Suhayb al-Rūmī mocking them and treating them condescendingly with their wealth; but those who fear idolatry namely those mentioned shall be above them on the Day of Resurrection; and God sustains whomever He will without reckoning with ample sustenance in the Hereafter or in this world when He gives to those that were mocked possession of the property and lives of those that mocked them."
"People were one community in faith but they fell into disagreement and some believed while others disbelieved; then God sent forth the prophets to them as bearers of good tidings of Paradise for the believers and warners of the Fire for the disbelievers; and He revealed with them the Scripture meaning the Books with the truth bi’l-haqqi ‘with the truth’ is semantically connected to anzala ‘He revealed’ that He might decide according to it between people regarding their differences in religion; and only those who had been given it the Scripture so that some believed while others disbelieved differed about it about religion after the clear proofs the manifest arguments for God’s Oneness had come to them min of min ba‘di ‘after’ is semantically connected to ikhtalafa ‘they differed’ and together with what follows should be understood as coming before the exception illā lladhīna ‘only those’; out of insolence on the part of the disbelievers one to another; then God guided those who believed to the truth regarding which min of min al-haqqi ‘of the truth’ here is explicative they were at variance by His leave by His will; and God guides with His guidance whomever He will to a straight path the path of truth."
"The following was revealed after the Muslims suffered a trying experience Or did you suppose that you should enter Paradise without there having come upon you the like of what came upon those believers who passed away before you? of trials so that you may endure as they did; a new sentence begins here explaining the previous one They were afflicted by misery extreme poverty and hardship illness and were so convulsed by all types of tribulations that the Messenger and those who believed with him said read yaqūla or yaqūlu not expecting to see any help on account of the extreme hardship afflicting them ‘When will God’s help come?’ the help which we were promised; and God responded to them Ah but surely God’s help is nigh in coming."
"Prescribed for you obligatory for you is fighting disbelievers though it be hateful to you by nature because of the hardship involved. Yet it may happen that you hate a thing which is good for you; and it may happen that you love a thing which is bad for you because the soul inclines towards those desires which result in its destruction and its rejection of the religious obligations that would bring about its happiness. Perhaps then even if you are averse to it you will find much good in fighting as a result of victory booty martyrdom or reward; while if you were to reject fighting even if you would like to do so you will find much evil because then you may be subjugated impoverished and denied the reward; God knows what is good for you and you know this not so strive in what He commands you."
"Thus the Prophet s sent forth the first of his raiding parties under the command of ‘Abd Allāh b. Jahsh. They fought against the idolaters and killed ‘Amr b. ‘Abd Allāh Ibn al-Hadramī in the sacred month of Rajab thinking that it was the last day of Jumādā II. The disbelievers reviled them for making fighting lawful in a sacred month and so God revealed the following They ask you about the sacred the forbidden month and fighting in it qitālin fīhi ‘fighting in it’ is an inclusive substitution for al-shahri l-harāmi ‘the sacred month’. Say to them ‘Fighting qitālun is the subject in it is a grave thing kabīr ‘grave’ is the predicate that is heinous in terms of sin; but to bar saddun is the subject people from God’s way His religion and disbelief in Him in God and to bar from the Sacred Mosque that is Mecca and to expel its people the Prophet s and the believers from it — that is graver the predicate of the last subject that is more heinous in terms of sin than fighting in it in God’s sight; and sedition your idolatry is graver than your slaying’ in it. They the disbelievers will not cease to fight against you O believers until so that they turn you from your religion to unbelief if they are able; and whoever of you turns from his religion and dies disbelieving — their good works have failed that is they are invalid in this world and the Hereafter. Thus they will not count for anything and will not result in any reward. The specification of death as a condition is because if that person were to return to Islam again his original deeds would not be invalidated and he will be rewarded for them and he would not have to repeat them deeds such as performing the Pilgrimage al-Shāfi‘ī is of this opinion. Those are the inhabitants of the Fire abiding therein."
"When those of the raiding party of ‘Abd Allāh b. Jahsh thought that although they had been released from the sin of having slain in the sacred month they would not receive any reward the following was revealed Verily the believers and those who emigrate and depart from their homeland and struggle in God’s way in order to elevate His religion — those have hope of God’s compassion His reward; and God is Forgiving of believers Merciful to them."
"O Muslims Do not marry idolatresses disbelievers until they believe; a believing slavegirl is better than an idolatress who may be a free woman; this was revealed as a rebuttal of the idea that it was shameful to marry a slavegirl and that it was better to marry an idolatress free woman; though you may admire her because of her beauty and wealth this provision excludes the womenfolk of the People of the Scripture as indicated by the verse Q. 55 lawful to you are the chaste women among those who were given the Scripture. And do not marry off believing women to idolaters until they believe. A believing slave is better than an idolater though you may admire him for his wealth and good looks. Those the people of idolatry call to the Fire because they invite one to perform deeds that merit this and for this reason one should not marry with them; and God calls through the voice of His prophets to Paradise and pardon that is to the deeds that merit these two by His leave by His will so that His call may be heeded by marrying with His friends; and He makes clear His signs to the people so that they might remember that they might be admonished."
"Your women are a tillage for you that is the place where you sow the seeds of your children; so come to your tillage that is the specified place the front part as in whichever way you wish whether standing up sitting down lying down from the front or the back this was revealed in response to the Jews saying that if a person had vaginal intercourse with his wife from behind the child would be born cross-eyed; and offer for your souls righteous deeds such as saying ‘In the Name of God’ bismillāh when you commence intercourse; and fear God in what He commands and prohibits; and know that you shall meet Him at the Resurrection where He will requite you according to your deeds; and give good tidings of Paradise to the believers who feared Him."
"And if you do not do what was mentioned because you are incapable and you will not a parenthetical statement that is never will you be able to because of its inimitability then fear through belief in God and belief that this is not the words of a human the Fire whose fuel is men disbelievers and stones like their very idols indicating that its heat is extreme since it burns with the stones mentioned unlike the fires of this world that burn with wood and similar materials; prepared and made ready for disbelievers so that they are punished in it this phrase u‘iddat li’l-kāfirīna ‘prepared for disbelievers’ is either a new sentence or a sustained circumstantial qualifier."
"Have you not seen an interrogative to provoke amazement and a longing to hear what will follow that is ‘Has your knowledge not attained’ those thousands four eight ten thirty forty or seventy thousand who went forth from their habitations fearful of death? hadhara’l-mawt an object denoting reason. These were a people from among the Children of Israel who fled their homeland after it was afflicted with plague. God said to them ‘Die!’ and they did. Then He gave them life after eight days or more as a result of the supplication of their prophet Ezekiel Hizqīl and they lived on for a while with the effects of death still upon them such that when they wore garments these turned into shrouds for the deceased; and this phenomenon remained with their descendants. Truly God is bounteous to people such as when He gave life back to those just mentioned but most people that is disbelievers are not thankful. The purpose of mentioning the story of these people is to encourage believers to fight in the way of God which is why the following statement is supplemented to it"
"And their prophet said to them after they had demanded a sign of his kingship ‘The sign of his kingship is that there will come to you the Ark a chest containing the images of the prophets which God sent down to Adam and which was handed down to them sc. the Israelites until the Amalekites seized it from them in battle. They used to commence fighting invoking it before their enemy and marching behind it as well as experience peacefulness in its presence as God says therein is a Spirit of Peace reassurance for your hearts from your Lord and a remnant of what the folk of Moses and the folk of Aaron left behind which were Moses’s pair of sandals and his staff Aaron’s turban a measure qafīz of the manna that used to come down on them and the pieces of the broken tablets the angels bearing it tahmiluhu l-malā’ikatu the circumstantial qualifier referring to the subject of the verb ya’tiyakum ‘there will come to’. Surely in that shall be a sign for you of his kingship if you are believers’. The angels bore it between the earth and the sky while they gazed at it until finally they placed it before Saul. They then acknowledged his kingship and hastened to enlist in the holy struggle and he chose seventy thousand of their young men."
"These verses are the verses of God We recite to you O Muhammad (s) as narration in truth and assuredly you are one of the Messengers of God the emphasis is made here with the particle inna of innaka ‘surely you are’ with the remainder of the statement being a rebuttal of the disbelievers’ saying ‘You are no Messenger’."
"O you who believe expend of what We have provided you with what is due of it as alms before there comes a day in which there shall be neither commerce ransom nor friendship that can be of any benefit nor intercession without His permission a variant reading has all three nouns in nominative inflection bay‘un khullatun shafā‘atun as opposed to lā bay‘a lā khullata lā shafā‘ata this is the Day of Resurrection. And the disbelievers those that disbelieve in God or in the obligations He has imposed on them — they are the evildoers for not respecting God’s command."
"God is the Protector helper of the believers; He brings them forth from the shadows of unbelief into the light of faith. And the disbelievers — their protectors are false deities that bring them forth from the light into the shadows the repetition of ‘bringing forth from’ here is either to be taken as a reflection of His previous words “He brings them forth from the shadows” or as a reference to all those Jews who believed in the Prophet before he was sent but then rejected him those are the inhabitants of the Fire therein they shall abide."
"God is not ashamed to strike to make a similitude mathal is the first direct object; mā either represents an indefinite noun described by what comes after it and constitutes a second direct object meaning ‘whatever that similitude may be’; or it the mā is extra to emphasise the vileness involved so that what follows constitutes the second direct object; even of a gnat ba‘ūda is the singular of ba‘ūd that is small flies; or anything above it that is larger than it so that this explanation is not affected by the size of the creature with regard to the judgement God is making; as for the believers they know it the similitude is the truth established and given in this instance from their Lord; but as for disbelievers they say ‘What did God desire by this for a similitude?’ mathalan is a specification meaning ‘by this similitude’; mā is an interrogative of rejection and is the subject; dhā means alladhī whose relative clause contains its predicate in other words ‘what use is there in it?’. God then responds to them saying Thereby that is by this similitude He leads many astray from the truth on account of their disbelieving in it and thereby He guides many believers on account of their belief in it; and thereby He leads none astray except the wicked those that reject obedience to Him."
"O you who believe fear God and give up abandon the usury that is outstanding if you are believers true to your faith since it is expected of the believer that he adhere to God’s command this was revealed when some of the Companions after the prohibition wanted to reclaim some of the usury from before."
"The Messenger Muhammad (s) believes in affirms the truth of what was revealed to him from his Lord namely the Qur’ān and the believers wa’l-mu’minūna is a supplement to al-rasūlu ‘the Messenger’; each one the tanwīn of kullun stands in place of the second noun in an annexation sc. kullu wāhidin believes in God and His angels and in His Books all of them and each of them and His messengers and they say ‘we make no distinction between any of His messengers’ believing in some and disbelieving in others in the manner of the Jews and the Christians. And they say ‘We hear what we have been enjoined to hear and accept and obey; we ask you Your forgiveness our Lord; to You is the homecoming’ that is the return at the Resurrection. When the previous verse was revealed the believers complained of evil whisperings and it grieved them that they should be taken to account according to the principle expressed in it and so the following was revealed"
"And mention when We said to the angels ‘Prostrate yourselves to Adam’ a prostration that is a bow of salutation; so they prostrated themselves except Iblīs the father of the jinn who was among the angels he refused to prostrate and disdained became proud and said I am better than he Q. 712; and so he became one of the disbelievers according to God’s knowledge."
"As for the disbelievers who deny Our signs Our Books those shall be the inhabitants of the Fire abiding therein’ enduring perpetually neither perishing nor exiting therefrom."
"As for the disbelievers the likes of Abū Jahl Abū Lahab and such; alike it is for them whether you have warned them or have not warned them they do not believe as God knows very well so do not hope that they will believe read a-andhartahum pronouncing both hamzas or by not pronouncing the second making it an alif instead and inserting an alif between the one not pronounced and the other one or leaving this insertion; al-indhār ‘warning’ is to give knowledge of something and simultaneously instil an element of fear."
"Are you then so eager O believers that they the Jews should believe you seeing there is a party of them a group of their rabbis that heard God’s word in the Torah and then tampered with it changing it and that after they had comprehended it after they had understood it knowingly? knowing full well that they were indulging in mendacity the hamza at the beginning of the verb a-fa-tatma‘ūn is an interrogative for rejection in other words ‘Do not be so eager for they have disbelieved before’."
"And when they the hypocrites from among the Jews meet those who believe they say ‘We believe’ that Muhammad (s) is a prophet and that he is the one of whom we have been given good tidings in our Book; but when they go in private one to another they their leaders the ones not involved in the hypocrisy say to those hypocrites ‘Do you speak to them the believers of what God has disclosed to you that is what He has made known to you of Muhammad’s s description in the Torah so that they may thereby dispute the lām of li-yuhājjūkum ‘that they may dispute with you’ is the lām of ‘becoming’ with you before your Lord? in the Hereafter and hold the proof against you for not following him Muhammad (s) despite your knowledge of his sincerity? Have you no understanding?’ of the fact that they will contend with you if you speak to them in this way? So beware."
"The following was revealed concerning the hypocrites and some people there are who say ‘We believe in God and the Last Day’ that is in the Day of Resurrection because it is the very last day; but they are not believers the plural import of man in man yaqūl ‘who says’ is taken into account here as expressed by a pronoun hum that expresses this plural meaning."
"When there came to them a Book from God confirming what was with them in the Torah that is the Qur’ān — and they formerly before it came prayed for victory for assistance over the disbelievers saying ‘God give us assistance against them through the Prophet that shall be sent at the end of time’; but when there came to them what they recognised as the truth that is the mission of the Prophet they disbelieved in it out of envy and for fear of losing leadership the response to the first lammā particle is indicated by the response to the second one; and the curse of God is on the disbelievers."
"They would deceive God and the believers by manifesting the opposite of the unbelief they hide so that they can avoid His rulings in this world; and only themselves they deceive yukhādi‘ūn for the evil consequences of their deception will rebound upon them as they are disgraced in this world when God makes known to His Prophet what they are hiding and they will be punished in the Hereafter; and they are not aware and they do not know that they are actually deceiving themselves mukhāda‘a although a third verbal form from khāda‘a actually denotes a one-way action such as when one says ‘āqabtu al-lissa ‘I punished the thief’ using the third verbal form ‘āqaba; the mention of ‘God’ in this statement is for rhetorical effect; a variant reading for wa-mā yukhādi‘ūna has wa-mā yakhda‘ūna."
"Evil is that for which they sell their souls that is their share of the reward in the Hereafter bi’samā ‘evil is that for which’ mā here is an indefinite particle representing ‘a thing’ and constitutes a specification qualifying the subject of the verb bi’s ‘evil is’ the very thing being singled out for criticism; that they disbelieve in that Qur’ān which God has revealed grudging baghyan here is an object denoting reason for yakfurū ‘they disbelieve’ that is out of envy that God should reveal read either yunzil or yunazzil of His bounty the Inspiration to whomever He will of His servants to deliver the Message; and they were laden they returned with anger from God for their disbelief in what He has revealed the indefinite form bi-ghadabin ‘with anger’ is used to emphasise the awesomeness of the ‘anger’ upon anger which they deserved formerly when they neglected the Torah and disbelieved in Jesus; and for the disbelievers there shall be a humiliating chastisement."
"And when it was said to them ‘Believe in what God has revealed that is the Qur’ān and other Books they said ‘We believe in what was revealed to us’ that is the Torah; and wā here indicates a circumstantial qualifier they disbelieve in what is beyond that what is other than that or what came afterwards such as the Qur’ān; yet it is the truth wa-huwa’l-haqqu is a circumstantial qualifier confirming musaddiqan a second circumstantial qualifier for emphasis what is with them. Say to them ‘Why then were you slaying the prophets of God formerly if you were believers?’ in the Torah and in it you were forbidden to kill them this address concerning what their forefathers did is directed towards those present at the time of our Prophet on account of their approval of it that is of what the forefathers had done."
"And when We made a covenant with you to act according to what is in the Torah and raised over you the Mount to drop it on you when you had refused to accept it; We said ‘Take forcefully seriously and with effort what We have given you and listen’ to what you have been commanded and be prepared to accept it They said ‘We hear your words and disobey’ your command; and they were made to drink the calf in their hearts that is to say the love of it the golden calf intoxicated their hearts in the way that wine does on account of their unbelief. Say to them ‘Evil is that thing which your belief in the Torah enjoins on you in the way of the worship of the golden calf if you are believers’ in it as you claim; meaning you are not believers for faith does not command that you worship the calf — their forefathers are meant here. Likewise you do not believe in the Torah because you have denied the prophethood of Muhammad (s) whereas faith in it does not command you to reject him."
"But they will never long for it because of that which their own hands have sent before them as a result of their rejection of the Prophet s the consequence of their mendacity. God knows the evildoers the disbelievers and He will requite them."
"Say to them ‘Whoever is an enemy to Gabriel let him die in exasperation — he it was that brought it the Qur’ān down upon your heart by the leave by the command of God confirming what was before it of scriptures a guidance from error and good tidings of Paradise for the believers."
"Whoever is an enemy to God and His angels and His messengers and Gabriel read Jibrīl or Jabrīl Jibra’il or Jabra’il Jibra’īl or Jabra’īl and Michael Mīkāl also read Mīkā’īl or Mīkā’il; a supplement to malā’ikatihi ‘His angels’ an example of the specific being supplemented to the collective — then surely God is an enemy to the disbelievers’ He says ‘to the disbelievers’ instead of ‘to them’ in order to point out their status."
"As for the disbelievers neither their riches nor their children will avail will protect them against God that is against His chastisement; those — they shall be fuel for the Fire they shall constitute what the Fire will be fuelled by read waqūd as opposed to wuqūd ‘fuel’."
"The following was revealed when the Jews passed by the Aws and the Khazraj and were infuriated by their comradeship and set about reminding them of their mutual hostility in the days before Islam such that they caused them to quarrel and the two tribes were on the verge of fighting one another O you who believe if you obey a party of those who have been given the Scripture they will turn you after you have believed into disbelievers."
"The day when some faces are blackened and some faces whitened that is the Day of Resurrection. As for those whose faces are blackened these being the disbelievers who are thrown into the Fire and to whom it is said in rebuke ‘Did you disbelieve after you had believed on the day the covenant was made? Then taste the chastisement for what you disbelieved!’"
"But as for those whose faces are whitened and these are the believers they shall be in God’s mercy that is to say in Paradise abiding therein."
"You O community of Muhammad (s) are the best community brought forth manifested to men according to God’s knowledge enjoining decency and forbidding indecency and believing in God. Had the People of the Scripture believed it their belief would have been better for them; some of them are believers such as ‘Abd Allāh b. Salām may God be pleased with him and his companions; but most of them the disbelievers are wicked."
"As for the disbelievers their riches shall not avail protect them neither their children against God that is against His chastisement these two are singled out for mention because a person usually avails himself either by paying a ransom or by resorting to the help of his children; those are the inhabitants of the Fire abiding therein."
"The likeness the description of what they the disbelievers expend in the life of this world in the way of enmity towards the Prophet or in the way of voluntary almsgiving or the like is as the likeness of a wind wherein is a blast of extreme hot or cold that smote the tillage the crops of a people who have wronged themselves through unbelief and disobedience and destroyed it so that they could not profit from it; so it is with what they expend it perishes and they profit nothing from it. God did not wrong them when they lost what they expended but they wronged themselves through unbelief which necessitated this loss."
"Lo hā ‘lo!’ is for calling attention to something there you are O believers you love them on account of their kinship and their pretence of friendship towards you but they love you not since they oppose you in religion; you believe in the Book all of it that is to say in the Books all of them but they do not believe in your Book and when they meet you they say ‘We believe’ but when they are alone they bite at you their fingertips in rage in extreme fury at what they see of your mutual affection the biting of the fingertips is used to figuratively express the severity of rage even if there be no biting involved. Say ‘Perish in your rage that is be this way until the end of your lives for you shall not see what will please you; God knows what is in the breasts’ what is in the hearts including that which these conceal."
"When the Prophet s enjoined the Jews to enter into Islam after his return from Badr they said ‘Do not fool yourself just because you killed a few men of Quraysh inexperienced and knowing nothing about fighting’ whereupon the following was revealed Say O Muhammad (s) to the disbelievers from among the Jews ‘You shall be vanquished sa-tughlabūn or read sa-yughlabūn ‘they shall be vanquished’ in this world through being killed or taken captive and made to pay the jizya which actually took place and mustered read in both ways wa-tuhsharūna ‘you will be mustered’ or wa-yuhsharūna ‘they will be mustered’ in the Hereafter to Hell which you shall enter — an evil cradling!’ an evil resting place."
"And mention O Muhammad (s) when you went forth at dawn from your family at Medina to assign the believers to have them occupy their places stations for them to stand at for battle and God hears what you say knows your circumstances this was the day of the battle of Uhud. The Prophet s set out with 1000 or 950 men while the idolaters numbered 3000. The Prophet pitched camp at the ravine on Saturday 7th of Shawwāl in year 3 of the Hijra. He had his back and that of his troops to Uhud. He arranged their lines and placed a group of archers under the command of ‘Abd Allāh b. Jubayr at the foot of the mountain and said to them ‘Defend us with your arrows in case they come up from behind us and remain here whether we are being defeated or on the verge of victory’."
"When idh substitutes for the previous idh two parties of you the Banū Salima and the Banū Hāritha the two flanks of the army were about to lose heart about to shrink from the battle and retreat after ‘Abd Allāh b. Ubayy the hypocrite and his companions began to retreat. He Ibn Ubayy said ‘Why should we get ourselves and our children killed?’ and he also said to Abū Jābir al-Salamī — who had said to him ‘I implore you by God for your Prophet’s sake and yours’ — ‘If we knew how to fight we would follow you!’ But God then made them the Banū Salima and the Banū Hāritha steadfast and they did not abandon the field; and God was their Protector their Helper and let the believers rely on God let them place their trust in Him and none other."
"When idh an adverbial qualifier of nasarakum ‘He gave you victory’ in the previous verse you were saying to the believers promising them as reassurance for them ‘Is it not sufficient for you that your Lord should reinforce you that He should succour you with three thousand angels sent down? read munzalīn or munazzalīn ‘sent down’."
"And that He might cut off li-yaqta‘ is semantically connected to the clause containing nasarakum ‘He gave you victory’ that is to say that He might destroy a party of the disbelievers by slaying them or making them fall captive or suppress them humiliate them through defeat so that they fall back return frustrated not having secured what they desired."
"There has already been a sign an example the verb qad kāna ‘there has been’ is used to separate the statement to follow from the previous one for you in two hosts two parties that met one another in battle on the day of Badr; one company fighting in the way of God in obedience to Him namely the Prophet and his Companions who numbered three hundred and thirteen men most of them on foot with two horses six plates of armour and eight swords; and another unbelieving; they the disbelievers numbering almost a thousand saw them the Muslims twice the like of them that is more numerous than themselves as the eye sees in manifest vision witnessing; and God granted them victory despite their fewer number; for God confirms He strengthens with His help whom He will granting him victory. Surely in that which is mentioned is a lesson for people of vision those who are discerning so will you not be warned by this and become believers?"
"And fear the Fire that has been prepared for the disbelievers lest you be chastised with it."
"The following was revealed regarding the defeat at Uhud Ways of life have passed away before you all manner of unbelief has preceded where they have been given respite but are then seized with punishment; so travel in the land O believers and behold how was the end of those who denied the messengers that is how their affair ended in destruction. So do not grieve on account of their victory I am only giving them respite until their appointed time."
"Faint not shrink not from fighting the disbelievers neither grieve for what befell you at Uhud for you shall prevail through victory over them if you are truly believers. the response to this last conditional clause is the sum meaning of what has preceded it."
"If a wound touches you befalls you at Uhud a like wound qarh or qurh which is the exhaustion that results from a wound and the like already at Badr has touched the other people the disbelievers. Such days We deal out in turn We dispense them among mankind one day for one group the next day for another that they might be admonished and that God may know through knowledge manifested outwardly those who believe who are sincere in their faith from others; and that He may take witnesses from among you honouring them with martyrdom and God loves not the evildoers the disbelievers that is He will chastise them and the blessings He bestows upon them are only a means of drawing out their punishment."
"And that God may prove the believers purifying them of sins through what befalls them and efface that is destroy the disbelievers."
"With regard to their being routed when it was rumoured that the Prophet had been killed and the hypocrites had said to the believers ‘If he has been killed go back to your previous religion’ the following was revealed Muhammad is only a messenger; messengers have passed away before him. Why if he should die or is slain like others will you turn back on your heels will you return to unbelief the last statement is the locus of the interrogative of denial in other words ‘he was not a worshipped being so that if he were to die you should turn back to your previous religion’. If any man should turn back on his heels he will not harm God in any way but will be harming himself and God will requite those that are thankful for His graces by staying firm."
"O you who believe if you obey the disbelievers in what they command you they will make you turn back on your heels back to unbelief and you will revert as losers."
"We will cast terror read ru‘b or ru‘ub into the hearts of the disbelievers after departing from Uhud they resolved to return in order to exterminate the Muslims but they were terrified and did not return; for what they have associated because of their associating with God that for which He has revealed no warrant that is no argument in support of its worship namely idols; their abode shall be the Fire; evil is the abode the resting place of the evildoers the disbelievers."
"God has been true to His promise towards you of giving you victory when you slew them by His leave by His will until you lost heart until you shrank from battle and quarrelled disagreed over the command that is the command of the Prophet s that you remain at the foot of the mountain for the arrow attack some of you saying ‘Let us depart for our comrades have been given victory’ others saying ‘We should not disobey the command of the Prophet s’; and you disobeyed his command and abandoned your station in search of the booty after He God had shown you what you longed for of assistance the response to the clause containing idhā is indicated by what precedes it that is to say ‘when you lost heart He denied you His assistance’. Some of you desired this world abandoning his station for the sake of the booty; and some of you desired the Hereafter holding to it until he was slain such as ‘Abd Allāh b. Jubayr and his companions. Then He turned you away thumma sarafakum is a supplement to the response of the clause containing idhā implied to be raddakum bi’l-hazīma ‘He turned you back in defeat’ from them the disbelievers so that He might try you that He might test you and so make manifest the sincere ones from those otherwise; yet now He has pardoned you what you have done and God is Bounteous to the believers with pardon."
"Then He sent down upon you after grief security — a slumber nu‘āsan ‘slumber’ substitutes for amanatan ‘security’ overcoming yaghshā or taghshā a party of you namely the believers. They would become dizzy under their shields and their swords would fall from their hands; and a party whose own souls distressed them that is they caused them grief so that their only wish was their deliverance regardless of the Prophet and his Companions and they were unable to fall asleep these were the hypocrites; thinking wrongly of God thoughts of those thoughts during the age of ignorance the moment they thought that the Prophet had been killed or that he would not be given victory saying ‘Have we any part whatever in the affair?’ read interrogative hal as negative mā that is we have no part in the assistance which we were promised. Say to them ‘The affair belongs entirely read accusative kullahu to denote an emphasis or nominative kulluhu as a subject of a new sentence the predicate of which is what follows to God’ that is to say the decree is His He does what He wills. They conceal within their hearts what they do not disclose what they do not manifest to you saying yaqūlūna ‘saying’ is an explication of the preceding statement ‘Had we had any part in the affair we would not have been slain here’ that is to say ‘Had the choice been ours we would not have set out and thus been slain; but we were forced to set out’. Say to them ‘Even if you had been in your houses with some among you whom God had appointed that they be slain those of you for whom it had been appointed decreed that they be slain would have sallied forth would have gone forth to the places where they were to lie’ the battleground where they were to fall and they would have been slain; and their staying put at home would not have saved them for God’s decree will be inevitably. And He did what He did at Uhud that God might try that He might test what was in your breasts your hearts of sincerity or hypocrisy and that He might prove that He might distinguish what was in your hearts; and God knows what is in the breasts what is in the hearts. Nothing can be hidden from Him and He tries people only to make matters manifest for them."
"Truly those of you who turned away from the battle the day the two hosts the Muslim host and that of the disbelievers encountered each other at Uhud the Muslims with the exception of twelve men — truly Satan made them slip with his evil insinuations through some of what they had earned of sins namely when they disobeyed the Prophet’s command; but God pardoned them; God is Forgiving to believers Forbearing hastening not against the disobedient with punishment."
"O you who believe be not as the disbelievers that is as the hypocrites who say of their brothers that is regarding their affair when they travel in the land and then die or are on raiding campaigns ghuzzan ‘a raiding party’ is the plural of ghāzin and are then slain ‘Had they been with us they would not have died and would not have been slain’ in other words do not say as they say — so that God may make that saying of theirs as a conclusion of their affair anguish in their hearts. For God gives life and He gives death and so no staying put can prevent death and God sees what you do ta‘malūna or ya‘malūna ‘they do’ and He will requite you for it."
"If God helps you if He gives you assistance against your enemy as on the Day of Badr then none can overcome you; but if He forsakes you if He refrains from assisting you as on the Day of Uhud then who is there who can help you after Him? that is after His forsaking you? In other words there is no one to help you. Therefore on God and on no one else let the believers rely."
"Truly God was gracious to the believers when He sent to them a messenger from among their own that is to say an Arab like them not an angel or a non-Arab so that they can understand what he says and feel honoured thereby to recite to them His verses the Qur’ān and to purify them to cleanse them of sins and to teach them the Book the Qur’ān wisdom the Sunna though in is softened in place of inna that is innahum ‘though they…’ before that is before he was sent they were in clear error."
"And what afflicted you the day the two hosts encountered at Uhud was by God’s leave by His will and that He might know through knowledge manifested outwardly the true believers."
"And that He might also know the hypocrites and those who when it was said to them after they had fled the fighting namely ‘Abd Allāh b. Ubayy and his companions ‘Come now fight in the way of God His enemies or defend’ us against the enemy by increasing the multitude of our fighters if you are not going to fight; they said ‘If we knew how if we were skilled enough to fight we would follow you’. God then said showing them to be liars They that day were nearer to unbelief than to belief for what they manifested of their forsaking the believers whereas before they had been outwardly nearer to belief; saying with their mouths that which was not in their hearts for even if they had known how to fight they would not have followed you. And God knows best what they hide of hypocrisy."
"Joyful in grace in the reward and bounty in addition to it from God and that read wa-anna as a supplement to ni‘matin or wa-inna to denote a new clause God does not let the wage of believers go to waste but rewards them."
"Those to whom alladhīna substitutes for the previous alladhīna ‘those who’ or an adjectival qualification of it people that is Nu‘aym b. Mas‘ūd al-Ashja‘ī said ‘The people Abū Sufyān and his companions have gathered their multitudes against you in order to exterminate you therefore fear them’ and do not go out to encounter them; but that saying increased them in faith in their belief in God and in certainty and they said ‘God is sufficient for us He will deal fully for us with their affair; an excellent Guardian is He’  the One to whom the matter is entrusted. They thus set out with the Prophet s and arrived at the market-fair of Badr but God had cast terror into the hearts of Abū Sufyān and his followers and so they did not turn up. They the believers had merchandise with them and so they traded and made profits. God exalted be He says"
"That namely the one saying to you ‘The people have gathered against you’ to the end of the verse is only Satan making you fear his friends the disbelievers therefore do not fear them; but fear Me lest you abandon My command if you are truly believers."
"And let not the disbelievers suppose read lā yahsabanna ‘let them not suppose’ or lā tahsabanna ‘do not suppose’ that what We indulge them in that is that Our indulging them in extending their terms of life and deferring them their death is better for their souls in the case of the reading yahsabanna ‘let them not suppose’ anna of anna-mā and its two operators stand in place of the two objects but only in place of the second in the case of the other reading tahsabanna ‘do not suppose’. We grant them indulgence We give them respite only that they may increase in sinfulness through frequent disobedience and theirs is a humbling chastisement one of humiliation in the Hereafter."
"It is not God’s purpose to leave to abandon the believers in the state in which you O people are where the sincere are intermingled with those otherwise till He shall distinguish read yamīza or yumayyiza till He separates the evil one the hypocrite from the good the believer through the burdensome obligations that will reveal this distinction — He did this on the Day of Uhud. And it is not God’s purpose to apprise you of the Unseen so that you could recognise the hypocrites from the others before the distinguishing; but God chooses He selects of His messengers whom He will apprising him of some of His Unseen as when He apprised the Prophet s of the position of the hypocrites. So believe in God and His messengers; and if you believe and guard against hypocrisy then yours shall be a great wage."
"God bears witness that is to say He has made it clear to His creation through proofs and signs that there is no god none that is truly worshipped in existence except Him He has borne witness to this and the angels have also borne witness to this by affirming it and those of knowledge from among the prophets and the believers through their conviction and in words; upholding constantly and uniquely maintaining His creations with justice qā’iman ‘upholding’ is in the accusative because it is a circumstantial qualifier and is governed by the import of the statement implied to be something like tafarrada ‘He alone is upholding…’; there is no god except Him He has repeated it for emphasis; the Mighty in His Kingdom the Wise in His actions."
"To God belongs the kingdom of the heavens and of the earth the storehouses of rain sustenance vegetation and so forth and God has power over all things including the punishing of disbelievers and the saving of believers."
"Lo! the religion with God pleasing to Him is submission to the One God al-islām that is to say the Divine Law with which the messengers were sent founded upon the affirmation of God’s Oneness a variant reading for inna ‘lo!’ has anna ‘that’ as an inclusive substitution for annahu to the end of that verse sc. shahida Llāhu … anna l-dīna ‘inda Llāhi l-islām ‘God bears witness that religion with God is Islām. Those who were given the Scripture the Jews and the Christians differed in religion some affirming God’s Oneness others rejecting it only after the knowledge of Oneness came to them through transgression on the part of the disbelievers among themselves. And whoever disbelieves in God’s signs God is swift at reckoning that is at requiting him."
"Our Lord whomever You admit into the Fire to abide therein You will have abased You will have humiliated and the evildoers the disbelievers therein shall have no helpers to protect them from God’s chastisement exalted be He the overt noun ‘the evildoers’ has replaced the pronominalisation ‘whomever’ in order to inform that the punishment of abasement is specifically theirs; the min of min ansār ‘helpers’ is extra."
"And their Lord answers them their supplication by saying that ‘I do not let the labour of any labourer among you go to waste be you male or female — the one of you is as the other this statement is a reaffirmation of the previous one that is they are both equal when it comes to recompensing them for their deeds and for not neglecting them. When Umm Salama asked ‘O Messenger of God why is there no mention of women when it comes to the Emigration hijra?’ the following was revealed and those who emigrated from Mecca to Medina and were expelled from their habitations those who suffered hurt in My way for My religion and fought the disbelievers and were slain read qutilū or quttilū — them I shall surely absolve of their evil deeds concealing these with forgiveness and I shall admit them to Gardens underneath which river flow’. A reward thawāban is a verbal noun reaffirming the import of la-ukaffiranna from God! there is a shift of person here. And God — with Him is the fairest reward the fairest requital."
"When the Muslims began to say ‘Look at the enemies of God how comfortable they are while we are struggling!’ the following was revealed Let it not delude you that the disbelievers go to and fro in the land engaging in commerce and acquiring profit"
"So if they the disbelievers dispute with you O Muhammad (s) concerning religion say to them ‘I have surrendered my countenance to God that is to say I have submitted to Him I and whoever follows me’ wajh ‘countenance’ is chosen here because of its noble character for the other parts of the body will just as soon surrender once the countenance has; and say to those who have been given the Scripture the Jews and the Christians and to the uninstructed the Arab idolaters ‘Have you submitted?’ that is to say ‘Submit!’ And so if they have submitted they have been guided from error but if they turn their backs to Islam your duty is only to deliver the Message; and God sees His servants and so requites them for their deeds — this statement was revealed before the command to fight them had been revealed."
"O you who believe be patient in performing acts of obedience in the face of afflictions and in refraining from acts of disobedience and vie in patience with the disbelievers lest they be more patient than you; be steadfast persist in the struggle; fear God in all of your circumstances so that you will prosper so that you will win admittance to Paradise and be delivered from the Fire."
"Let not the believers take the disbelievers as patrons rather than that is instead of the believers — for whoever does that that is whoever takes them as patrons does not belong to the religion of God in anyway — unless you protect yourselves against them as a safeguard tuqātan ‘as a safeguard’ is the verbal noun from taqiyyatan that is to say unless you fear something in which case you may show patronage to them through words but not in your hearts this was before the hegemony of Islam and the dispensation applies to any individual residing in a land with no say in it. God warns you He instills fear in you of His Self warning that He may be wrathful with you if you take them as patrons; and to God is the journey’s end the return and He will requite you."
"Say to them ‘Obey God and the Messenger’ as regards the belief in the Oneness of God which he enjoins upon you. But if they turn their backs if they object to obedience God loves not the disbelievers meaning that He will chastise them the third person pronominalisation ‘they’ is replaced by the overt noun ‘the disbelievers’."
"And He will make him to be a messenger to the Children of Israel during his tender years or after puberty. Gabriel breathed into the opening of her garment and she became pregnant. What happened to her after this is mentioned later in sūrat Maryam Q. 1921ff. Thus when God sent him to the Children of Israel he said to them ‘I am God’s Messenger to you’ and ‘I have come to you with a sign an indication of my truthfulness from your Lord and it is that I will create a variant reading for the particle introducing the relative clause annī ‘that I’ has innī ‘truly I’ indicating a new independent sentence that I will fashion for you out of clay like the shape of a bird ka-hay’at ‘something like the shape of’ the kāf is the subject of a passive participle then I will breathe into it fīhi the suffixed pronoun -hi refers to the preceding kāf and it will be a bird tayran is also read tā’iran by the leave the will of God. So he created for them a bat being the most perfectly-created of birds and they would watch it flying but when it went out of sight it would fall dead — so that the work of a creature sc. Jesus may be distinguished from the work of the Creator namely God exalted be He and that he might know that perfection belongs to God alone. I will also heal the blind akmah is one that is blind from birth and the leper; these two are singled out for mention because with both afflictions the person is completely helpless. He Jesus was sent in an age of characterised by medicinal science and he cured through supplication fifty thousand in one day on the condition that each person would become a believer; and I bring to life the dead by the leave of God — He repeats this to preclude any false attributions of divinity to him — he brought back to life his friend ‘Āzar the son of an old woman and the daughter of the tithe-collector all of whom lived on and produced offspring and he also brought back to life Shem son of Noah but he died again immediately. I will inform you too of what things you eat and what you treasure up store in your houses and what I have never seen and he would inform people what they had eaten and what they would eat. Surely in that mentioned is a sign for you if you are believers."
"God says And they the disbelievers among the Children of Israel schemed against Jesus by assigning someone to assassinate him; and God schemed by casting the likeness of Jesus onto the person who intended to kill him and so they killed him while Jesus was raised up into heaven; and God is the best of schemers most knowledgeable of him Jesus."
"As for the disbelievers I will chastise them with a terrible chastisement in this world through being killed taken captive and made to pay the jizya and the Hereafter in the Fire; they shall have no helpers none to protect them from it."
"But as for the believers who do righteous deeds He will pay them in full yuwaffīhim is also read nuwaffīhim ‘We will pay them in full’ their wages. God loves not the evildoers that is He will chastise them. It is reported that God exalted be He sent him Jesus a cloud which raised him up but his mother clutched to him in tears. He then said to her ‘Verily the Resurrection shall bring us together again’. This took place on the Night of Ordainment laylat al-qadr in the Holy House of Jerusalem when he was thirty three years old. His mother lived on after him for six years. The two Shaykhs Bukhārī and Muslim narrate a hadīth in which it is stated that he Jesus will descend when the Hour is nigh and will rule according to the Law of our Prophet Muhammad and that he will slay the false messiah and the swine break the cross and impose the jizya. In a hadīth recorded by Muslim he will remain for seven years; according to Abū Dāwūd al-Tayālisī he will remain for forty years and he will die and have prayers performed over him. It is possible that what is meant by the forty years is the total time he will have spent on earth before he was raised and afterwards."
"Surely the people with the best claim most worthy of Abraham are those who followed him during his time and this Prophet Muhammad (s) on account of his according with him as regards most of the rulings of his Law and those who believe from among his community they are the ones that ought to say ‘We follow his religion’ and not you; and God is the Protector of the believers their Helper and Preserver."
"When the Jews called Mu‘ādh b. Jabal Hudhayfa b. al-Yamān and ‘Ammār b. Yāsir to join their religion the following was revealed There is a party of the People of the Scripture who yearn to make you go astray; yet they cause none to stray except themselves because the sin for their leading others astray falls upon them while the believers do not heed them in this; but they are not aware of this."
"A party of the People of the Scripture the Jews say to some among them ‘Believe in what has been revealed to those who believe that is the Qur’ān at the beginning of the day and disbelieve in it at the end of it so that they the believers might then turn back from his Muhammad’s religion and that they the believers will then say these Jews are knowledgeable and they could only have turned away from it after accepting it because they know it to be false."
"And they also said And do not believe except in one who the lām of li-man ‘in one who’ is extra follows accords with your religion’. God exalted be He says Say to them O Muhammad (s) ‘True guidance is God’s guidance that is Islam everything else being error this statement is parenthetical — that an and what follows is the direct object of the verb wa-lā tu’minū ‘do not believe’ anyone should be given the like of what you have been given of the Book wisdom and of the virtues the term ahad ‘anyone’ from whom the exclusion is being made precedes that which is being excluded ‘the like of what you have been given’ the meaning being ‘Do not affirm that anyone should be given this unless they follow your religion’; or that they the believers should dispute with you that they should prevail over you before your Lord’ on the Day of Resurrection for you have the sounder religion a variant reading has a-an ‘such that’ the extra hamza denoting rebuke in other words the Jews say do not believe that another has been given the like of it such that you might affirm it. God exalted be He says Say ‘Surely bounty is in God’s Hand; He gives it to whomever He will so how can you say that no one else will be given what you have been given? God is Embracing of ample bounty Knowing those who deserve it."
"The following was revealed regarding those who apostatized and became disbelievers Whoever desires a religion other than Islam it shall not be accepted from him and in the Hereafter he shall be among the losers because he will end up in the Fire made everlasting for him."
"The following was revealed regarding the Jews Surely those who disbelieve in Jesus after they have believed in Moses and then increase in unbelief in Muhammad (s) — their repentance shall not be accepted when they are drawing their last gasps of life or when they have died as disbelievers; those are the ones who go astray."
"Say ‘O People of the Scripture why do you bar believers causing them to turn away from God’s way His religion by denying the truth of the Prophet and concealing His graces desiring to make it crooked ‘iwajan is the verbal noun meaning mu‘awwajatan ‘made crooked’ inclining away from the truth while you yourselves are witnesses while you know that the religion which is upright and pleasing to God is that of Islam as stated in your Book? God is not heedless of what you do’ in the way of unbelief and mendacity; instead He gives you respite until your appointed time and then requites you."
"And when you are going forth travelling in the land you would not be at fault if you shorten the prayer by making it two genuflexions instead of four if you fear that you may be afflicted by those who do not believe that is if you fear that you may be harmed by them this fear of affliction at the hands of the disbelievers is just intended as an explication of the reality of the situation at that time and the point no longer applies. In the Sunna it is pointed out that ‘travel’ safar means long-distance travel which is approximately 50 miles. God’s words ‘you would not be at fault’ should be understood as denoting a dispensation and not a requirement and this is the opinion of al-Shāfi‘ī; the disbelievers are a manifest foe to you their enmity being evident."
"When you O Muhammad (s) are present among them while you all fear an enemy and you stand to lead them in prayer this type of address is customary in the Qur’ān let a party of them stand with you while another party stand back and let them the party standing with you take their weapons with them. Then when they have performed their prostrations that is when they have prayed let them the other party be behind you on guard until you complete the prayers; thereupon let this party go on guard and let another party who have not prayed come and pray with you taking their precautions and their weapons with them until you have completed the prayers. The Prophet s did this once at Batn Nakhla as reported by the two Shaykhs Bukhārī and Muslim. The disbelievers wish when you have stood up to pray that you should be heedless of your weapons and your baggage that they may descend upon you all at once by making an assault against you and capturing you and herein is the reasoning behind keeping weapons on oneself. You are not at fault if rain bothers you or if you are sick to lay aside your weapons and not carry them this implies that when there is no such excuse it is compulsory to carry them and this is one of two opinions held by al-Shāfi‘ī on this matter; the other opinion is that this precaution constitutes a sunna and this is the more preferable opinion. But take your precautions against the enemy and be on your guard as best you can; God has prepared for the disbelievers a humiliating chastisement."
"When you have performed the prayer when you have completed it remember God by repeating ‘There is no god but God’ tahlīl and ‘Glory be to God’ tasbīh standing and sitting and on your sides lying down in other words in all states. Then when you are reassured when you are secure observe the prayer perform it with its proper due surely the prayer is for believers a prescription enjoined that is an obligation at specific times that is its appointed times are set and so it should not be postponed from these times."
"After they returned from Uhud the Prophet s dispatched a group to seek out Abū Sufyān and his companions but they complained about their wounds and the following was revealed Be not faint be not weak in seeking in pursuing the enemy the disbelievers in order to fight them; if you are suffering if you have pains from a wound they are also suffering as you are suffering that is just like you yet they do not shrink from fighting you; and you hope from God in the way of victory and the reward for it that for which they cannot hope and since you have this advantage over them you should be more willing for it than them. God is ever Knower of all things Wise in His actions."
"But whoever makes a breach with whoever opposes the Messenger in the truth that he brings after guidance has become clear to him after the truth has become manifest to him through miracles and follows a path other than the way of the believers that is to say other than the path they follow in religion by disbelieving We shall turn him over to what he has turned to We shall make him a leader of the misguidance which he has followed by leaving this as it is between them in this world and We shall expose him We shall admit him in the Hereafter in Hell where he will burn — an evil journey’s end an evil return it is."
"Those who alladhīna is either a substitution for or an adjectival qualification of al-munāfiqīna ‘the hypocrites’ take disbelievers for friends instead of believers because they mistakenly believe them to be strong — do they desire do they seek power with them? an interrogative of disavowal that is to say they shall not find such power with them. Truly power belongs altogether to God in this world and the Hereafter and none but His friends shall attain it."
"It has been revealed read active nazzala ‘He has revealed’ or passive nuzzila ‘It has been revealed’ to you in the Book in the Qur’ān in sūrat al-An‘ām Q. 668 that an has been softened and its subject omitted in other words read it as annahu ‘When you hear God’s signs the Qur’ān being disbelieved in and mocked do not sit with them that is the disbelievers and the mockers until they engage in some other talk for otherwise you if you were to sit with them would surely be like them’ in sinfulness. God will gather the hypocrites and disbelievers all together into Hell just as they were gathered together in this world in unbelief and mockery."
"Those who alladhīna substitutes for the previous alladhīna of verse 139 wait in watch for you hoping for misfortunes to befall you and if a victory such as a conquest or booty comes to you from God say to you ‘Were we not with you?’ in religion and in the struggle? So give us from the booty; but if the disbelievers have some luck by gaining a victory over you they say to them ‘Did we not gain mastery authority over you capable of capturing you and slaying you but we spared you and did we not defend you against the believers?’ lest they be victorious over you by forsaking them and apprising you of their plans and thus have we not done you a favour? God exalted be He says God will judge between you and them on the Day of Resurrection admitting you into Paradise and them into the Fire; and God will never grant the disbelievers a way a means to success over the believers by annihilating them."
"The hypocrites seek to trick God by manifesting the opposite of what they hide in themselves of unbelief in order to escape His rulings in this world; but He is tricking them He will requite them for their trickery and so they will be disgraced in this world through God apprising His Prophet of what they hide and punished in the Hereafter. When they stand up to pray with the believers they stand up lazily reluctantly and for their prayers to be seen by people and they do not remember pray to God save a little for ostentation."
"Wavering hesitant all the time between that unbelief and belief — not belonging to these disbelievers neither to those believers; and he whom God sends astray you will never find for him a way a path back to guidance."
"O you who believe take not the disbelievers as friends instead of the believers do you desire to give God over you by your taking them as friends a clear warrant? a manifest proof of your hypocrisy?"
"Save those who repent of hypocrisy and make amends in their deeds and hold fast to put their trust in God and make their religion purely God’s free from any pretence; those are with the believers in terms of what they shall be given; and God will certainly give the believers a great wage in the Hereafter and that is Paradise."
"Why would God chastise you if you are thankful of His favours and believe in Him? the interrogative is meant as a denial in other words He would not punish you. God is ever Thankful of the deeds of believers rewarding them Knowing of His creation."
"Those are the disbelievers truly haqqan is the verbal noun emphasising the content of what precedes it in the sentence; and We have prepared for the disbelievers a humiliating chastisement namely the chastisement of the Fire."
"And because of their taking usury when they had been forbidden it in the Torah and their consuming people’s wealth through falsehood through bribes in adjudications and We have prepared for the disbelievers among them a painful chastisement."
"But those of them who are firmly rooted established in knowledge like ‘Abd Allāh b. Salām and the believers the Emigrants and the Helpers believing in what has revealed to you and what was revealed before you of scriptures and those who observe the prayer wa’l-muqīmīna l-salāta is in the accusative because it is a laudative; it is also read in the nominative wa’l-muqīmūna l-salāta; and pay the alms and those who believe in God and the Last Day — to them We shall surely give nu’tīhim is also read yu’tīhim ‘He shall surely give’ a great wage namely Paradise."
"messengers rusulan substitutes for the previous rusulan ‘messengers’ bearing good tidings of reward for those that believe and warning of punishment for those that disbelieve; We sent them so that people might have no argument to make against God after the sending of the messengers to them and say Our Lord why did you not send a messenger to us so that we might follow Your signs and be among the believers Q. 2847; thus We sent them to pre-empt such excuses. God is ever Mighty in His kingdom Wise in His actions."
"So how shall it be the predicament of the disbelievers when We bring forward from every community a witness to testify against it regarding its deeds and this shall be its prophet; and We bring you O Muhammad (s) as witness against these?"
"Upon that day the day of bringing forward; the disbelievers those who have disobeyed the Messenger will wish that law ‘if’ means an ‘that’ the earth might be levelled with them read passive tusawwā or active tasawwā or tassawwā so that like it they might also become dust and this is because of the terror of that day as is stated in another verse The disbeliever shall say ‘O would that I were dust!’ Q. 7840. And they will not hide from God any talk of what they did although at another stage they do actually hide it and say ‘By God our Lord we never associated anything with You’ Q. 623."
"God forgives not that anything should be associated with Him. But He forgives other than save that of sins to whomever He wills forgiveness for by admitting him into Paradise without punishment. And whomever He wills of the believers He punishes for their sins and then admits them into Paradise. Whoever associates anything with God then he has indeed invented a tremendous a great sin."
"The following was revealed regarding Ka‘b b. al-Ashraf and other such scholars from among the Jews when they came to Mecca and saw those killed at Badr and began to incite the idolaters to avenge them their dead by waging war against the Prophet s Have you not seen those who were given a share of the Book how they believe in al-Jibt and al-Tāghūt two idols belonging to Quraysh and say to the disbelievers to Abū Sufyān and his companions when they the latter said to them ‘Are we who are the guardians of the House who give drink to the pilgrim offer hospitality to the guest set free the captive and do such and such … not more rightly guided than Muhammad he who has contravened the religion of his forefathers severed the ties of kinship and abandoned the Sanctuary?’ ‘These in other words you are more rightly guided upon a more upright way than the believers’?"
"What is wrong with you that you do not fight this is an interrogative of rebuke in other words there is nothing to prevent you from fighting in the way of God and for the deliverance of the oppressed men women and children whom the disbelievers persecuted and prevented from emigrating. Ibn ‘Abbās may God be pleased with him and his father said ‘My mother and I were among them’; who say supplicating ‘O our Lord bring us forth from this town Mecca whose people are evildoers through unbelief and appoint for us a protector from You to take charge of our affair and appoint for us from You a helper’ to defend us against them. God responded to their supplication and facilitated escape for some of them while others remained behind until Mecca was conquered — in charge of them the Prophet s placed ‘Attāb b. Asīd who proceeded to seek justice for the wronged from those that had wronged them."
"Those who believe fight in the way of God and those who disbelieve fight in the way of a false deity Satan. Fight therefore against the friends of Satan the supporters of his religion and you will defeat them with the strength you draw from God; surely the plotting of Satan against believers is ever feeble of no substance and cannot stand up to God’s plotting against the disbelievers."
"Have you not seen those to whom it was said ‘Restrain your hands from fighting the disbelievers when they desired it at Mecca because of the harm the disbelievers had inflicted upon them — and these were a group from among the Companions — and establish the prayer and pay the alms’? Then as soon as fighting was prescribed was made obligatory for them lo a party of them fear people the disbelievers that is they fear punishment at their hands through death as they would fear the punishment of God or with more fear than their fear of Him ashadda ‘more’ is in the accusative because it is a circumstantial qualifier; the response to the lammā ‘as soon as’ is indicated by idhā ‘lo’ and what follows in other words they are taken aback by fear and they said frightened of death ‘Our Lord why have You prescribed fighting for us? Why not lawlā is to be understood as hallā defer us to a near term?’ Say to them ‘The enjoyment of this world that which is enjoyed therein or enjoying it the world is trifling it will end up by perishing; and the Hereafter Paradise is better for him who fears God’s punishment by avoiding disobedience to Him; and you shall not be wronged lā tuzlamūna may also be read lā yuzlamūna ‘they shall not be wronged’ you shall not be diminished of your deeds a single date-thread as much as the peel on a date-stone so struggle in the way of God."
"And when there comes to them an issue news concerning the raiding parties sent by the Prophet s and what has happened to them be it of security through victory or of fear through defeat they broadcast it they make it widely-known this was revealed regarding a group from among the hypocrites or from among the feeble believers who used to do this and so the hearts of the believers would lose courage and the Prophet s would become distressed. If they had referred it the news to the Messenger and to those in authority among them that is the judicious elders among the Companions in other words if they had kept quiet about it until they were fully informed; those among them who are able to think it out those who follow it up and seek knowledge of it the ones who broadcast it would have known it and whether it is a matter that ought be broadcast or not from them from the Prophet s and those of authority. And but for the bounty of God to you through Islam and His mercy to you through the Qur’ān you would surely have followed Satan in the abominations to which he commands you except a few of you."
"So fight O Muhammad (s) in the way of God; you are charged only with yourself so do not be concerned with their failing to join you the meaning being fight even if you are on your own for you have been promised victory. And urge on the believers incite them to fight and make them desire it; maybe God will restrain the might the war of the disbelievers; God is mightier than them and more severe in castigation in punishment than them. And so the Messenger of God s said ‘By Him in Whose Hand is my soul I shall sally forth to fight even if I go alone’. Thereupon he sallied forth with seventy cavalrymen to the first battle at Badr where God restrained the might of the disbelievers by casting terror into their hearts and preventing Abū Sufyān from sallying forth as has already been mentioned in sūrat Āl ‘Imrān Q. 3151."
"The believers who sit at home away from the struggle other than those who have an injury such as a chronic illness or blindness or the like read in the nominative ghayru ūlī l-darar ‘other than those who have an injury’ as an adjectival clause; or in the accusative ghayra ūlī l-darar as an exceptive clause are not the equals of those who struggle in the way of God with their possessions and their lives. God has preferred those who struggle with their possessions and their lives over the ones who sit at home on account of some injury by a degree by a degree of merit since both have the same intention but the extra degree is given to those who have carried out the struggle; yet to each of the two groups God has promised the goodly reward Paradise and God has preferred those who struggle over the ones who sit at home without any injury with a great reward ajran ‘azīman is substituted by the following darajātin minhu"
"The following was revealed regarding a group of people who submitted to Islam but did not emigrate and were then slain in the battle of Badr alongside the disbelievers And those whom the angels take in death while they are wronging their souls having remained among the disbelievers and neglected to emigrate the angels will say to them in rebuke ‘What was your predicament?’ in other words ‘in what circumstances were you with regard to your religion’. They will say giving excuses ‘We were oppressed unable to establish religion in the land’ the land of Mecca. The angels will say to them in rebuke ‘But was not God’s earth spacious that you might have emigrated therein?’ from the land of unbelief to another land as others did? God exalted be He says as for such their abode shall be Hell — an evil journey’s end it is!"
"God has not ordained He has not stipulated in His Law anything such as a Bahīra a Sā’iba a Wasīla or a Hām in the way that people did at the time of paganism. Al-Bukhārī reported in a hadīth from Sa‘īd b. al-Musayyab who said ‘The bahīra is that camel whose milk is consecrated to idols and whom no human may milk; the sā’iba is the one they would leave to roam freely for their gods and was forbidden to bear any load; the wasīla is the young she-camel that would give birth to a young female as its first offspring followed by another female bearing one after the other without a male in between she would then be left to roam freely for their idols; the hām is the mature male camel which after completing a certain number of copulations with a female would then be consigned to their idols and be exempt from bearing any load and they would call it hāmī; but the disbelievers invent lies against God in this matter by attributing the sanctioning of such practices to Him; and most of them do not understand that this is mendacity for in this they have merely followed the example of their forefathers."
"O you who believe remember God’s favour upon you when a people namely Quraysh purposed to extend their hands against you in order to attack you but He restrained their hands from you and protected you from what they intended to do to you; and fear God; and in God let the believers put their trust."
"Mention when God said ‘O Jesus son of Mary remember My favour to you and to your mother be thankful for it; when I strengthened you with the Holy Spirit Gabriel to speak to people tukallimu’l-nāsa is a circumstantial qualifier referring to the suffixed pronoun kāf in ayyadtu-ka in the cradle that is as a child and in maturity — this implies that he will descend before the Hour since he was raised up to God before middle age as has already been mentioned in sūrat Āl ‘Imrān Q. 355 and when I taught you the Scripture and wisdom and the Torah and the Gospel; and how you create out of clay the likeness ka-hay’at the kāf here functions like a noun and is a direct object the image of a bird by My permission and you breathe into it and it becomes a bird by My permission by My will and you heal the blind and the leper by My permission and you raise the dead from their graves back to life by My permission; and how I restrained the Children of Israel from you when they intended to kill you when you brought them clear proofs miracles and the disbelievers among them said “This what you have done is nothing but manifest sorcery” a variant reading for sihrun ‘sorcery’ has sāhirun ‘sorcerer’ in other words he Jesus is nothing but a manifest sorcerer."
"Mention when the disciples said ‘O Jesus son of Mary is your Lord able that is would He a variant reading has hal tastatī‘a rabbaka ‘Are you able to ask of Him?’ to send down on us a Table from the heaven?’ He Jesus said to them ‘Fear God when you request signs if you are believers’."
"If you chastise them that is those among them who are fixed upon disbelief verily they are Your servants and You are their Master disposing of them as You will there can be no objection to what You do; and if You forgive them that is those of them who are believers You only You are the Mighty in His affair the Wise’ in His actions."
"God says ‘This namely the Day of Resurrection is the day those who were truthful in the world like Jesus shall profit by their truthfulness because this is the Day of Requital. Theirs will be Gardens underneath which rivers flow wherein they shall abide forever. God is well-pleased with them because of their obedience to Him and they are well-pleased with Him with His reward — that is the great triumph’. The sincerity of those who were liars in this world shall not avail them on that Day just as it shall not avail the disbelievers when they believe upon seeing the chastisement."
"They indeed are disbelievers those who say ‘God is the Messiah son of Mary’ insofar as they make him Jesus a god and these were the Jacobites a Christian sect. Say ‘Who then can do anything who then can defend against the chastisement of God if He desires to destroy the Messiah son of Mary and his mother and all those who are on earth?’ that is to say none can do anything of the sort since if Jesus were a god he would be able to do so. And to God belongs the kingdom of the heavens and the earth and all that is between them. He creates what He will. God has power over everything which He wills."
"There said to them two men of those who feared contravening God’s command and these were Joshua and Caleb — who were from among the leaders that Moses dispatched to bring back news of those giants — to whom God had been gracious by making them virtuous for they concealed what they had discovered about the giants telling only Moses unlike the other leaders who divulged the news and so the people became cowardly. ‘Enter against them by the gate! the gate of the town and have no fear of them for they are bodies without hearts. For if you enter by it you will be victorious the two Joshua and Caleb said this because they were certain of God’s assistance and the fulfilment of His promise. Put your trust in God if you are believers’."
"Forbidden to you is carrion that is the consumption of it and blood that is what has been spilt as mentioned in sūrat al-An‘ām Q. 6145 and the flesh of swine and what has been hallowed to other than God in that it was sacrificed in the name of something other than Him and the beast strangled to death and the beast beaten down to death and the beast fallen from a height to its death and the beast gored to death by another and what beasts of prey have devoured of such animals — except for what you have sacrificed duly catching it while it still breathes life and then sacrificing it — and what has been sacrificed in the name of idols nusub is the plural of nusāb and that you apportion that is that you demand an oath or a ruling through the divining of arrows azlām the plural of zalam or zulam which is a qidh ‘a small arrow’ without feathers or a head. There were seven of these arrows marked with flags and they were retained by the keeper of the Ka‘ba. They would use them for abitrations and when they commanded them they obeyed and if they prohibited them they would desist; that is wickedness a rebellion against obedience. And on the Day of ‘Arafa in the year of the Farewell Pilgrimage the following was revealed Today the disbelievers have despaired of your religion of you apostatising from it having hoped for it earlier for now they perceived its strength; therefore do not fear them but fear Me. Today I have perfected your religion for you that is its rulings and obligations after this verse nothing about what is lawful or unlawful was revealed and I have completed My favour upon you by perfecting it your religion but it is also said by effecting their safe entry into Mecca; and I have approved chosen Islam for you as religion. But whoever is constrained by emptiness by hunger to consume some of what has been forbidden him and consumes it not inclining purposely to sin to an act of disobedience — then God is Forgiving to him for what he has consumed Merciful to him by permitting it to him in contrast to the one who purposely inclines to sin that is the one actively engaged in it such as a waylayer or a criminal for whom such consumption is forbidden."
"Truly as for the disbelievers if they possessed definitely all that is in the earth and the like of it with it by which to ransom themselves from the chastisement of the Day of Resurrection it would not be accepted from them; theirs shall be a painful chastisement."
"But how is it that they make you their judge when they have the Torah wherein is God’s judgement of stoning the interrogative here is for provoking amazement in other words they were not seeking thereby by making you their judge to discover the truth but a lighter punishment for them; and then they turn away and then they reject your ruling of stoning which accords with what is in their Scripture after that request to you for arbitration? Such are not believers."
"Surely We revealed the Torah wherein is guidance from error and light that is an exposition of the rulings by which the prophets from the Children of Israel who had submitted who had been compliant before God judged for those of Jewry as did the rabbis the scholars among them and the priests the jurists according to because of that which they were bidden to observe that which was entrusted to them that is to say that which God bid them to observe of God’s Scripture lest they change it and were witnesses to its truth. So do not fear men O Jews in disclosing what you have pertaining to the descriptions of Muhammad (s) the ‘stoning’ verse and otherwise; but fear Me when you conceal it; and do not sell do not exchange My signs for a small price of this world which you take in return for concealing them. Whoever does not judge according to what God has revealed — such are the disbelievers in it."
"O you who believe do not take Jews and Christians as patrons affiliating with them or showing them affection; they are patrons of each other being united in disbelief. Whoever amongst you affiliates with them he is one of them counted with them. God does not guide the folk who do wrong by affiliating with disbelievers."
"And you see those in whose hearts is sickness weakness of faith the like of ‘Abd Allāh b. Ubayy the hypocrite; vying with one another for them to affiliate with them saying as an excuse for this ‘We fear lest we suffer a turn of fortune’ which time will bring round against us such as drought or defeat and that if Muhammad’s affair should come to nothing they will cease to supply us with provisions. God exalted be He says But it may be that God will bring victory by assisting His Prophet and making His religion prevail; or some commandment from Him that will reveal the secrets of the hypocrites disgracing them; and then they will end up for what they kept secret within themselves in the way of doubt and affiliating with disbelievers remorseful."
"O you who believe whoever of you apostatises read either yartadid with separation of the two dāl letters or yartadd with assimilation of one of the dāl letters with the other turns back from his religion to disbelief — this is a notification of what God knew would happen for some of them apostatised upon the death of the Prophet s — God will assuredly bring in their place a people whom He loves and who love Him the Prophet s said ‘They are people like him’ and he pointed to Abū Mūsā al-Ash‘arī as reported by al-Hākim al-Naysābūrī in his Sahīh; humble sympathetic towards believers stern severe towards disbelievers struggling in the way of God and fearing not the reproach of any reproacher therein in the way that the hypocrites fear the reproach of the disbelievers. That description mentioned is God’s bounty; He gives it to whom He will; and God is Embracing of abundant bounty Knowing of those who deserve it."
"When ‘Abd Allāh Ibn Salām said ‘O Messenger of God our people have shunned us’ the following was revealed Your patron is God only and His Messenger and the believers who establish prayer and pay the alms bowing down humble or performing voluntary prayers."
"Whoever affiliates to God and His Messenger and the believers He will help them and assist them; for verily the party of God they are the victors because of His assistance to them He has made this hizb Allāh ‘the party of God’ to fall in the place of an implied fa-innahum ‘for verily they’ as an explication since they belong to His party that is they His followers."
"O you who believe do not take as patrons those who take your religion in mockery as something to be mocked and as a game from among min is explicative those who were given the Scripture before you and from among the disbelievers read al-kuffāri or al-kuffāra the idolaters — and fear God by refraining from affiliating with them if you are believers if you are truthful in your faith."
"They indeed are disbelievers those who say ‘Indeed God is the Messiah son of Mary’ a similar verse has preceded Q. 517. For the Messiah said to them ‘O Children of Israel worship God my Lord and your Lord for I am a servant and not a god. Verily he who associates anything with God in worship for him God has made Paradise forbidden He has forbidden him admittance to it and his abode shall be the Fire; and for wrongdoers wa-mā li’l-zālimīna min the min is extra there shall be no helpers’ to guard them against the chastisement of God."
"They are indeed disbelievers those who say ‘God is the third of three’ gods that is He is one of them the other two being Jesus and his mother and they who claim this are a Christian sect; when there is no god but the One God. If they do not desist from what they say when they declare a trinity and profess His Oneness those of them who disbelieve that is those who are fixed upon unbelief shall suffer a painful chastisement namely the Fire."
"Cursed were the disbelievers of the Children of Israel by the tongue of David when he invoked God against them and they were transformed into apes — these were the people of Eilat — and by Jesus son of Mary when he invoked God against them and they were transformed into pigs — they were the ones who ate at the Table cf. Q. 5115 below — that cursing was because of their disobedience and their transgression."
"O you who believe be upright before God in fulfilling what is His due witnesses in equity in justice. Let not hatred of a people namely the disbelievers cause you not to be just and to harm them on account of their enmity; be just towards both friend and foe that justice is nearer to God-fearing. And fear God; surely God is aware of what you do and will requite you for it."
"Yet had they believed in God and the Prophet Muhammad (s) and what has been revealed to him they would not have affiliated with them namely with the disbelievers; but many of them are wicked rebellious against faith."
"You O Muhammad (s) will truly find the most hostile of people to those who believe to be the Jews and the idolaters of Mecca because of the intensity of their disbelief ignorance and utter preoccupation with following whims; and you will truly find the nearest of them in love to those who believe to be those who say ‘Verily we are Christians’; that nearness of theirs in love to the believers is because some of them are priests scholars and monks devout worshippers and because they are not disdainful of following the truth as the Jews and the Meccans are."
"And in response to those Jews who reviled them for their Islam they would say why should we not believe in God and what has come to us of the truth the Qur’ān that is to say there is nothing to prevent us from faith when its prerequisites are present; and hope natma‘u is a supplement to nu’minu ‘we believe’ that our Lord should admit us with the righteous people?’ the believers into Paradise?"
"And eat of the lawful and good food which God has provided you halālan tayyiban ‘lawful and good food’ is the direct object and the preceding genitive construction mimmā ‘of … which’ is a circumstantial qualifier connected to the former; and fear God in Whom you are believers."
"And so in the same way that We have explained what has been mentioned We dispense We elucidate the signs that they might take heed and that they the disbelievers may say at the end of this ‘You have studied with someone’ that you have consulted with dārasta the People of the Scripture or that you have studied darasta variant reading the scriptures of past peoples and brought this Qur’ān therefrom; and that We may make it clear for a people who have knowledge."
"They that is the disbelievers of Mecca have sworn by God the most earnest oaths that if there came to them a sign of what they requested they will believe in it. Say to them ‘Signs are only with God’ and He sends them down as and when He wills; I am but a warner. But what will make you realise? how would you know if they have believed if these signs did come to them? In other words you would not know this; truly when they come they will not believe because of what I already know a variant reading for lā yu’minūna ‘they will not believe’ has lā tu’minūna ‘you will not believe’ making the address to the disbelievers; another variant reading has annahā instead of innahā ‘that truly’ as meaning la‘alla ‘that perhaps’ or as governed by the preceding clause la’in jā’athum āyatun ‘if there came to them a sign’."
"And so We have appointed to every Prophet an enemy just as We have appointed these your enemies and this ‘adūwwan ‘an enemy’ is substituted by the following shayātīn ‘devils’ devils the rebels of mankind and jinn who inspire whisper fine speech to each other the falsehood that is disguised as such fine speech in delusion that is in order to delude them; yet had your Lord willed they would never have done it that mutual inspiration. So leave them let the disbelievers be with what they fabricate of disbelief and otherwise of what has been adorned for them — this was revealed before the command to fight them."
"The following was revealed when they asked the Prophet s to appoint an arbiter between him and themselves. Say Shall I seek demand other than God as a judge an arbiter between you and me when it is He Who revealed to you the Book the Qur’ān clearly explained? wherein truth is distinguished from falsehood. Those to whom We have given the Scripture the Torah the likes of ‘Abd Allāh b. Salām and his companions know that it is revealed read munzal or munazzal from your Lord in truth; so do not be of the waverers the doubters regarding it this is intended to affirm to the disbelievers that it is the truth."
"If you obey most of those on earth that is the disbelievers they will lead you astray from the way of God from His religion; they follow only supposition when they dispute with you concerning the status of carrion saying ‘What God has killed is more worthy of your consumption than what you kill yourselves!’; they are merely guessing speaking falsehood in this matter."
"And do not eat from that over which God’s Name has not been invoked where it has died or been sacrificed to other than His Name — otherwise what a Muslim sacrifices and does not invoke God’s Name over whether intentionally or forgetfully is lawful as was stated by Ibn ‘Abbās and this is the opinion of al-Shāfi‘ī — verily it the eating thereof is wickedness a contravention of what is lawful. And truly the devils inspire whisper to their friends the disbelievers to dispute with you in deeming carrion lawful; and if you obey them in this matter you are truly idolaters."
"The following was revealed regarding Abū Jahl and others Why is he who was dead through unbelief and We gave him life through guidance and appointed for him a light by which to walk among people distinguishing thereby the truth from falsehood — this light being faith — as him whose likeness ka-man mathaluhu mathal ‘likeness’ is extra; in other words read ka-man huwa ‘as him who’ is in darkness whence he cannot emerge? — and this is the disbeliever — No! So in the same way that faith has been adorned for believers what the disbelievers have been doing in the way of disbelief and acts of disobedience has been adorned for them."
"‘O assembly of jinn and mankind did not messengers come to you from among you that is from among both of your number — which holds true in the case of mankind since messengers came from among them or by ‘messengers’ if the jinn are meant those messengers among the jinn who are their warners the ones who listen to the speech of the human messengers and convey it to their kind — to recount to you My signs and to warn you of the encounter of this Day of yours?’ They shall say ‘We bear witness against ourselves’ that all this was conveyed to us. God exalted be He says And the life of this world deluded them and so they did not believe. And they bear witness against themselves that they were disbelievers."
"Say to them ‘O my people act according to your state your circumstances; truly I am acting according to my circumstances. And assuredly you will know whose man the relative particle introducing the object of the verb ‘you will know’ sequel shall be the abode that is who shall have the praiseworthy sequel in the abode of the Hereafter will it be us or yourselves? Surely the evildoers the disbelievers will not prosper’ will not find happiness."
"They the disbelievers of Mecca assign to God of the tillage the crops and the cattle which He multiplied He created a portion which they dispense to visitors and the needy and to their associates belongs a portion which they dispense to such keepers of the tillage and cattle saying ‘This is for God’ — so they assert read bi-za‘mihim or bi-zu‘mihim — ‘and this is for our associates’ and if any of the portion of these associates fell into God’s portion they used to restore it to that of their associates but when something of His portion fell into theirs they would leave it there saying ‘God is Independent and is not in need of this’ as God exalted be He says So that which is intended for their associates does not reach God and that which is intended for God does reach their associates. Evil is that provision of theirs which they decree!"
"And He it is Who has made you successors khalā’if is the plural of khalīfa in other words He has made you to succeed one another therein in the earth and has raised some of you above others in degrees through wealth and status and otherwise so that He may try you that He may test you in what He has given you in order to manifest the obedient among you and the disobedient. Surely your Lord is swift in punishment of those who disobey Him; and surely He is Forgiving to believers Merciful to them."
"It is He Who created you from clay by creating your father Adam from it; then He decreed a term for each of you at the conclusion of which you die. A term is stated fixed with Him for your resurrection; yet thereafter you O disbelievers doubt you are uncertain about the Resurrection when you know that it was He Who initiated your creation and One Who has the power to initiate creation is even more capable of bringing you back to life after death."
"And there are some of them who listen to you when you recite and We have placed veils covers upon their hearts so that they do not understand it so that they do not comprehend the Qur’ān; and in their ears a heaviness a deafness so that they do not hear it with a willingness to accept it. And if they were to see every sign they would not believe in it so that when they come to you to argue with you the disbelievers say ‘This Qur’ān is nothing but the fables the lies of the ancients’ similar to their jokes and strange tales asātīr ‘fables’ is the plural of ustūra."
"If you O Muhammad (s) could see when they are made to stand when they are exposed before the Fire and they say ‘Oh yā is for exclamation would that we might be returned to the world; then we would not deny the signs of our Lord but we would be among the believers!’ read nukadhdhibu and nakūnu as a new independent sentence; or read nukadhdhiba and nakūna as the subjunctive response to the optative clause; or read nukadhdhibu and nakūna. The response to the clause ‘if you could see’ would be ‘you would be seeing a terrible thing indeed’."
"Only those who hear in such a way so as to understand and take heed will answer your call to faith; as for the dead that is the disbelievers — they are likened to them on account of their inability to hear — God will resurrect them in the Hereafter and then to Him they will be returned and He will requite them for their deeds."
"And they the disbelievers of Mecca say ‘Why has a sign not been sent down to him from his Lord?’ a sign such as the she-camel of the prophet Sālih or the staff of Moses or the Table of Jesus. Say to them ‘Surely God has the power to send down read yunazzil or yunzil a sign from among those they have requested but most of them do not know’ that its sending down would be a trial for them for if they then still denied it they would necessarily be destroyed."
"So the last remnant of the people who did evil was cut off by having them annihilated. Praise be to God Lord of the Worlds for giving victory to the messengers and destroying the disbelievers."
"And warn threaten therewith that is with the Qur’ān those who fear they shall be gathered to their Lord apart from Him other than Him they have no protector to help them and no intercessor to intercede for them the negative sentence stands as a circumstantial qualifier referring to the subject of the verb yuhsharū ‘they shall be gathered’ and constitutes the object of what they fear — the sinning believers are meant here; so that they might be wary of God by desisting from what they engage in and performing deeds of obedience."
"Say O Muhammad (s) to the people of Mecca ‘Who delivers you from the darkness of the land and the sea from their terrors during your journeys? When you call upon Him openly and secretly saying “Verily if la-in the lām is for oaths You God deliver us anjaytanā is also read anjānā ‘if He delivers us’ from this darkness and hardship we shall truly be among the thankful”’ the believers."
"And had We revealed to you a Scripture inscribed on parchment as they requested and had they then touched it with their hands — this is more powerful than saying ‘had they seen it with their eyes’ since it touch is more effective in eliminating doubt; the disbelievers would have said in disobedience and obduracy ‘This is nothing but manifest sorcery’."
"And of their fathers and of their seed and of their brethren this clause is a supplement either to the previous kullan ‘all of them’ or to Nūhan ‘Noah’; min ‘of’ is partitive because some of them did not have offspring while others had disbelievers among their offspring; and We chose them and We guided them to a straight path."
"And He it is Who sent down water from the heaven and therewith with the water We bring forth there is a shift away from the third to the second person in this address plants of every kind that produces shoots and therefrom from the shoots We bring forth some verdure meaning ‘the greens’ in other words vegetation bringing forth from it from the verdure thick-clustered grain in dense clusters — such as the spikes of wheat and the like — and from the palm-tree wa-mina’l-nakhli is the predicate and is substituted by the following min tal‘ihā ‘from its pollen’ from its pollen — that which is the first to be produced by it — spring bunches of dates qinwānun is the subject of the sentence stalks with date clusters bunched up one near the other and We bring forth from it gardens orchards of grapes and olives and pomegranates the leaves of both of these being similar mushtabihan is a circumstantial qualifier but the fruits of which are not alike. Look O you addressed in reflection upon their fruits read thamarihi or thumurihi the plural of thamara like shajara ‘tree’ as plural of shajar and khashaba ‘a piece of wood’ for khashab when they have borne fruit when this first begins how it looks and look upon their ripening after they have reached full growth and the state to which they return. Surely in all that are signs proofs of His power exalted be He to resurrect and to do all other things for a people who believe it is these people that are specifically mentioned because they are the ones to profit from those signs by their believing in them in contrast to the disbelievers."
"Those towns which have been mentioned We relate to you O Muhammad (s) some of their tidings some of the stories of their peoples. Verily their messengers brought them clear proofs manifest miracles but they would not believe when these signscame to them in what they had denied disbelieved in before before these signs came to them; nay they persisted in disbelief. Thus does God seal up the hearts of the disbelievers."
"And verily We seized Pharaoh’s folk with the years of drought and dearth of fruits so that they might remember that they might heed the admonition and become believers."
"But whenever a good thing such as fertility and abundance befell them they said ‘This belongs to us’ that is we deserve it and they did not give thanks for it; and whenever an evil thing such as drought or hardship smote them they would augur ill of Moses and those believers with him. Surely their ill augury is with God Who brings it upon them but most of them do not know that whatever befalls them is from Him."
"And when Moses came at Our appointed time that is the time at which We had promised to speak to him and his Lord spoke with him without any intermediary with speech which he heard from all directions he said ‘My Lord! Show me Yourself that I may behold You!’ Said He ‘You shall not see Me that is to say you do not have the power to see me the use of this expression lan tarānī ‘you shall not see Me’ instead of lan urā ‘I shall not be seen’ implies that it is possible to see God exalted be He; but behold the mountain which is stronger than you are and if it remains stays fixed in its place then you shall see Me’ that is then you shall remain fixed able to see Me otherwise you will not have the capacity for it. And when his Lord revealed Himself that is when He manifested of His Light the equivalent of half a nail of a little finger as stated in one hadīth verified by al-Hākim to the mountain He levelled it to the ground read dakkan or dakkā’a meaning madkūkan and Moses fell down senseless having lost consciousness at the awesomeness of what he had seen. And when he recovered his senses he said ‘Glory be to You! in Your transcendence. I repent to You for having asked You what I was not commanded to ask and I am the first of the believers’ of my time."
"And We divided them We separated them into communities sects in the earth. Some of them are righteous and some of them people who are otherwise disbelievers and wicked individuals. And We tried them with good things with graces and evil things with misfortunes so that they might revert from their wickedness."
"And have they not reflected upon the dominion the kingdom malakūt is mulk of the heaven and of the earth and upon what things God has created min shay’in is an explication of the preceding mā ‘what’ so that they are able to infer the power of their Creator and His Oneness and upon that upon the fact that it may be that their term is already near so that they might hasten to believe lest they die as disbelievers and move towards the Fire? In what fact then after this that is the Qur’ān will they believe?"
"Say ‘I have no power to bring benefit to attract it to myself or hurt to repel it except as God wills. Had I knowledge of the Unseen — that which is hidden from me I would have acquired much good and adversity in the way of impoverishment and otherwise would not touch me since I would take precautions against such adversity by avoiding what is harmful. I am but a warner to disbelievers of the Fire and a bearer of good tidings of Paradise to a people who believe’."
"And their brothers that is the brothers of devils from among the disbelievers they the devils lead them further into error and they do not stop short do not desist from it by seeing clearly in the way that those who are God-fearing come to see clearly."
"And who — that is none — does greater evil than he who invents a lie against God by ascribing to Him a partner or a child or denies His signs? the Qur’ān. Those — their portion their lot of the Scripture of what has been inscribed as theirs in the Preserved Tablet al-lawh al-mahfūz in the way of provision term of life and other matters shall reach them until when Our messengers the angels come to them to take their souls they say to them in reprimand ‘Where is that which you were calling upon worshipping beside God?’ They will say ‘They have gone astray from us’ they are not present before us and so we cannot see them; and they will bear witness against themselves upon death that they were disbelievers."
"And between them that is between the inhabitants of Paradise and those of the Fire is a veil a barrier said to be the wall of the Heights and on the Heights which is the wall of Paradise are men whose good deeds and evil deeds are equal as is stated in the hadīth who know each of the inhabitants of Paradise and those of the Fire by their mark — glowing faces in the case of the believers and blackened ones in the case of the disbelievers for they are able to see them their position being high — and they call to the inhabitants of Paradise ‘Peace be upon you!’ God exalted be He says They that is those men of the Heights have not entered it Paradise although they aspire to enter it. Al-Hasan al-Basrī said ‘God causes them to have this aspiration only because He desires to be generous to them’. Al-Hākim reported that Hudhayfa b. al-Yamān said ‘While they are in this situation God appears to them and says “Get up and enter Paradise for I have forgiven you”.’"
"And the inhabitants of the Fire call out to the inhabitants of Paradise saying ‘Pour on us some water or some of that food which God has provided you!’ They say ‘God has forbidden He has prohibited both to the disbelievers"
"So We delivered him namely Hūd and those with him from among the believers by a mercy from Us and We cut the root of those people who denied Our signs that is We extirpated them and were not believers wa-mā kānū mu’minīna is a supplement to kadhdhabū ‘those who denied’."
"Said the ones who were proud ‘Truly we are disbelievers of that which you believe!’"
"And We sent to Midian their brother Shu‘ayb. He said ‘O my people worship God! You have no god other than Him. Verily there has come to you a clear proof a miracle from your Lord to prove my truthfulness. So give full measure and weight and do not defraud diminish the value of people’s goods and do not work corruption in the earth by way of unbelief and acts of disobedience after it has been set right through the sending of messengers thereto. That mentioned is better for you if you are believers if you are seekers of faith so hasten to it."
"‘They question you O Muhammad (s) concerning the spoils of war — the booty — to whom do they belong? Say to them ‘The spoils of war belong to God Who places them where He will and the Messenger who divides them according to God’s command. The Prophet s divided these spoils between them equally as reported by al-Hākim in his al-Mustadrak. So fear God and set things right between you that is set right the reality of that state of affairs which is between you through mutual affection and the refraining from quarrelling; and obey God and His Messenger if you are truly believers’."
"When your Lord inspired the angels with whom He reinforced the Muslims saying ‘I am with you with assistance and victorious help so make the believers stand firm by helping them and giving them good tidings. I shall cast terror fear into the hearts of the disbelievers; so smite above the necks that is the heads and smite of them every finger!’ that is smite the extremities of their hands and feet thus when one of them went to strike an disbeliever’s head it would roll off before his sword reached it. The Prophet s threw a handful of pebbles against them and every single idolater was struck in his eye and thus they were defeated."
"That chastisement is for you so taste it O disbelievers in this world; and know that for the disbelievers in the Hereafter is the chastisement of the Fire."
"O you who believe when you encounter the disbelievers inching forward that is amassed advancing slowly because of their large numbers do not turn your backs to them fleeing."
"Whoever turns his back to them on that day the day of the encounter with them unless manœuvring turning around for battle — by pretending to be in flight as a trick while actually intending to relaunch an attack — or joining another detachment a company of Muslims calling on it for assistance he has truly incurred the wrath of God and his abode will be Hell — an evil journey’s end! an evil return it is. This threat applies so long as the numbers of disbelievers do not surpass twice that of the believers."
"You did not slay them at Badr by your own might but God slew them by giving you assistance and you threw not O Muhammad (s) against the eyes of the unbelieving folk when you threw the pebbles for a handful of pebbles thrown by a human being cannot strike the eyes of every person in a large troop but God threw by making that throw reach them. He did this in order to vanquish the disbelievers and that He might try the believers with a fair test a fair gift namely booty; surely God is Hearing of their sayings Knowing of their conditions."
"That is the true gift for you and know that God weakens the plan of the disbelievers."
"If you have sought a judgement O disbelievers if you have sought a decisive conclusion of this battle — Abū Jahl had said ‘O God! Whoever among the two of us is the one who has severed the ties of kinship and brought us what we had never known destroy them today!’ — the judgement the decisive conclusion has now come to you by the fact that the one so described has already perished this was Abū Jahl and those killed with him and not the Prophet s and the believers; and if you desist from unbelief and waging war it will better for you. But if you return to fight against the Prophet s We shall return to assist him against you and your host your troops will not avail will not protect you in any way however numerous it be; and verily God is with the believers read thus inna indicating a new sentence; or read anna with an implicit lām li-anna‘Llāha ma‘a’l-mu’minīn ‘because God is with the believers’."
"The believers those whose faith is complete are only those who when God is mentioned that is when His threat of punishment is mentioned their hearts tremble fear and when His verses are recited to them they increase their faith their acceptance of the truth and who rely upon their Lord who put their trust in Him alone and not in any other."
"And remember when you were few and oppressed in the land the land of Mecca and were fearful lest men should snatch you away lest the disbelievers should seize you swiftly; how He gave you refuge in Medina and reinforced you strengthened you with His help on the day of Badr with the angels and provided you with the good things the spoils that you might be thankful for His graces."
"And remember O Muhammad (s) when the disbelievers — who had gathered to discuss your affair at the council assembly — were plotting against you to confine you to chain you up and imprison you or slay you — all of them acting as assassins of one man — or to expel you from Mecca and they were plotting against you and God was plotting against them by devising a way out for you when He revealed to you what they had devised and commanded you to leave Mecca; and God is the best of those who plot the most knowledgeable among them about it."
"God then says But God was not about to chastise them for what they requested while you were among them for when chastisement is sent down it is all-encompassing and no community was ever chastised except after its prophet and the believers had departed from it; nor was God about to chastise them while they sought forgiveness crying as they performed the circumambulations ‘Your forgiveness! Your forgiveness!’; it is also said that this last clause refers to those oppressed believers among them similar to where God says Had they been clearly separated verily We would have chastised the disbelievers among them with a painful chastisement Q. 4825."
"But what plea have they now that God should not chastise them with the sword after your departure and that of the oppressed believers — if this verse is understood in accordance with the first opinion that it refers to the idolaters asking forgiveness then it abrogates the previous one for God had chastised them at Badr and in other instances — when they bar prevent the Prophet s and the Muslims from the Sacred Mosque from performing circumambulations there though they are not its guardians? as they claim? Its only rightful guardians are the God-fearing but most of them do not know that they have no rightful custodianship over it."
"The disbelievers expend their wealth in waging war against the Prophet s in order to bar from God’s way and they will expend it until in the end it will be a source of anguish for them a regret for having lost it and lost what they had intended by expending it; then they will be defeated in this world and the disbelievers among them will be gathered driven into Hell in the Hereafter"
"Say to the disbelievers such as Abū Sufyān and his companions that if they desist from unbelief and from waging war against the Prophet s that which is past of their deeds will be forgiven them; but if they return to waging war against him the way of dealing with the ancients has already gone before! that is Our way in dealing with them by destroying them We will do the same with these ones."
"Those described in the way mentioned are the true the real believers without doubt. For them are ranks stations in Paradise with their Lord and forgiveness and generous provision in Paradise."
"And know that whatever spoils you have taken you have seized from the disbelievers by force the fifth of it is for God to have it dispensed as He will and for the Messenger and for the kinsmen the kinsmen of the Prophet s from among the Banū Hāshim and the Banū ‘Abd al-Muttalib and the orphans children of Muslims those whose fathers have passed away and are in poverty and the needy those Muslims in dire need and the traveller those Muslims cut off during travel — in other words it the fifth is due to the Prophet s and those of these four categories in the way that he used to apportion it a fifth of the fifth for each one and the remaining four fifths for those who had captured the spoils if you believe in God then be aware of that and that which wa-mā is a supplement to bi’Llāhi ‘in God’ We sent down upon Our servant Muhammad (s) in the way of angels and signs on the Day of Discrimination that is the day of the battle of Badr which discriminated between truth and falsehood the day the two armies the Muslims and the believers met. And God has power over all things including giving you victory despite your being few and their being greater in number."
"When idh substitutes for yawma ‘the day’ you were on the nearer bank the one nearer to Medina read ‘udwa or ‘idwa meaning ‘the side of a valley’ and they were on the yonder bank the one further from it and the cavalcade the caravan was in a place below you the coastal side; and had you and the enemy band agreed to meet for battle you would have surely failed to keep meeting; but He brought you together at a different time that God might conclude a matter that was to be done through His knowledge — namely the victory of Islam and the obliteration of unbelief — He did this so that he who perished might perish might be a disbeliever even after a clear proof that is after a manifest proof has been established against him namely the triumph of the believers despite their small number over the larger enemy army; and that he who survived might live might believe after a clear proof; surely God is Hearing Knowing."
"And when God made you see them O believers when you met — in your eyes as few as 70 or 100 when they were in fact 1000 so that you would advance against them; and He made you seem as few in their eyes so that they would advance and not turn back from fighting you — this was before close combat had begun but when it began He made them the disbelievers see these believers as twice their number as stated in sūrat Āl ‘Imrān Q. 313 — so that God might conclude a matter that was to be done; and to God all things are returned reverting."
"O you who believe when you meet a host a group of disbelievers then stand firm to fight them and do not flee in retreat and remember God much call upon Him for victory that you may succeed that you may triumph."
"And mention that Satan Iblīs adorned their deeds for them by encouraging them to go to meet the Muslims when they had feared to set out on account of their enemy the Banū Bakr and said to them ‘Today no person shall overcome you for I shall be your protector’ from among the Banū Kināna — he appeared to them in the form of Surāqa b. Mālik the chieftain of that region. But when the two armies the Muslims and the disbelievers sighted each other when they met and he Satan saw the angels his hand clasping that of al-Hārith b. Hishām he turned his back he withdrew in flight saying — when they had said to him ‘Are you abandoning us in such a predicament?’ ‘I am quit of you of being your protector for I see what you do not see in the way of angels. I fear God lest He destroy me; and God is severe in retribution’."
"As your Lord brought you forth from your home with the truth bi’l-haqq is semantically connected to akhraja ‘He brought forth’ and indeed a party of the believers were averse to going forth the last sentence is a circumstantial qualifier referring to the suffixed pronoun kāf in akhrajaka ‘He brought you forth’; kamā ‘as’ is the predicate of an omitted subject in other words their aversion to this state of affairs of the booty being God’s and the Prophet’s is similar to their aversion when you were brought forth to fight which had actually been better for them likewise is this state of affairs better for them. It happened that Abū Sufyān was returning from Syria with a caravan. The Prophet s and his followers went forth to plunder it; but Quraysh became aware of this and so Abū Jahl and some Meccan fighters rode out to defend it — these constituted the ‘band’. Abū Sufyān drove the caravan via the coastal route and it managed to escape. Abū Jahl was then advised to return but he refused and marched on towards Badr. The Prophet s consulted with his followers saying to them ‘God has promised me one of the two parties’. So they agreed with him to attack the Meccan band but some of them were averse to this complaining ‘We have not come prepared for this!’ as God exalted be He says"
"And if you could only see O Muhammad (s) when the angels take read either as yatawaffā or tatawaffā the disbelievers beating yadribūna is a circumstantial qualifier their faces and their backs with hooked iron rods and they say to them ‘Taste the chastisement of burning that is the Fire the response to the clause beginning with law ‘if’ would be la-ra’ayta amran ‘azīman ‘you would truly have seen an terrible sight’."
"That chastisement of the disbelievers is because God would never change a grace that He had conferred on a people substituting it with affliction until they have changed that which is in themselves until they have exchanged the grace conferred upon them for unbelief in the way that the Meccan disbelievers exchanged their being ‘fed against hunger’ their being made ‘safe from fear’ cf. Q. 1064 and the sending of the Prophet s to them for unbelief for barring against the way of God and for fighting Muslims; and know that God is Hearing Knowing."
"Make ready for them for fighting them whatever force you can the Prophet s said that this refers to ‘archers’ as reported by Muslim and of horses tethered ribāt is a verbal noun meaning ‘restraining them for use in the way of God’ that thereby you may dismay terrify the enemy of God and your enemy namely the disbelievers of Mecca and others besides them that is other than those — namely the hypocrites or the Jews whom you know not God knows them. And whatever thing you expend in the way of God its requital shall be repaid to you in full and you will not be wronged you will not be diminished anything thereof."
"And if they desire to trick you by making a peace settlement in order to make preparations for war against you then God is sufficient for you. He it is Who strengthened you with His help and with the believers;"
"O Prophet God suffices you and the believers who follow you suffice you."
"O Prophet urge on exhort the believers to fight the disbelievers. If there be twenty of you steadfast they will overcome two hundred of them. If there be read as yakun or takun a hundred of you they will overcome a thousand of those who disbelieve for they are a people who do not understand this sentence is predicative but functions as an imperative in other words let the twenty of you fight the two hundred of them and the hundred of you the thousand of them and let them stand firm against them; but when they became numerous this was abrogated by God’s saying"
"The following was revealed when they ransomed those taken captive at Badr It is not for any Prophet to have read as an takūna lahu or an yakūna lahu prisoners until he has made slaughter in the land going all the way in fighting disbelievers. You O believers desire the transient things of this world its ephemeral gains by ransoming while God desires for you the Hereafter that is its reward through your killing them; and God is Mighty Wise this was abrogated by His words and set them free afterward either with grace or by ransom Q. 474."
"And remember when God promised you one of the two parties either the caravan or the band of Meccan fighters that it should be yours and you longed you were wishing that other than the armed one that is other than the fighting one with the weapons in other words you longed that the caravan should be yours because it had fewer men and less reinforcements than the band of Mecca fighters; but God willed that the truth be realised He willed to manifest it by His preceding words that Islam should triumph; and to cut the root of the disbelievers to the very last man by extirpating them and so He commanded you to fight against the band."
"Truly those who believed and emigrated and strove with their wealth and their lives in the way of God these being the Emigrants and those who provided refuge for the Prophet s and assisted these being the Helpers those are allies of one another in terms of mutual support and inheritance. And those who believed but did not emigrate — you have no duty to make an alliance read wilāya or walāya with them and so there is no inheriting between you and them and no share of the spoils for them until they emigrate this was abrogated by the end of this sūra; but if they ask you for assistance in the matter of religion then it is your duty to assist them against the disbelievers except against a folk between whom and you there is a covenant a pact in which case do not assist them against these others and so break your pact; and God sees what you do."
"And those who disbelieve are allies of one another in terms of mutual support and inheritance and so there is no inheriting between you and them. Unless you do this unless you ally yourselves with the believers and sever relations with the disbelievers there will be sedition in the land and great corruption with disbelief gaining power and Islam becoming weak."
"And those who believed and emigrated and strove for the way of God and those who provided refuge and assisted — those are the true believers and for them is forgiveness and a generous provision in Paradise."
"And those who believed afterwards that is after the first believers and emigrants and emigrated and strove with you — they are of you O Muhājirūn and Ansār; and those related by blood kinsmen are nearer to one another in terms of inheritance than those who share inheritance on account of their common faith and emigration mentioned in the previous verse according to the Book of God the Preserved Tablet al-lawh al-mahfūz. Truly God is Knower of all things including the wisdom regarding the rules of inheritance."
"And say to them or to people in general ‘Act as you will for God will surely see your actions and so will His Messenger and the believers and you will be returned through resurrection to the Knower of the unseen and the visible that is to God and He will tell you what you used to do’ and so requite you for it."
"And among them those who have chosen a mosque — these were twelve men from among the hypocrites — by way of harm to cause distress for those of the mosque of Qubā’ and disbelief since they built it on the orders of the monk Abū ‘Āmir as a sanctuary for him so that whoever comes from his side may stay there he had gone to the Byzantine Emperor qaysar to bring troops to fight against the Prophet s and to cause division among the believers who pray in the mosque of Qubā’ by having some of these pray in their the hypocrites’ mosque and as an outpost an observation post for those who waged war against God and His Messenger before that is before it was built — meaning the above-mentioned Abū ‘Āmir — they will swear ‘We desired nothing by building it but to do good’ by way of kindness towards the poor in times of heavy rain or extreme heat and in order to provide a place of worship for the Muslims; and God bears witness that they are truly liars in this claim of theirs. They had asked the Prophet s to perform prayers in it and so the following was revealed"
"Indeed God has purchased from the believers their lives and their possessions that they expend it in obedience of Him — for example by striving in His way — so that theirs will be the reward of Paradise they shall fight in the way of God and they shall kill and be killed this sentence is independent and constitutes an explication of the above-mentioned ‘purchase’; a variant reading has the passive verb come first sc. fa-yuqtalūna wa-yaqtulūn ‘they shall be killed and shall kill’ meaning that some of them are killed while those who remain fight on; that is a promise which is binding both wa‘dan ‘promise’ and haqqan ‘binding’ are verbal nouns and are in the accusative on account of their omitted implicit verbs upon Him in the Torah and the Gospel and the Qur’ān; and who fulfils his covenant better than God? that is no one is better in fulfilling it. Rejoice then there is a shift from the third to second person here in this bargain of yours which you have made for that bargain is the supreme triumph the one that secures the ultimate goal."
"Those who repent al-tā’ibūna is in the nominative as a laudative the subject being implicit from idolatry and hypocrisy those who worship who devote their worship sincerely to God those who give praise to Him in every state those who fast those who bow those who prostrate themselves that is those who perform prayers those who enjoin decency and forbid to indecency those who maintain God’s bounds His rulings by implementing them and give good tidings to the believers of Paradise."
"The following was revealed regarding the Prophet s asking forgiveness for his uncle Abū Tālib and some of the Companions asking forgiveness for their idolatrous parents It is not for the Prophet and those who believe to ask forgiveness for the idolaters even though they be kinsmen relatives after it has become clear to them that they are inhabitants of the Hell-fire for having died as disbelievers."
"It is not for the people of Medina and for the Bedouins who dwell around them to stay behind God’s Messenger when he sets out on a campaign and to prefer their lives to his life by guarding them against hardships which he the Prophet is content to suffer himself this statement is a prohibition expressed as a predicate; that prohibition against staying behind is because neither thirst nor toil nor hunger afflicts them in the way of God nor tread they any tread mawti’an is a verbal noun meaning wat’an that enrages the disbelievers nor gain any gain from the enemy of God be it through slaughter capture or plunder but a righteous deed is therefore recorded for them that they may be rewarded for it. Truly God does not leave the wage of the virtuous to go to waste that is the wage of those mentioned rather He rewards them."
"When the Prophet s was about to dispatch a raiding party — after they certain Muslims had been reproached for staying behind — all of them went forth and so the following was revealed It is not for the believers to go forth on a raid altogether why should not a party a group of every section of every tribe of them go forth while the others remain behind so that they those who remain behind may become learned in religion and that they may warn their folk when they return to them from the raid by teaching them some of the rulings which they have come to learn so that they may beware? of God’s punishment by adhering to His commands and prohibitions. Ibn ‘Abbās said that this verse is specifically intended for raiding parties while the previous one is specifically to prohibit any individual staying behind when the Prophet s sets out on a campaign."
"O you who believe fight those of the disbelievers who are near to you that is the nearest followed by the next nearest of them and let them find harshness in you that is severity in other words be harsh with them and know that God is with the pious helping and granting them victory."
"But as for those in whose hearts is sickness a weakness of faith it only adds abomination to their abomination that is it only adds disbelief to their disbelief since they disbelieve in it and they die while they were disbelievers."
"Do they not see that is the hypocrites in which case read a-wa-lā yarawna; or if read a-wa-lā tarawna ‘do you O believers not see’ that they are tested afflicted every year once or twice? with drought and diseases. Still they do not repent of their hypocrisy nor do they remember nor do they heed admonition."
"Verily there has come to you a messenger from among yourselves that is one of you — Muhammad (s) — for whom it is grievous hard that you should suffer that is your suffering your experiencing hardship and encountering harm is hard on him; who is full of concern for you that you should be rightly guided; to the believers full of pity profoundly compassionate merciful desiring good for them."
"Will you not a-lā ‘will not’ or ‘is not’ denotes incitement fight a people who broke violated their oaths their pacts and intended to expel the Messenger from Mecca — for they discussed this between them in their council assembly — initiating combat against you first? when they fought alongside Banū Bakr against Khuzā‘a your allies? So what is stopping you from fighting them? Are you afraid of them? God is more worthy of your fear when you fail to fight them if you are believers."
"Or am has the meaning of the initial a- hamza used to express disavowal did you suppose that you would be left in peace when God does not yet know that is through knowledge outwardly manifested those of you who have struggled sincerely and have not taken besides God and His Messenger and the believers an intimate friend? as a confidant or an ally? In other words when it has not yet become manifest who the sincere ones are — those described in the exclusive way mentioned. And God is aware of what you do."
"‘Journey freely travel in security O idolaters in the land for four months — beginning with the month of Shawwāl on the basis of what will come shortly — after which there will be no security for you and know that you cannot escape God that is you shall not elude His punishment and that God degrades the disbelievers’ humiliating them in this world by having them killed and in the Hereafter by sending them to the Fire."
"God has already helped you on many fields of battle such as Badr and against Qurayza and al-Nadīr and remember on the day of Hunayn — a valley between Mecca and Tā’if; that is remember the day on which you fought Hawāzin — this was in Shawwāl in year 8 of the Hijra when idh substitutes for yawma ‘the day’ your vast numbers were pleasing to you such that you were saying ‘We shall not be defeated today not on account of our being few’ and they numbered 12000 while the disbelievers were 4000; but it availed you nothing and the earth for all its breadth bi-mā rahubat the mā refers to the verbal noun in other words understand it as being ma‘a rahbihā ‘despite its breadth’ it was straitened for you such that you could not find a place in which you felt secure because of the severe fear that afflicted you; then you turned back retreating fleeing the Prophet s however on his white mule remained firm with only al-‘Abbās by his side while Abū Sufyān was charging on his mount."
"Then God sent down His Spirit of Peace His reassurance upon His Messenger and upon the believers and so they turned back towards the Prophet s after al-‘Abbās called them with his the Prophet’s permission and they fought once again; and He sent down legions of angels you did not see and chastised the disbelievers with slaughter and capture and that is the requital of the disbelievers."
"They desire to extinguish God’s light His Law and His proofs with their tongues with what they say about Him; and God refuses but to perfect to make manifest His light even though the disbelievers be averse to this."
"He it is Who has sent His Messenger Muhammad (s) with the guidance and the religion of truth that He may manifest it make it prevail over every religion all the religions which oppose it even though the disbelievers be averse to this."
"Excepting those of the idolaters with whom you have made a pact and who have not diminished their commitment to you in anyway with regard to the terms of the pact nor supported assisted anyone from among the disbelievers against you; as for these fulfil your pact with them until the completion of the term to which you have agreed. Truly God loves those who fear Him by fulfilling pacts."
"If you do not help him that is the Prophet s know that God has already helped him when the disbelievers drove him forth from Mecca that is they made him resort to leaving when they desired to kill him or imprison him or banish him at the council assembly — the second of two thāniya ithnayn this is a circumstantial qualifier that is one of two the other being Abū Bakr in other words just as God helped him in such a situation He will not forsake him in another; when idh substitutes for the previous idh the two were in the cave — a breach in the mountain called Thawr — when idh substituting again he said to his companion Abū Bakr — who upon perceiving the sound of the feet of the idolaters nearby had said to him ‘If one of them should merely look below his feet he will definitely see us!’ — ‘Do not despair; verily God is with us’ assisting us. Then God sent down His Spirit of Peace upon him His reassurance — some say this means upon the Prophet others that it means upon Abū Bakr — and supported him that is the Prophet s with legions of angels you did not see both in the cave and in the locations in which he fought battles; and He made the word of those who disbelieved that is the call to idolatry the nethermost the one vanquished and the Word of God that is the profession of His Oneness shahāda was the uppermost the one prevailing and triumphant. And God is Mighty in His Kingdom Wise in His actions."
"Had they gone forth among you they would only have caused you more trouble more corruption by abandoning the believers and would have hurried to and fro among you that is they would have hastened to spread slander among you seeking desiring to stir up sedition by casting enmity between you; and among you there are some who would listen to them to what they say listening in readiness to accept it; and God knows the evildoers."
"And there are some of them who say ‘Grant me leave to stay behind and do not lead me into temptation’ this was al-Jadd b. Qays to whom the Prophet s said ‘Will you do battle against the Byzantines?’ and to which he replied ‘I am infatuated with women and I fear that if I were to see these Byzantine women I shall not be able to stay away from them and be led into temptation’. God exalted be He says Surely they have already fallen into temptation! by staying behind a variant reading for saqatū ‘they have fallen’ has the singular form saqat ‘he has fallen’. And surely Hell shall encompass the disbelievers for whom there shall be no escape therefrom."
"Say to them ‘Nothing shall afflict us but that which God has decreed for us that we be afflicted thereby; He is our Protector our Helper and the One in charge of our affairs; in God let the believers put their trust’."
"So do not let their wealth or their children please you that is do not deem fair Our graces to them for this is a way of drawing them on by degrees to punish them God only desires thereby to chastise them in the life of this world by way of the hardship that they encounter in amassing such wealth and children and the calamities they suffer as a result thereof; and that their souls should depart while they are disbelievers so He punishes them in the Hereafter with the worst punishment."
"And they swear by God that they truly are of you that is that they are believers; but they are not of you; they are a folk who are afraid that you should deal with them as you have done with the idolaters and so they swear merely in pretence in order to protect themselves."
"And of them the hypocrites are those who injure the Prophet by casting aspersions on him and communicating to others what he says in confidence saying when they are forbidden from doing this lest it should reach him ‘He is only a listener!’ that is he listens to anything that is said and accepts it so that when we swear to him that we have not communicated to others a particular thing he believes us. Say he is ‘A listener who listens to good for you and not one who listens to evil one who believes in God and has faith he trusts in the believers in what they inform him and not in others the lām of li’l-mu’minīna ‘in the believers’ has been added to distinguish between belief in the sense of ‘submitting to God’ islām and in other senses such as ‘trusting’ and who is a mercy read rahmatun in the nominative as a supplement to udhunun ‘a listener’ or rahmatin in the genitive as a supplement to khayrin ‘to good’ to those of you who believe. Those who injure God’s Messenger for them there is a painful chastisement’."
"They swear by God to you O believers that what has reached you of the Messenger being injured they did not do so that they might please you but God and His Messenger are more deserving that they should please them through obedience if they are true believers the merging of the pronouns into one in yurdūhu ‘their pleasing them’ is because the ‘pleasure’ of both God and His Messenger are mutually dependent; either that or it is because the predicate of Allāhu wa-rasūluhu ‘God and His Messenger’ has been omitted."
"The hypocrites are cautious they fear lest a sūra should be revealed to them that is to the believers informing them of what is in their the hypocrites’ hearts of hypocrisy and yet despite this they persist in mockery. Say ‘Keep mocking! this is an imperative of threat God will bring out He will make manifest that hypocrisy of yours of which you are fearful’ lest it be brought out."
"God has promised the hypocrites both men and women and the disbelievers the fire of Hell to abide therein it will suffice them as a requital and a punishment. And God has cursed them He has removed them from His mercy and theirs will be a lasting perpetual chastisement."
"And the believers both men and women are allies of one another; they enjoin decency and forbid indecency; they observe prayer and pay the alms and they obey God and His Messenger. Those God will have mercy on them. Truly God is Mighty nothing can prevent Him from fulfilling His promise and His threat; Wise He puts everything in its proper place."
"God has promised the believers both men and women Gardens underneath which rivers flow to abide therein and blessed dwellings in the Gardens of Eden for residence and beatitude from God is greater is superior to all of that. That is the supreme triumph."
"O Prophet struggle against the disbelievers with the sword and the hypocrites with words and definitive arguments and be harsh with them through rebuke and aversion towards them; for their abode will be Hell an evil journey’s end an evil resort it is!"
"When the verse concerning ‘voluntary alms’ Q. 975 was revealed a man came and gave a large amount as voluntary alms so the hypocrites said ‘He is merely showing off!’ Another man then came and gave a moderate measure of food and so they said ‘God has no need of this man’s charity!’ The following was then revealed Those who alladhīna is the subject find fault with defame the believers who offer alms voluntarily performing supererogation and such as find nothing to offer but their endeavours nothing but what they are capable of and offer it; and deride them and the predicate of the mentioned subject is the following — God Himself derides them He has requited them for their derision and theirs will be a painful chastisement."
"And let not their wealth and their children please you; God desires only to chastise them thereby in this world and that their souls should depart while they are disbelievers."
"Say to the disbelievers of Mecca ‘Behold what is in the heavens and in the earth!’ of signs indicating God’s Oneness exalted be He. But signs and warners nudhur is the plural of nadhīr that is messengers do not avail a folk who will not believe according to God’s knowledge in other words these signs and warners will not benefit them."
"Then We shall deliver nunajjī the imperfect tense is being used to narrate a past situation Our messengers and the believers from the chastisement. In like manner to that deliverance it is incumbent upon Us to deliver the believers the Prophet s and his Companions when the time comes for chastising the idolaters."
"Say ‘O people that is O people of Mecca if you are in doubt of my religion and whether it is true then know that I do not worship those whom you worship besides God that is worshipping other than Him — namely idols — for you have doubts concerning God; but I worship God Who will take you to Him Who will seize your souls and I have been commanded to be of the believers."
"Mankind was but one community following one religion that is submission to the One God from the time of Adam to the time of Noah; but it is also said that this was the case from the time of Abraham to that of ‘Amr b. Luhayy; then they differed some of them remaining firmly upon belief in One God while others disbelieved. And had it not been for a word that had already preceded from your Lord to the effect that requital would be deferred until the Day of Resurrection it would have been decided between them that is between mankind in this life regarding that over which they differed in religion by the disbelievers being punished."
"Is it for the people the people of Mecca this interrogative is meant as a disavowal; the preposition li- ‘for’ and its dependent genitive noun al-nās ‘the people’ constitute a circumstantial qualifier of His saying a wonder ‘ajaban read in the accusative as a predicate of kāna; or if read in the nominative ‘ajabun as its subject its predicate which is also its subject if read according to the former accusative reading is the following an awhaynā that We have inspired a man from among them Muhammad (s) saying an ‘that’ is explicative ‘Warn threaten the people the disbelievers with chastisement and give good tidings to those who believe that they have a prior a preceding promise of truth with their Lord’? that is a preceding fair reward in return for the deeds they have sent forward. The disbelievers say ‘Truly this Qur’ān that comprises all of that mentioned is manifest sorcery’ a variant reading for la-sihrun has la-sāhirun ‘a sorcerer’ where it is the Prophet s to whom they are referring as being ‘a manifest sorcerer’."
"And when We made people that is the disbelievers of Mecca taste of mercy of rain and fertility after adversity misery and drought that had afflicted them behold! they have some plot concerning Our signs in the way of mockery and denial. Say to them ‘God is swifter at plotting at requiting; surely Our guardian messengers are writing down that which you are plotting’ tamkurūn is also read yamkurūn ‘they are plotting’."
"And mention the day on which We shall gather them that is creation all together then We shall say to those who associated others with God ‘In your place! makānakum is in the accusative because ilzamū ‘adhere to’ is implied sc. ilzamū makānakum. You antum this emphasises the second person plural subject concealed in the implied verb ilzamū and allows for the supplement that follows and your associates!’ that is the idols. Then We shall make a separation We shall distinguish between them and the believers as is stated in the verse wa’mtāzū’l-yawma ayyuhā’l-mujrimūn ‘Now be separate you sinners upon this day!’ Q. 3659; and their associates will say to them ‘It was not us that you were worshipping mā of mā-kuntum ‘you were not …’ is for negation; the direct object iyyānā ‘us’ precedes the verb in order to accord with the end-rhyme of the Qur’ānic verse;"
"And of them are some who listen to you when you recite the Qur’ān. But will you make the deaf to hear — He likens them the Meccan disbelievers to these the deaf because they are not able to benefit from what is recited to them — even though with their deafness they do not understand? even though they do not reflect?"
"And of them are some who look toward you. But will you guide the blind even though they do not see? — He likens them the Meccan disbelievers to these the blind because they fail to be guided nay they are much worse since God says It is not the eyes that are blind but blind are the hearts within the breasts Q. 2246."
"And for every community of the communities of this world there is a messenger. And when their messenger comes to them and they deny him judgement is passed between them justly fairly such that they are punished and the messenger and all those who accepted his truthfulness are delivered; and they are not wronged by being punished for no crime similarly We shall deal with these disbelievers of your community."
"And recite O Muhammad (s) to them that is to the Meccan disbelievers the story the tale of Noah Nūhin is substituted by the following idh qāla when he said to his people ‘O my people if my sojourn my stay among you is too great to bear is a hardship for you as is my reminding you my admonishing you by the signs of God in God have I put my trust; so decide upon your course of action resolve upon what you will do to me together with your associates wa-shurakā’akum the wāw wa- means here ‘with’ then let not your decision be a secret between you concealed nay manifest it and proclaim it to me; then implement it against me carry out what you desire and do not put it off do not give me respite for I am not concerned by you."
"And We inspired Moses and his brother saying ‘Appoint houses for your people in Egypt and make your houses oratories places in which to perform prayers so that you might be secure from fear — for Pharaoh had prohibited them from performing prayers — and establish fulfil worship; and give good tidings to the believers’ of victory and Paradise."
"And if your Lord willed all who are in the earth would have believed together. Would you then compel people to do what God did not will that they do until they are believers? No!"
"And We did not wrong them destroying them for not having committed any sins but they wronged themselves through idolatry. Their gods did not avail defend them in any way min shay’in min is extra those gods upon whom they called whom they worshipped besides God that is other than Him when the command of your Lord His chastisement came; and they their gods — through their the disbelievers’ worship of these gods did not increase them in anything but ruin but loss."
"Yet your Lord would never destroy the towns through injustice on His part against them while their inhabitants were righteous that is believers."
"And all that kullān is in the accusative because it is the direct object of naqussu ‘We relate’; and the nunation compensates for a missing genitive annexation that is all that is necessary We relate to you of the accounts of the messengers that mā substitutes for kullan ‘all that’ with which We might strengthen reassure your heart. And in these accounts or verses there has come to you the Truth and an admonition and a reminder to the believers they are specifically mentioned here because they are the ones to benefit from them through their belief in them in contrast to the case with the disbelievers."
"Is he who relies on a clear proof a clear statement from his Lord meaning the Prophet s or the believers; it the proof being the Qur’ān a clear proof which is followed by a witness to it of its veracity as being from Him that is from God; he the witness being Gabriel and before it before the Qur’ān was the Book of Moses the Torah also a witness to it as an example and a mercy? imāman wa-rahmatan is a circumstantial qualifier is such a person like one who is not so? No! Those that is the ones who rely on a clear proof they believe in it that is in the Qur’ān and so for them will be Paradise; but he who disbelieves in it of the partisans namely all the disbelievers the Fire shall be his appointed place. So do not be in doubt in uncertainty concerning it concerning the Qur’ān. Truly it is the Truth from your Lord but most of mankind that is the people of Mecca do not believe."
"And who that is none does greater wrong than he who invents a lie concerning God? by ascribing to Him partner and child. Those they shall be brought before their Lord on the Day of Resurrection amid the rest of creation and the witnesses ashhād is the plural of shāhid namely the angels who will bear witness that the messengers conveyed the Message and that the disbelievers denied them will say ‘These are they who lied concerning their Lord’. Surely the curse of God is upon the wrong-doers the idolaters;"
"they who bar people from God’s way from the religion of Islam desiring to have it seeking that the way be crooked; and in the Hereafter they hum ‘they’ is reiterated for emphasis are disbelievers."
"The likeness the description of the two parties the disbelievers and the believers is as the blind and the deaf this being the likeness of the disbeliever and the one who sees and the one who hears this being the likeness of the believer are they equal in likeness? No! Will you not then remember? tadhakkarūn the original tā’ of tatadhakkarūn has been assimilated with the dhāl will you not then be admonished?"
"The council the respected elders of his people who disbelieved said ‘We see you but a mortal like us and you have no merit over us and we see not that any follow you save the vilest among us the riffraff among us such as the weavers and the shoemakers through rash opinion bādiya’l-ra’ya read with hamza or without in both cases in other words impulsively without thinking you over it bādiya’l-ra’ya is in the accusative because it is an adverbial clause that is to say at the time that their opinion first came into being. We do not see that you have any merit over us for which you would deserve our following you; nay we deem you liars’ with regard to your claim to be bringing a Message they the disbelievers included his folk with him in their address to him."
"God exalted be He says Or do they the disbelievers of Mecca say ‘He has invented it’? Muhammad (s) has invented the Qur’ān? Say ‘If I have invented it then my crime will be upon me my sin will be upon me that is the punishment for it; and I am innocent of what you commit’ of crime when you attribute invention to me."
"And it was revealed to Noah that ‘None of your people will believe except he who has already believed. Do not be distressed grieved because of what they do in the way of idolatry. So he Noah invoked God against them with the words My Lord leave not one of the disbelievers upon the earth Q. 7126. God responded to this invocation of his and said"
"And it sailed with them amid waves like mountains in terms of their height and size and Noah called out to his son Canaan who was standing away from the ship ‘O my son embark with us and do not be with the disbelievers!’"
"He God exalted be He said ‘O Noah lo! he is not of your family of those who will be saved or of the followers of your religion; lo! it that is your asking me to save him is not a righteous deed for he is a disbeliever and there is no deliverance for disbelievers ‘āmalun ghayru sālihin ‘it is not a righteous deed’ a variant reading has ‘āmila the verb with ghayra in the accusative in which case the person governing the verb ‘amila is his son. So do not ask of Me read either fa-lā tas’alanni or fa-lā tas’alni that whereof you have no knowledge in respect to saving your son. I admonish you lest you be among the ignorant’ when you ask about what you do not know."
"It was said ‘O Noah go down disembark from the ship in peace in safety or with a greeting from Us and blessings good things upon you and upon some communities that will spring from those with you in the ship that is from their children and their seed those who are and those who will be the believers. And there will be other communities read umamun to spring from those with you to whom We shall give enjoyment in this world and then a painful chastisement will befall them’ in the Hereafter and these will be the disbelievers."
"They said ‘O Hūd you have not brought us any clear proof any evidence for what you say and we are not going to forsake our gods on the basis of your saying that is because of what you say and we are not believers in you."
"Assuredly Abraham was forbearing long-suffering imploring penitent always returning to God in repentance thus he said to them ‘Would you destroy a town in which there are 300 believers?’ They said ‘No’. He said ‘Would you destroy a town in which there are 200 believers?’ They said ‘No’. He said ‘Would you destroy a town in which there are 40 believers?’ They said ‘No’. He said ‘Would you destroy a town in which there are 14 believers?’ They said ‘No’. He said ‘What if there were one believer in it?’ They said ‘No’. He said ‘Lot is in it’. They said ‘We know full well who is in it’ … to the end of the narrative."
"The remainder which is from God that provision of His which remains for you after you have given full measure and weight is better for you than fraud if you are believers; and I am not a guardian over you’ a watcher that I should requite you for your deeds I was sent only as a warner."
"And ask forgiveness of your Lord then repent to Him. Truly my Lord is Merciful to believers Affectionate’ loving towards them."
"And he of Egypt who purchased him Potifar the Court Officer Qitfīr al-‘azīz said to his wife Zulaikha Zulaykhā ‘Give him an honourable place an honourable residence with us. Maybe he will be useful to us or we may adopt him as a son’ — for he was chaste. Thus just as We delivered him from being killed and from the well and softened the Court Officer’s heart for him We established Joseph in the land the land of Egypt until he attained what status he attained that We might teach him the interpretation of events the interpretation of visions wa-li-nu‘allimahu min ta’wīli’l-ahādīth is a supplement to an implied missing part connected to makkannā ‘We established’ in other words an implied li-numallikahu ‘so that We might give him kingship’; or else the wāw of wa-li-nu‘allimahu ‘that We might teach him’ is to be understood as being extra. God’s way always prevails exalted be He nothing being beyond Him but most people — and they are the disbelievers — do not know this."
"He said to them both in order to inform them that he knew how to interpret dreams ‘The food with which you are provided shall not come to you while you are asleep but I shall tell you the interpretation thereof while you are conscious before it the interpretation thereof comes to you. This is from that which my Lord has taught me — herein is an incitement for them to believe which he reinforces with the following words Lo! I have forsaken the creed the religion of a folk who do not believe in God and who moreover hum ‘they’ is repeated for emphasis are disbelievers in the Hereafter."
"And I follow the creed of my fathers Abraham and Isaac and Jacob. It never was right for us to associate anything min shay’in min is extra with God — on account of our God-given immunity from error. That affirmation of God’s Oneness is from God’s bounty to us and to mankind; but most people — and these are the disbelievers — do not give thanks to God and so they associate others with Him."
"You do not worship apart from Him that is other than Him anything but mere names that you have named that you have named for idols you and your fathers. God has not revealed any warrant any definitive argument or proof regarding them regarding worship of them. Judgement decree belongs only to God alone. He has commanded that you worship none but Him. That affirmation of God’s Oneness is the upright the straight religion but most people — and these are the disbelievers — do not know the punishment in which they shall end up and so they ascribe partners to God."
"God exalted be He says And when they entered in the manner which their father had bidden them that is separately it did not avail them anything min shay’in min is extra against God that is against His decree; it was but a need in Jacob’s soul which he thus satisfied and this need was his desire to fend off the evil eye from them out of affection for them. And verily he was possessed of knowledge because We had taught him; but most of mankind — and they are the disbelievers — do not know about God’s inspiring His elect."
"And the thunder — this is an angel who is in charge of the clouds driving them while he constantly proclaims His praise that is he says ‘Glory be to God through His praise’ subhāna’Llāh wa-bi-hamdihi and so too the angels proclaim His praise in awe of Him that is of God. He unleashes the thunderbolts — these are a fire which issues forth from the clouds — and smites with them whom He will such that it burns that person this was revealed regarding a man to whom the Prophet s had sent someone to invite to Islam and who said ‘Who is the Messenger of God? And what is God? Is He made of gold or of silver or of copper?’ whereupon a thunderbolt came down on him and blew off the top of his head; yet they that is the disbelievers dispute argue with the Prophet s about God though He is great in might in power or in the severity of His retribution."
"His exalted be He is the call of truth that is the words that constitute it the truth and these are ‘there is no god but God’ lā ilāha illā’Llāh; and those upon whom they call read yad‘ūn or tad‘ūn ‘you call’ those whom they worship apart from Him that is other than Him — namely the idols — do not answer them anything of which they ask; save as is the response to one who stretches forth his hands towards water at the edge of a well calling to it that it may reach his mouth by its rising through the well to reach him but it would never reach it that is reach his mouth ever likewise they the idols will not answer them; and the call of the disbelievers their worship of idols — or their actual supplication — goes only astray it is only in perdition."
"And to God prostrate whoever is in the heavens and the earth willingly such as believers or unwillingly such as hypocrites and those coerced by the sword and their shadows also prostrate in the mornings and the evenings."
"For those who respond to their Lord those who answer Him by way of obedience there shall be the goodly reward Paradise and those who do not respond to Him namely the disbelievers — if they possessed all that is in the earth and therewith the like of it they would offer it to redeem themselves therewith against the chastisement. For such there shall be an awful reckoning and that is that they will be requited for every single thing they did none of which will be forgiven and their abode shall be Hell an evil resting place it is!"
"those who believe and whose hearts are reassured find rest by God’s remembrance that is by His promise of reward. Verily by God’s remembrance are hearts reassured that is the hearts of the believers;"
"The following was revealed when they said to him ‘If you are truly a prophet then make these mountains of Mecca drift away before us and make for us rivers and springs in it that we may plant and sow seeds and resurrect for us our dead fathers to speak to us and tell us that you are a prophet’ Even if it were a Qur’ān whereby the mountains were set in motion moved from their places or the earth were cleft torn or the dead were spoken to such that they would respond they still would not believe. Nay but the affair belongs entirely to God and none other so that none believes except he whom He wills that he believes and no other; even if they were given what they request of signs. The following was revealed when the Companions were keen that what was requested of signs should be manifested hoping that they the ones requesting them might believe Have they not realised those who believe that an is softened in other words understand it as annahu had God willed He could have guided all mankind? to faith without the need for any sign? And the disbelievers from among the people of Mecca continue to be struck by devastation a catastrophe that devastates them through all manner of hardship such as being killed taken captive and suffering war or drought because of what they wrought because of their actions that is their disbelief; or you alight O Muhammad (s) together with your army near their home — Mecca — until God’s promise of victory against them comes to pass; truly God does not break His promise and indeed he alighted at Hudaybiyya until the conquest of Mecca took place;"
"The likeness the description of Paradise which has been promised to the God-fearing this is a subject the predicate of which has been omitted in other words according to what We recount to you is as follows beneath it rivers flow its food what is consumed in it is everlasting never perishing and its shade is everlasting never replaced by any sun because it does not exist therein. That namely Paradise is the reward the sequel of those who were wary of idolatry and the requital of the disbelievers is the Fire!"
"And so just like that manner of revelation We have revealed it that is the Qur’ān as a decisive judgement in Arabic in the language of the Arabs for you to judge thereby between people. And if you should follow their whims that is those of the disbelievers in that to which they summon you of their creed hypothetically speaking after what has come to you of knowledge of God’s Oneness you shall have no protector to assist you against God mina’Llāhi min the second min is extra and no defender to ward off His chastisement."
"And indeed those that were before them of communities plotted against their prophets just as they plot against you; but to God belongs all plotting. And nor is their plotting like the plotting of God for exalted be He He knows what every soul earns and so its requital is prepared for it and this is the ultimate plotting since He brings it to them whence they are not aware. The disbeliever the genus is meant here; a variant reading has kuffār ‘the disbelievers’ shall assuredly know for whom shall be the sequel of the heavenly Abode that is the praiseworthy sequel in the abode of the Hereafter will it be theirs or that of the Prophet s and his Companions?"
"And those who disbelieve say to you ‘You have not been sent by God!’ Say to them ‘God suffices as a witness between me and you to my truthfulness as a messenger and he who possesses knowledge of the Book’ from among the Christian and Jewish believers."
"And if you wonder O Muhammad (s) at the disbelievers denying you then surely wondrous surely deserving wonder is their saying in denial of resurrection ‘When we have become dust shall we indeed then be raised in a new creation?’ it is wondrous because the One Who has the power to originate creation and to originate what has been mentioned above without any precedent has also the power to restore them to life both hamzas in both instances a-idhā and a-innā are pronounced; or one may pronounce the first and not pronounce the second but in both cases inserting an alif or not inserting it; one variant reading has the first a-idhā as the interrogative and the second one a-innā as the predicate while another variant reading has the exact opposite. Those are the ones who disbelieve in their Lord; those — fetters shall be around their necks; and those they shall be the inhabitants of the Fire abiding therein."
"The following was revealed regarding their hastening on out of mockery of the chastisement And they would have you hasten on the evil the chastisement rather than the good rather than mercy when there have indeed occurred before them exemplary punishments mathulāt is the plural of mathula similar in pattern to samura pl. samurāt ‘acacia’ that is to say the punishments of disbelievers like them will they not take warning from these? Truly your Lord is forgiving to mankind despite their evil-doing for otherwise He would not have left a single creature on the face of it the earth; and truly your Lord is severe in retribution against those who disobey Him."
"And those who disbelieve say ‘Why has not some sign been sent down upon him upon Muhammad (s) from his Lord!’ the like of the staff and the glowing hand or the she-camel. God exalted be He says You are only a warner one to threaten the disbelievers for it is not your duty to bring forth signs; and for every folk there is a guide a prophet to guide them to their Lord with the signs that He gives him and not what with they request."
"Their messengers said to them ‘We are but mortals like you as you have said; but God is gracious to whomever He will of His servants by way of assigning prophethood. And it is not ours to bring you any warrant save by the leave of God by His command for we are servants enthralled; and in God let believers put their trust let them have confidence in Him."
"And those who disbelieved said to their messengers ‘We will assuredly expel you from our land or you will surely return you will surely end up returning to our creed’ our religion. Then their Lord inspired them saying ‘We shall surely destroy the evildoers the disbelievers"
"The likeness the description of those who disbelieve in their Lord alladhīna kafarū bi-rabbihim the subject substituted by the following a‘māluhum their works the righteous ones such as kindness to kin or an act of charity — in the way that no benefit can be derived from them it is because these works — are as ashes over which the wind blows hard on a tempestuous day one in which the winds blow violently making them as scattered dust over which none can have power the genitive clause beginning with ka-ramādin ‘as ashes’ constitutes the predicate of the above-mentioned subject; they that is the disbelievers have no power over anything that they have earned anything that they had done in their life on earth in other words they shall find no reward for it since this was never a precondition. That is extreme error extreme perdition!"
"God Allāhi read in the genitive as a substitution or an explicative supplement with what follows being an adjectival qualification; or read as Allāhu in the nominative as a subject the predicate of which is what follows to Whom belongs all that is in the heavens and all that is in the earth as possessions creatures and servants. And woe to the disbelievers from a terrible chastisement"
"And Satan Iblīs says when the issue has been decided and the people of Paradise are in Paradise and those of the Fire are in the Fire and they the people of the Fire have gathered round him ‘Truly God promised you a promise of truth regarding resurrection and requital fulfilling it to you; whereas I promised you that this would not be then failed you for over you I had no warrant min sultān min is extra no power or capacity to compel you to follow me except that I called you and you responded to me. So do not blame me but blame yourselves for having responded to me. I cannot heed your distress call I cannot bring aid to you nor can you heed mine read bi-musrikhiyya or bi-musrikhī. Lo! I disbelieved in your making me an associate of God formerly’ during life on earth. God exalted be He says Truly for the evildoers the disbelievers there shall be a painful chastisement."
"God confirms those who believe by a firm saying namely the profession of His Oneness in the life of this world and in the Hereafter that is in the grave when the two angels question them about their Lord their religion and their Prophet and they respond correctly as reported in the hadīth of the two Shaykhs al-Bukhārī and Muslim; and God sends astray the evildoers the disbelievers and therefore they are not guided to the correct response saying instead ‘We do not know’ as reported in the hadīth; and God does what He will."
"Have you not seen observed those who exchanged God’s grace that is the thanks due for it for unthankfulness — these were the disbelievers of Quraysh — and who by leading them astray caused their people to take up residence in the Abode of Ruin?"
"My Lord make me an establisher of prayer and make of my seed those who will establish it the use of partitive min in min dhurriyatī ‘of my seed’ is because God informed him that some of them his seed would be disbelievers. Our Lord! And accept my supplication the supplication mentioned."
"Our Lord forgive me and my parents — this was before their enmity towards God Mighty and Majestic became clear; but it is also said that his mother submitted to God the alternative reading here being the singular wālidī ‘my father’; or yet another variant reading being waladī ‘my son’ and forgive believers on the day when the reckoning shall come to pass’ the day it shall be effected. God exalted be He says"
"And do not suppose that God is heedless of what the evildoers the disbelievers from among the people of Mecca do. He but gives them respite without chastisement until a day when eyes shall stare wide-open because of the terror of what they see one says shakhasa basaru fulān to mean ‘he opened them his eyes and did not shut them’;"
"And warn make them have fear O Muhammad (s) mankind the disbelievers of the day when chastisement will come upon them namely the Day of Resurrection and those who did evil who disbelieved will say ‘Our Lord give us respite by returning us to the world for a brief while that we might respond to Your call by affirming Your Oneness and follow the messengers’. It is then said to them in rebuke ‘But did you not use to swear formerly in the world that for you there would be no passing away? min zawālin min is extra from this world to the Hereafter?"
"And you shall see O Muhammad (s) the sinners the disbelievers on that day coupled chained together with their individual devils in chains manacles or collars"
"Thus We cause it to find its way in other words in the same way that We have caused denial to enter the hearts of those individuals We cause it to enter into the hearts of the sinners that is the disbelievers of Mecca."
"Leave them the disbelievers O Muhammad (s) to eat and to enjoy this world of theirs and that they be diverted distracted by hope of a long life and other such matters that keep them away from faith for they will come to know the sequel of their affair — this was revealed before the command to fight them."
"except those servants of Yours who are sincerely devoted to You’ namely believers."
"in other words truly over My servants that is believers you shall have no warrant no power except those who follow you from among the perverse the disbelievers."
"Tell inform O Muhammad (s) My servants that verily I am the Forgiving of believers the Merciful to them"
"He said ‘And who — in other words no one — despairs read yaqnitu or yaqnatu of the mercy of his Lord save those who are astray?’ save disbelievers."
"And they that is the disbelievers of Mecca say to the Prophet s ‘O you to whom the Remembrance the Qur’ān — as you claim — has been revealed lo! you are indeed possessed!"
"There is indeed a sign a lesson in that for believers."
"God exalted be He says The angels do not descend tanazzalu one of the two tā’ letters of tatanazzalu has been omitted save with the truth with the chastisement; and then that is upon the descent of the angels with the chastisement they the disbelievers would not be reprieved would not be granted respite."
"Do not extend your glance toward that which We have given different groups of them to enjoy and do not grieve for them should they not believe and lower your wing temper your nature for the believers."
"And when We exchange a verse in place of a different verse by abrogating it and revealing another for the welfare of God’s servants — and God knows best what He reveals — they say that is the disbelievers say to the Prophet s ‘You are just a fabricator’ a liar making it up yourself. Nay most of them do not know the true nature of the Qur’ān and the benefit to God’s servants of abrogation."
"So eat O believers of the lawful and good food which God has provided you and be thankful for God’s grace if it is Him that you worship."
"So be patient and your patience is only by the help of God only by His assistance. And do not grieve for them that is for the disbelievers if they do not believe despite your eagerness that they believe nor be in distress because of that which they scheme in other words do not be concerned with their scheming for I God will make victorious over them."
"Is He then Who creates — namely God — as he who does not create namely idols so that you associate them with Him in worship? No. Will you not then remember this and so become believers?"
"He sends down the angels namely Gabriel with the Spirit with the Revelation of His command by His will to whomever He will of His servants and these are the prophets saying that an is explicative Warn threaten the disbelievers with chastisement and make them aware that there is no God save Me so fear Me fear Me."
"Then on the Day of Resurrection He will disgrace them humiliate them and He God will say to them by the tongues of the angels in rebuke ‘Where are those associates of Mine as you were wont to claim concerning whom for whose sake you used to make breaches?’ you used to opposed the believers. Those who were given knowledge from among the prophets and believers will say ‘Truly disgrace on this day as well as misfortune are for the disbelievers — they say this rejoicing at their the disbelievers’ misfortune —"
"Do they the disbelievers await anything but that the angels should come to them read feminine person ta’tīhim or masculine ya’tīhim to seize their spirits or that there should come your Lord’s command? chastisement or the resurrection that entails it. So just as these have done did those before them from among the former communities they denied their messengers and were therefore destroyed. And God did not wrong them destroying them for no sin but they used to wrong themselves through disbelief."
"And verily We sent forth among every community a messenger just as We have sent you forth among these Meccans to say ‘Worship God profess belief in His Oneness and shun false deities’ graven images and do not worship them. Then among them were some whom God guided and they believed and among them were some who deserved to be in error according to God’s knowledge and so they did not believe. So travel O disbelievers of Mecca in the land and observe the nature of the consequence of those who denied their messengers in that they were destroyed."
"That He may make clear to them li-yubayyina is semantically connected to an implied yab‘athuhum ‘He will resurrect them’ what they differ with believers in of matters of religion by punishing them and rewarding the believers and that the disbelievers may know that they were liars when they denied the Resurrection."
"And those who emigrated for God’s cause to establish His religion after they had been wronged through harm those from among the people of Mecca — these were the Prophet s and his Companions — truly We shall lodge them in this world in a goodly lodging namely Medina and the reward of the Hereafter that is Paradise is surely greater grander did they but know that is the disbelievers — or those who stayed behind and did not emigrate — did they but know the honour that belongs to emigrants they would have followed them."
"And We did not send before you anything other than men to whom We revealed and sent not angels ‘So ask the followers of the Remembrance those knowledgeable in the Torah and the Gospels; if you do not know’ that then they know it and you are more likely to believe them than the believers are to believe Muhammad (s)"
"For those who do not believe in the Hereafter namely for the disbelievers there is an evil description in other words theirs is the most evil attribute meaning the most vile which is their burying alive of newborn girls despite the fact that they are needed for the purposes of marriage; and the loftiest description belongs to God His is the attribute most sublime namely that there is no god except Him. And He is the Mighty in His kingdom the Wise in His creation."
"And God brought you forth from the bellies of your mothers while you did not know anything the statement lā ta‘lamūna shay’an ‘while you did not know anything’ is a circumstantial qualifier and He gave you hearing and sight and hearts that perhaps you might give thanks to Him for this gift and become believers."
"But if they turn away if they reject Islam your duty O Muhammad (s) is only to convey the Message plainly — this was revealed before the command to fight the disbelievers."
"And mention the day We shall raise up from every community a witness and this will be it that community’s prophet to bear witness for it and against it and this day is the Day of Resurrection; then the disbelievers will not be given permission to make excuses nor will they be asked to make amends that is nor will they be asked to repent and return to that which pleases God."
"Say to the disbelievers of Mecca ‘Believe in it or do not believe as a threat to them; indeed those who were given knowledge before it before its revelation namely the believers from among the People of the Scripture when it is recited to them fall down in prostration on their faces"
"And tell My servants the believers to speak to disbelievers that word which is finer. For Satan indeed incites ill feeling he makes trouble between them and Satan is indeed man’s manifest enemy his enmity is evident. The ‘finer word’ is to say this"
"‘Truly as for My servants the believers you shall have no warrant’ no sway or ability. And Your Lord suffices as a guardian as a protector for them against you."
"And We said in the Scripture It may be that your Lord will have mercy upon you after the second time if you were to repent; but if you revert to working corruption We too will revert to punishment. And assuredly they did revert by denying the Prophet s and so he was given power over them through the slaying of the Banū Qurayza the expulsion of the Banū Nadīr and the exacting of the jizya-tax from them; and We have made Hell a dungeon for the disbelievers a place of detention and a prison for them."
"And We reveal of min here is explicative the Qur’ān that which is a cure from error and a mercy for believers thereby; though it only increases the evildoers the disbelievers in loss because of their disbelief in it."
"Truly this Qur’ān guides to that to that way which is straightest most upright and correct and gives tidings to the believers who perform righteous deeds that there is a great reward for them."
"And on that day We shall present We shall bring close Hell to the disbelievers plain to view"
"those disbelievers whose eyes alladhīna kānat a‘yunuhum substitutes for al-kāfirīna ‘the disbelievers’ were masked from My remembrance namely the Qur’ān such that they were blind unable to be guided thereby and who could not bear to hear that is to say they were unable to listen to what the Prophet used to recite to them out of spite for him and so they did not believe therein."
"Do the disbelievers reckon that they can take My servants namely My angels as well as Jesus and Ezra as patrons as lords beside Me? awliyā’a ‘as patrons’ constitutes the second direct object of the verb yattakhidhū ‘that they can take’; the second direct object of the verb hasiba ‘reckon’ has been omitted. The meaning is do they suppose that the mentioned ‘taking as patrons’ will not incur My wrath and that I will not punish them for this? No! Truly We have prepared Hell for the disbelievers these the ones mentioned above and others as a place of hospitality in other words it has been prepared for them just as a house is prepared for a guest."
"a Book upright qayyiman is a second circumstantial qualifier for added emphasis to warn of to make by this Book the disbelievers fear severe chastisement from Him from God and to bring to the believers who perform righteous deeds the good tidings that theirs will be a fair reward"
"And so just as We aroused them it was that We disclosed them to their people and the believers that they that is their people might know that God’s promise of resurrection is true by virtue of the fact that One Who has the power to make them sleep for such a long period of time or sustain them in that state without nourishment also has the power to resurrect the dead; and that as for the Hour there is no doubt no uncertainty concerning it. Behold idh adverbially qualifies a‘tharnā ‘We disclosed’ they were disputing that is the believers and the disbelievers among themselves their affair the affair of the youths with regard to building something around them as a monument; so they the disbelievers said ‘Build over them that is around them a building to cover them up; their Lord knows them best.’ Those who prevailed regarding their affair the affair of the youths namely the believers ‘We will verily set up over them around them a place of worship’ for prayers to be performed therein. And this indeed took place at the entrance of the cave."
"They will say that is some of those disputing the number of the youths of the cave at the time of the Prophet s in other words some of these will say that they the youths were ‘Three; their dog the fourth of them’; and they some others among them will say ‘Five; their dog the sixth of them’ — both of these sayings were those of the Christians of Najrān — guessing at random in other words out of supposition not having been present with them at the time and this statement ‘guessing at random’ refers back to both sayings and is in the accusative because it is an object denoting reason in other words they said this for the reason that they were merely supposing it. And they that is the believers will say ‘Seven; and their dog the eighth of them’ the sentence is part of the subject clause the predicate of which is the adjectival qualification of sab‘a ‘seven’ namely thāminuhum ‘the eighth of them’ with the additional wāw wa-thāminuhum which is said to be for emphasis or an indication that the adjective is semantically attached to that which it is qualifying. The qualification of the first two sayings as being ‘random’ but not the third is proof that the latter is the satisfactory and correct number. Say ‘My Lord knows best their number and none knows them except a few’ Ibn ‘Abbās said ‘I am one of these “few” described’ and he mentioned that they were seven. So do not contend concerning them except with an outward manner of contention except with that which has been revealed to you and do not question concerning them do not ask for opinions from any of them from the People of the Scripture the Jews. The people of Mecca asked him the Prophet about the story of the People of the Cave and so he said to them ‘I will tell you about it tomorrow’ but without adding the words ‘If God wills’ inshā’a’ Llāhu and so the following was revealed"
"And say to him and to his companions that this Qur’ān is ‘The truth that comes from your Lord; so whoever will let him believe and whoever will let him disbelieve’ — this is meant as a threat to them. Indeed We have prepared for the wrongdoers that is the disbelievers a Fire and they will be surrounded by its pavilion by that which encloses the Fire itself. If they cry out for help they will be succoured with water like molten copper like thick burning oil which scalds faces because of the intensity of its heat if it is brought near them. What an evil drink that is and how ill is the Fire as a resting-place! murtafaqan is a specification derived from the agent of the verb in other words vile is the person choosing to rest thereon; and this is in contrast to what He will say next about Paradise How fair a resting-place below verse 31. For indeed what resting-place can there be in the Fire?"
"And strike coin for them for the disbelievers together with the believers a similitude two men rajulayn is a substitute for mathalan ‘a similitude’ and constitutes together with what follows an explanation of the similitude to one of whom the disbeliever We had assigned two gardens orchards of vines and We had surrounded them with date-palms and had set between them a field of crops from which he acquired his food supplies."
"and to warn those from among the disbelievers who say ‘God has taken a son’."
"There that is on the Day of Resurrection all protection walāya; if read wilāya then it means ‘sovereignty’ belongs to God the True if read as al-haqqu then it is as an adjective qualifying walāya or wilāya or if read as al-haqqi then it is an attribute of God’s Majesty. He is better at rewarding than the rewarding of any person other than Him if such a person were in a position to reward; and best in consequence read ‘uquban or ‘uqban He is best in terms of the consequence for believers both thawāban ‘rewarding’ and ‘uqban ‘consequence’ are in the accusative for the purpose of specification."
"And mention the day when the mountains shall be set in motion — they shall be removed from the face of the earth and become ‘as scattered dust’ Q. 566 a variant reading for tusayyaru’l-jibālu has nusayyiru’l-jibāla ‘We shall set the mountains in motion’ and you will see the earth exposed manifest in full view with no mountain or anything else on top of it. And We shall gather them believers and disbelievers such that We will not leave out anyone of them."
"And the Book shall be set in place the Book of every man — in his right hand if he is from among the believers and in his left hand if he is from among the disbelievers. And you will see the guilty the disbelievers apprehensive fearful of what is in it and they will say when they observe the evil deeds recorded in it ‘O yā is for exclamation woe to us! O this is our destruction! this form waylatanā is a verbal noun but in this form it cannot be conjugated as a verb What is it with this Book that it leaves out neither small nor great from among our sins but instead it has counted it?’ enumerated it and fixed it in the record — they are stupefied by it in this respect. And they shall find all that they did present fixed in writing in their individual Book. And your Lord does not wrong anyone He does not punish him if he is without guilt nor does He diminish anything of the reward of a believer."
"And nothing prevented people that is the disbelievers of Mecca from believing an yu’minū is after al-nāsa ‘people’ constitutes the second direct object clause when the guidance the Qur’ān came to them and from asking forgiveness of their Lord without that there should come upon them the precedent of the ancients sunnatu’l-awwalīn constitutes the subject of the verb that is to say Our precedent of dealing with them which is the destruction decreed for them or that the chastisement should come upon them before their very eyes in front of them and for them to see — which was their being killed on the day of Badr a variant reading for qibalan has qubulan which in the accusative is the plural of qabīlin meaning ‘of various kinds’."
"And We do not send messengers except as bearers of good tidings to believers and as warners as threateners to disbelievers. But those who disbelieve dispute with falsehood when they say that ‘Has God sent a human as a messenger from Him?’ Q. 1794 and the like of such statements that they may refute thereby that by way of their disputing they may invalidate the truth the Qur’ān. And they have taken My signs namely the Qur’ān and that whereof they have been warned in the way of the Fire derisively in mockery."
"And as for the boy his parents were believers and We feared lest he should overwhelm them with insolence and disbelief — for he is as described by the hadīth of Muslim ‘He was incorrigibly disposed to disbelief and had he lived longer this disposition of his would have oppressed them because of their love for him they would have followed him in such a path of disbelief’."
"until when he reached the setting of the sun the place where it sets he found it setting in a muddy spring ‘ayn hami’a a spring containing ham’a which is black clay its setting in a spring is described as seen from the perspective of the eye for otherwise it is far larger in size than this world; and he found by it that is by the spring a folk of disbelievers. We said ‘O Dhū’l-Qarnayn — by means of inspiration — either chastise the folk by slaying them or treat them kindly’ by merely taking them captive."
"And warn them threaten O Muhammad (s) the disbelievers of Mecca of the Day of Regret namely the Day of Resurrection on which the sinner will regret not having been virtuous in the life of this world when the matter will be decided for them thereupon that they be chastised while they in this world are yet heedless of it and do not believe in it the Day of Resurrection."
"And when Our manifest evident bayyinātin ‘manifest’ is a circumstantial qualifier signs in the Qur’ān are recited to them namely to the believers and the disbelievers those who disbelieve say to those who believe ‘Which of the two parties — us or you — is better in station in lodging and abode read as maqāman it is derived from the first form qāma ‘he stood’; read as muqāman it is derived from the fourth form aqāma ‘he took up residence’ and more excellent in assembly?’ nadiyyan meaning the place in which a folk assemble and converse. They the disbelievers mean ‘we are the better of the two parties’ and so we will fare better than you. God exalted be He says"
"Say ‘As for him who is in error man kāna fī’l-dalālati a conditional clause the response to which is fa’l-yamdud ‘He shall prolong’ and what follows it the Compassionate One shall defer fa’l-yamdud functions in the sense of a predicate him from chastisement by granting him some respite in this world drawing him on to his eventual chastisement gradually until when they catch sight of that which they were promised whether it be chastisement in this world by being killed or taken captive or the Hour the Resurrection that comprises Hell they will enter it. Then they will surely know who is worse in respect of position and weaker in respect of the number of hosts’ in respect of the number of supporters themselves or the believers? Their hosts will be the devils while the hosts of the believers against them will be the angels."
"And God increases in guidance those who found right guidance through faith increasing them by way of the signs He reveals to them; and the enduring things the righteous deeds — namely obedience the reward of which endures for that person — are better in your Lord’s sight in terms of reward and better in terms of the return that is as something which will be repaid and returned to him the believer in contrast to the deeds of the disbelievers. The use of the qualification khayr ‘better’ here is meant to counter the use of the same in their statement ‘Which of the two parties is better in station?’ above Q. 1973."
"And they namely the disbelievers of Mecca have taken besides God graven images as other gods for them to worship that they may be for them a source of might that they may be intercessors before God so that they will not be chastised."
"Have you not regarded that We unleash the devils against We have set them upon the disbelievers to urge them to incite them to commit acts of disobedience impetuously?"
"Indeed We have made it easy namely the Qur’ān in your tongue only that you may bear good tidings therewith to the God-fearing those who will be prosperous because of their faith and warn threaten therewith a folk who are contumacious luddan the accusative plural of aladd in other words extremely disputatious using false arguments — and they are the disbelievers of Mecca."
"The day the Trumpet is blown the Horn the Second Blast and We shall assemble the criminals the disbelievers on that day bruised in the eye along with their faces blackened."
"Is it not a guidance has it not become clear to them to the disbelievers of Mecca how many kam is predicative and the object of the following ahlaknā We destroyed in other words Our frequent destruction before them of generations that is of past communities for denying messengers amid the ruins of whose dwelling-places they walk? yamshūna is a circumstantial qualifier referring to the person of the pronoun lahum ‘to them’ during their journeys to Syria and other places that they might thus be admonished? what has been mentioned by grammarians regarding the derivation of the verb ihlāk to be that verb that does not contain a particle referring to the object of the action of the verb as a way of preserving the original sense of the statement is acceptable. Surely in that there are signs lessons for people of sense for possessors of intellect."
"Nay but We hurl We cast the truth faith against falsehood disbelief and it obliterates it and behold it vanishes disappears damaghahu ‘it obliterates it’ actually means ‘it struck the brain with a blow’ a blow which is fatal. And for you O disbelievers of Mecca there shall be woe severe chastisement for what you ascribe to God of mate or child."
"Had there been in either of them that is in the heavens and the earth gods other than God that is other than Him the two would have surely deteriorated they the heavens and the earth would have deviated from their observed order because counteractive forces would exist among such gods as is usually the case when there is more than one ruler that there is counteraction and a lack of consensus regarding something. So glory be to God — an exaltation — the Lord the Creator of the Throne al-kursī above what they ascribe the disbelievers to God of His having a partner and otherwise."
"When the disbelievers said that Muhammad (s) would die the following was revealed And We did not assign to any human being before you immortality permanence of life in this world. What if you are fated to die will they be immortal? in it? No! The last sentence constitutes the syntactical locus of the interrogative of denial."
"And whenever the disbelievers see you they only take you in derision that is as one to be derided saying ‘Is this the one who mentions your gods?’ that is the one who derides them? And yet when it comes to the mention of the Compassionate One to them they hum repeated for emphasis are disbelieving of it saying ‘We do not know of any such individual’."
"Or is it that they have am ‘or’ functions with the sense of a hamza used to indicate denial that is read it as a-lahum ‘do they have’ gods to defend them against that which might cause them harm besides Us? In other words do they have anyone other than Us to defend them against such things? No! They namely the gods cannot help themselves and so they will not be able to help them; nor shall they the disbelievers be protected from Us from Our chastisement one may say sahibaka’Llāhu to mean ‘May God preserve and protect you’."
"And We sent none before you other than men to whom We revealed read nūhī or yūhā ‘to whom it is revealed’ and We sent not any angels. Ask the People of the Remembrance those with knowledge of the Torah and the Gospel if you do not know this; for they will know it. Since you are more likely to believe them than the believers are to believing Muhammad (s)."
"And mention Noah what follows Nūhan substitutes for it when he called when he supplicated to God against his people — with the words My Lord do not leave upon the earth any inhabitant from among the disbelievers … to the end of the verse Q. 7126 before that is before the time of Abraham and Lot. And We responded to him and delivered him and his people who were in the Ark with him from the great agony namely from drowning and his people’s denial of him."
"So We responded to him and delivered him from the distress by means of those words and thus in the same way that We delivered him We deliver the believers from their anguish when they call out to Us seeking succour."
"And the true promise that is the Day of Resurrection draws near and behold when the gaze of the disbelievers will be fixed on that Day because of its severity saying ‘O yā is for exclamation woe to us! this is our destruction! Verily in the life of the world we were oblivious to this Day. Nay but we were doing wrong’ to our souls by our denial of the messengers."
"He calls on him the lām of la-man is extra whose harm when worshipped is likelier than his benefit even if he were to have any benefit as he imagines him to have. Truly an evil patron is he that is an evil helper and an evil friend an evil companion is he. After the mention of ‘the doubter’ and his being in manifest ‘loss’ above verse 11 there follows the mention of the believers and their reward as follows"
"Truly those who believe and those of Jewry namely the Jews and the Sabaeans a sect from among them and the Christians and the Magians and the polytheists — God will indeed judge between them on the Day of Resurrection by admitting the believers into Paradise and all others into the Fire. Assuredly God over all things the things which they do is Witness Knowing them a knowledge of direct vision ‘ilm mushāhada."
"Have you not seen have you not realised that to God prostrate whoever is in the heavens and whoever is in the earth together with the sun and the moon and the stars and the mountains and the trees and the animals that is how they are submissive to Him in what He wills of them as well as many of mankind? namely the believers who prostrate to Him in addition to their submissiveness to Him when prostrating in prayer. And for many the chastisement has become due and these are the disbelievers for they refuse to prostrate an action which is contingent on belief. And he whom God abases he whom He makes unprosperous there is none to give him honour none to make him fortunate. Indeed God does whatever He will in the way of abasing or giving honour."
"These twain are two contenders that is the believers constitute one contending party and the five categories of disbelievers constitute the other contending party the term khasm ‘contender’ may be used to refer to one or many who contend concerning their Lord that is to say concerning His religion. As for those who disbelieve garments of fire will be cut out for them garments which they will wear — meaning that the Fire will encompass them — and boiling water will be poured over their heads hamīm is water that has reached an extreme temperature"
"And He God says of the believers Indeed God shall admit those who believe and perform righteous deeds into gardens underneath which rivers flow; adorned therein with bracelets of gold and pearl read wa-lu’lu’in genitive to mean bracelets made of both elements so that the pearls are set in gold; or read wa-lu’lu’an accusative as a supplement to the syntactical locus of min asāwira ‘bracelets’; and their raiment therein will be silk namely the one forbidden for men to wear in this world."
"Permission is granted to those who fight namely to the believers to fight back — this was the first verse to be revealed regarding the struggle in the way of God jihād because they have been wronged as a result of the wrong done to them by the disbelievers. And God is truly able to help them;"
"and the inhabitants of Midian the people of Shu‘ayb and Moses was also denied he was denied by the native Egyptians al-qibt and not by his people the Children of Israel. In other words all of those people denied their messengers so take them these messengers as a good example of constancy. And I granted the disbelievers respite I postponed dealing with them by deferring their requital then I seized them with chastisement and how terrible was My abhorrence! nakīr that is to say My rebuke inkār of them for their denial by My destroying them the interrogative is meant as an affirmative in other words it My chastisement was well-placed."
"How many a town I have destroyed ahlaktuhā a variant reading has ahlaknāhā ‘We have destroyed’ while it was doing wrong that is while its inhabitants were doing wrong by being disbelievers but now it lies fallen down collapsed on its roofs and how many a neglected well abandoned because of the death of its owners and a lofty palace stands empty because of the death of its residents."
"Have they namely the disbelievers of Mecca not travelled in the land so that they may have hearts with which to comprehend what befell deniers before them or ears with which to hear? the stories of how they were destroyed and their dwelling-places were ruined and so take heed? Indeed it is not the eyes that turn blind but it is the hearts that turn blind within the breasts allatī fī’l-sudūr for emphasis."
"Say ‘O mankind that is O people of Mecca I am only a manifest warner to you’ one whose warning is plain; but also I am a giver of good tidings to the believers."
"That He may make what Satan has cast a trial a test for those in whose hearts is a sickness dissension and hypocrisy and those whose hearts are hardened namely the idolaters hardened against acceptance of the truth. For truly the evildoers the disbelievers are steeped in extreme defiance in a protracted feud with the Prophet s and the believers for his tongue uttered mention of their gods in a way that pleased them and yet this was later nullified."
"And those who disbelieve will not cease to be in doubt of it that is the Qur’ān — because of what Satan had cast onto the tongue of the Prophet s and what had thereafter been nullified — until the Hour comes upon them unawares that is the Hour of their death or of resurrection comes upon them suddenly or there come upon them the chastisement of a day of desolation ‘aqīm namely the day of Badr which held nothing of good for disbelievers much like a sterile wind rīh ‘aqīm that bears no good; or it means the Day of Resurrection referred to as ‘desolate’ because thereafter there will be no more night."
"Sovereignty on that day namely on the Day of Resurrection will be God’s alone the sense of God’s ‘consolidation’ of sovereignty on that Day suggested by the clause renders the adverbial qualifier yawma’idhin ‘on that day’ into accusative dependent status. He will judge between them between believers and disbelievers in the way that He explains next Then those who believed and performed righteous deeds will be in Gardens of Bliss as a bounty from God"
"That which We have related to you is so. And whoever retaliates whoever from among the believers requites with the like of what he was made to suffer at the hands of the idolaters wrongfully that is whoever fights against them if they fight against him during the sacred month and then is again made to suffer aggression by them that is to say he is again wronged by being expelled from his house God will surely help him. Indeed God is Pardoning to believers Forgiving them their engaging in combat during the sacred month."
"That help is because God makes the night pass into the day and makes the day pass into the night that is to say He makes each enter into the other by increasing the one and decreasing the other which is a sign of His power exalted be He the same power that produces His help and because God is Hearer of the supplications of believers Seer of them giving them faith and responding to their supplications."
"God will judge between you O believers and disbelievers on the Day of Resurrection concerning that wherein you used to differ’ when each of the two parties would say the opposite of what the other said."
"And when Our signs in the Qur’ān are recited to them though they are clear manifest signs bayyinātin a circumstantial qualifier you perceive on the faces of those who disbelieve denial that is to say denial of these signs in other words you perceive the effect of such denial in the way of aversion and frowning. They would almost pounce upon those who recite Our signs to them that is they would almost fall upon them in assault. Say ‘Shall I inform you about something worse than that? something more repulsive to you than the Qur’ān that is being recited to you? It is The Fire! God has promised it to the disbelievers in that their journey’s end shall be to it. And it is an evil journey’s end!’"
"Indeed qad is for confirmation prosperous victorious are the believers"
"And he who calls on another god along with God has no proof thereof lā burhāna lahu bihi an extra explicative adjectival qualification that has no other syntactical signification his reckoning his requital will indeed be with his Lord. Truly the disbelievers will not be successful they will not be felicitous."
"And say ‘My Lord forgive and have mercy on believers — this ‘mercy’ adds to the ‘forgiveness’ in terms of God’s grace — and You are the best of the merciful’ the most excellent of those who have mercy."
"And when you have settled when you are balanced in the Ark together with those with you say “Praise be to God Who has delivered us from the wrongdoing folk” from the disbelievers and the destruction that came upon them."
"Surely in that mentioned matter of Noah the ship and the destruction of the disbelievers there are signs indicators of God’s power exalted be He and indeed wa-in in has been softened in place of the hardened form its subject being the pronoun of the matter We were putting to the test indeed We were trying the people of Noah by sending him as God’s messenger to them and by his admonitions to them."
"And We sent among them a messenger of their own namely Hūd saying ‘Worship God! You have no other god besides Him. Will you not then be wary?’ of His punishment and become believers?"
"So leave them the disbelievers of Mecca in their error their misguidance for a while until they die."
"Nay but their hearts that is the hearts of the disbelievers are in ignorance of this Qur’ān and they have other deeds which they will perpetrate besides the ones mentioned against the believers and they will therefore be chastised for them."
"Truly those who initiated the slander the worst calumny against ‘Ā’isha — mother of the believers may God be pleased with her — accusing her of fornication are a band from among yourselves a group from among the believers. She said that these were Hassān b. Thābit ‘Abd Allāh b. Ubayy Mistah b. Uthātha and Hamna bt. Jahsh. Do not suppose O you believers other than the mentioned band that it is bad for you; rather it is good for you for God will reward you for it and reveal ‘Ā’isha’s innocence and the innocence of the one who is supposed to have committed it with her namely Safwān b. al-Mu‘attal. She ‘Ā’isha related ‘I accompanied the Prophet s during a raid and this was after the requirement to wear the veil had been revealed. When he was through with it the raid he headed back to the campsite and one night having drawn close to Medina he announced that all should march off home. So I walked a distance away from the campsite and relieved myself. But when I came back to the campsite I realised that my necklace ‘iqd meaning qilāda had snapped. So I went back to look for it. In the meantime they had strapped my litter’ — in which one rides — ‘thinking that I was inside for in those days women were slight and ate very small portions ‘ulqa. Finally I found my necklace but when I went back to where I had been staying overnight they had already departed. I sat in the place where I had camped; I assumed that the group would notice my absence and come back for me. But my eyes were overcome by drowsiness and I fell asleep. Safwān had pitched camp behind the army to rest for some of the night ‘arrasa then set off while it was still night until he reached the site of the camp. He saw what looked like a person sleeping and recognised me when he eventually saw me having seen me on numerous occasions before the requirement of the veil. I woke up to the sound of him saying ‘To God we belong and to Him we shall surely return’ innā li’Llāhi wa-innā ilayhi rāji‘ūn for he had recognised me. So I concealed my face with my gown jilbāb — in other words I covered it up with my wrap mulā’a."
"Why when you first heard about it did the believing men and women not think good of themselves that is why did some not think good of others and say ‘This is a manifest calumny?’ this is a patent lie? there is a shift here in the address from the second to the third person in other words why did you not assume good of them O band of believers and say"
"God admonishes you He forbids you lest you should ever repeat the like of it if you are in truth believers then you will be admonished by this."
"As for the fornicatress and the fornicator that is of those not in wedlock — because those in wedlock are stoned according to the Sunna the al in al-zāniya ‘the fornicatress’ and al-zānī ‘the fornicator’ according to some mentioned opinions is a relative particle; the clause al-zāniyatu wa’l-zānī is a subject and because of its similarity to a conditional the fā’ has been inserted into the predicate which is the following fa’jlidū strike each of them a hundred lashes a hundred strikes one says jaladahu to mean daraba jildahu ‘he struck him on the skin’. According to the Sunna in addition to this punishment there is also banishment for a whole year. The slave however receives half of the mentioned punishment. And do not let any pity for them overcome you in God’s religion that is to say in the fulfilment of His rulings by disregarding any part of their prescribed punishment if you believe in God and the Last Day namely the Day of Resurrection in this statement there is an incitement to abide by what was mentioned before the conditional above and it also constitutes the response to the latter or at least is an indication of the response to it. And let their punishment the flogging be witnessed by a group of the believers — some say that this should be a group of three; some say four as in the number of witnesses testifying to an act of fornication."
"And do not let those of you who possess bounty the wealthy and the affluent swear not to give to the near of kin and the poor and those who emigrate in the way of God — this was revealed regarding Abū Bakr who swore to provide no more for Mistah his maternal cousin a destitute Emigrant who had fought at the battle of Badr because of his involvement in the calumny when thitherto he had provided for him. And it was revealed also regarding certain Companions who swore not to give voluntary alms to those who had participated in spreading the calumny in any way. Let them forgive and excuse them in this matter. Do you not love that God should forgive you? And God is Forgiving Merciful to believers. Abū Bakr said ‘Indeed. I would love that God forgive me’ and he restored thereafter to Mistah what he used to expend on him."
"The fornicator shall not marry anyone but a fornicatress or an idolatress and the fornicatress shall be married by none except a fornicator or an idolator in other words what is suitable for each of the two for the purposes of marriage is the above-mentioned; and that namely marrying of fornicators is forbidden to believers who are better than those. This was revealed when the poor among the Emigrants resolved to marry the wealthy whores of the idolaters so that they the women would provide for them. Thus it is said that the prohibition applies specifically to them; but it is also said to apply in general; but it was abrogated by God’s words Marry off the spouseless among you Q. 2432."
"And tell believing women to lower their gaze away from what is not lawful for them to look at and to guard their private parts from what is not lawful for them to do with them and not to display their adornment except for what is apparent namely the face and the hands which may be seen by a stranger when there is no danger of either or both falling into temptation — this being one of two opinions. The second of these is that even this is forbidden because there is a presumption that these parts will cause temptation — and this is the preferred opinion if one must settle this topic with a definitive opinion; and let them draw their veils over their bosoms that is let them cover up their heads necks and chests with veils and not reveal their hidden adornment namely all that is other than the face and the hands except to their husbands bu‘ūl is the plural form of ba‘l ‘male spouse’ or their fathers or their husbands’ fathers or their sons or their husbands’ sons or their brothers or their brothers’ sons or their sisters’ sons or their women or what their right hands own all of whom are permitted to look thereat except for the part from the navel down to the knees which is unlawful for any other than their husbands to see; ‘their women’ however excludes disbelieving women for it is not permitted for Muslim women to reveal themselves to these; ‘what their right hands own’ comprises slaves; or such men who are dependant on what food may be left over not ghayri read as an adjective or read ghayra as an exceptive possessing any sexual desire not those men who are in sexual need of women so for example those whose male member cannot become erect; or children who are not yet aware of women’s private parts  sexual intercourse and so to these they may reveal themselves except for that part from the navel to the knees. And do not let them thump with their feet to make known their hidden ornaments as in a rattling anklet and the like. And rally to God in repentance O believers repenting of the occasions on which you may have looked at what is forbidden to look at of such parts and otherwise so that you might be prosperous so that you might be saved from such sinful acts when your repentance thereof is accepted — in this verse the prevalent address is to males over females."
"And marry off the spouseless among you ayāmā is the plural form of ayyim namely a spouseless female whether she be a virgin or one previously married or a spouseless male this stipulation relates to free men and free women and the righteous ones the believers among your male slaves and your female slaves ‘ibād is one plural form of ‘abd. If they the free men are poor God will enrich them through marriage out of His bounty. God is Embracing of the needs of His creatures Knowing of them."
"And they the hypocrites say ‘We believe in we affirm the truth of God of His Oneness and the Messenger Muhammad (s) and we obey’ them in what rulings they God and Muhammad give. Then after that a party of them turn away they are averse to it and those those who are averse they are not believers as believers should be believers whose hearts agree with the words of their tongues."
"All that the believers say when they are summoned to God and His Messenger that he may judge between them is that they say in other words the saying that befits them is to say ‘We hear and we obey’ by responding to the summons. And those then are the successful the ones who will be saved."
"God has promised those of you who believe and perform righteous deeds that He will surely make them successors in the earth in place of the disbelievers just as He made those Children of Israel who were before them successors in place of the ruling tyrants the verb may be read as active istakhlafa ‘He made them successors’ or as passive istukhlifa ‘were made successors’ and He will surely establish for them their religion which He has approved for them namely the religion of Islam by making it prevail over all religions and enrich them throughout the land so that they become masters thereof and that He will give them in exchange read wa-la-yubdilannahum or wa-la-yubaddilannahum after their fear of disbelievers security. And God fulfilled His promise to them in the way mentioned and He praises them with His words ‘They worship Me without associating anything with Me’ ya‘budūnanī lā yushrikūna bī shay’an is an independent new sentence standing as a justification for His promise. And whoever is ungrateful after that bestowal of grace from among them whoever is ungrateful for it those they are the immoral. The first to show ingratitude for that grace of God were the murderers of ‘Uthmān b. ‘Affān may God be pleased with him and they began to kill one another henceforth after having been brothers."
"Only they are believers who believe in God and His Messenger and who when they are with him namely the Messenger in a collective affair such as during the Friday sermon do not leave when they have an excuse until they have asked leave of him. Truly those who ask leave of you — it is they who believe in God and His Messenger. So when they ask leave of you for some affair some matter of theirs give permission to whom you will of them to leave and ask God to forgive them. Truly God is Forgiving Merciful."
"The day when they see the angels while they stand together with the rest of creation namely on the Day of Resurrection yawma is in the accusative because of an implied preceding udhkur ‘mention’ there will be no good tidings on that day for the guilty that is the disbelievers in contrast to the believers for whom there shall be the good tidings of Paradise and they will say ‘A forbidding ban!’ as was their the pagan custom in this world whenever a misfortune befell them; in other words they mean ‘awdhan ma‘ādhan seeking refuge from the angels who will chastise them. God exalted be He says"
"Those who will be the inhabitants of Paradise on that day the Day of Resurrection will be in a far better abode than are the disbelievers in this world and a far better resting place than theirs the latter’s; in other words a better place for qā’ila which is a rest taken during midday during hot days. From this last interpretation of maqīlan it has been inferred that the Reckoning will be concluded in half a day as is stated in one hadīth."
"true Sovereignty on that day will belong to the Compassionate One with no one else sharing it with Him and it that day will be a hard day for the disbelievers in contrast to the believers."
"Yet they the disbelievers have taken besides Him that is besides God in other words other than Him gods from among the idols who create nothing but have themselves been created and who possess no harm for themselves that is the power to repel it nor any benefit that is the power to attract it nor do they possess any power over death or life that is nor do they have the power to make a person die or to give him life or resurrection that is nor do they have power to raise the dead."
"And mention the people of Noah when they denied the messengers in denying Noah — it is as though he were many messengers given the length of time he remained among them; or it is thus expressed in the plural because to deny him is equivalent to denying all the other messengers for they all came with the same Message concerning affirmation of God’s Oneness — We drowned them this is the response to lammā ‘when’ and made them a sign a lesson for mankind thereafter and We have prepared in the Hereafter for the evildoers the disbelievers a painful chastisement in addition to what chastisement may befall them in this world."
"And those who disbelieve say ‘This Qur’ān is nothing but a calumny a lie that he Muhammad (s) has invented and other folk have helped him with it’ who according to the disbelievers were from among the People of the Scripture. God exalted be He says Verily thus they have committed wrong and spoken falsehood they have come with disbelief and mendacity."
"And verily they namely the disbelievers of Mecca will have passed by the town on which an evil shower was rained al-saw’ ‘evil’ is the verbal noun from sā’a ‘was evil’ that is it was showered with stones. This was the principal town of the towns inhabited by the people of Lot; God destroyed its inhabitants for their committing acts of lewdness. Can it be that they have not seen it? on their journeys to Syria and so take heed thereof? the interrogative is affirmative. Nay but it is that they do not expect they have no fear of any resurrection and so they do not believe."
"Indeed in softened in place of the hardened form with its subject omitted namely innahu he was about to lead us astray turn us away from our gods had we not stood by them’ he would have turned us away from them. God exalted be He says And soon they will know when they behold the chastisement with their own eyes in the Hereafter who is further astray from the way who is further upon the path of error they or the believers?"
"Or do you suppose that most of them listen listening so as to understand or comprehend? what you say to them? They are but as the cattle — nay but they are further astray from the way further from these cattle upon the path of misguidance for at least they cattle yield to the person who looks after them whereas these disbelievers do not obey their Master Who is gracious to them."
"So do not obey the disbelievers in their desires but struggle against them therewith that is through adherence to the Qur’ān with a great endeavour."
"And they the disbelievers worship besides God that which neither benefits them when they worship it nor harms them should they refrain therefrom — and these are idols; and the disbeliever is ever a partisan against his Lord an assistant to Satan through his obedience to him."
"Say ‘It has been revealed by Him Who knows the secret the Unseen of the heavens and the earth. Truly He is ever Forgiving of believers Merciful’ to them."
"And when it is said to them to the disbelievers of Mecca ‘Prostrate yourselves before the Compassionate One’ they say ‘And what is the Compassionate One? Should we prostrate ourselves to whatever you bid us’ ta’murunā; or read ya’murunā ‘whatever he bids us’ — in both cases the one bidding is Muhammad (s) — when we do not know who He is? No! And it this that is said to them increases their aversion to faith."
"Or a treasure thrown down to him from the heaven for him to spend from so as not to be in need of walking through the marketplaces in order to earn his livelihood. Or he has a garden an orchard for him to eat from?’ that is to eat from its fruits and satisfy himself therewith a variant reading for ya’kulu ‘for him to eat’ has na’kulu ‘for us to eat’ and thus possess because of that garden an advantage over us. The wrongdoers namely the disbelievers say to the believers ‘You are just following a man bewitched!’ one duped his mind overcome. God exalted be He says"
"So now we have no intercessors as the believers have in the way of angels prophets and other believers"
"Surely in that which is mentioned of the tale of Abraham and his people there is a sign; but most of them are not believers."
"And I am not about to drive away the believers."
"so judge conclusively between me and them and deliver me and the believers who are with me’."
"Surely in that there is a sign; but most of them are not believers."
"So they denied him concerning the chastisement whereupon We destroyed them in this world with the barren wind cf. Q. 5141. Surely in that there is a sign; but most of them are not believers."
"So they were seized by the chastisement which had been promised and were destroyed. Surely in that there is a sign; but most of them are not believers."
"Surely in that there is a sign; but most of them are not believers."
"Surely in that there is a sign; but most of them are not believers."
"Is it not a sign of this fact for them for the disbelievers of Mecca that the learned of the Children of Israel recognise it? those such as ‘Abd Allāh b. Salām and his companions from among those who became Muslim believers they are able inform you of this read yakun with āyatan in the accusative or takun with āyatun in the nominative."
"and had he recited it to them that is to the disbelievers of Mecca they would not have believed in it disdaining to follow it."
"So in the same way in which We would have caused denial of it to penetrate the hearts of disbelievers had it been recited by a non-Arab We have caused denial of it to penetrate the hearts of the criminals the Meccan disbelievers when Muhammad (s) recites it."
"Thereupon they will say ‘Shall we be granted any respite?’ that we might become believers?; and it shall be said to them ‘No!’ and they will say ‘When will this chastisement be?’ God exalted be He says"
"And lower your wing show your gentle side to the believers the affirmers of God’s Oneness who follow you."
"Shall I inform you O disbelievers of Mecca upon whom the devils descend? tanazzalu one of the tā’ letters in the original tatanazzalu has been omitted."
"Save those poets who believe and perform righteous deeds and remember God frequently in other words those whom poetry does not distract from the remembrance of God and vindicate themselves by lampooning the disbelievers after they have been wronged by the disbelievers’ reviling of them as belonging together with all believers — such individuals are not reprehensible. God exalted be He says God does not like the utterance of evil words out loud unless a person has been wronged Q. 4148; He exalted be He also says so whoever commits aggression against you commit aggression against him in the manner that he committed against you Q. 2194; and those poets and others who are wrongdoers will soon know the reversal the return with which they will meet by which they will return after death."
"Perhaps O Muhammad (s) you might kill yourself out of distress for the reason that they namely the people of Mecca will not become believers la‘alla here expresses sympathy in other words what is meant is ‘have pity on it your self by alleviating the burden of this distress’."
"Surely in that drowning of Pharaoh and his folk there is a sign a lesson for those generations who would come after them; but most of them are not believers in God. The only ones to believe were Āsiya — Pharaoh’s wife — Hizqīl the believing man of Pharaoh’s family and Maryam daughter of Nāmūsī she who pointed out the bone remains of the prophet Joseph peace be upon him."
"And surely your Lord He is the Mighty for He wrought vengeance upon the disbelievers by drowning them the Merciful to believers delivering them from drowning."
"And recite to them the disbelievers of Mecca the tiding the tale of Abraham Ibrāhīma is substituted by the following idh qāla ‘when he said’"
"Surely in that there is a sign an indication of the perfection of His power exalted be He; but most of them in God’s knowledge are not believers kāna here according to Sībawayhi is extra."
"And surely your Lord He is the Mighty One Who will exact vengeance from the disbelievers the Merciful Who shows mercy to believers."
"and Hell will be revealed plainly for the perverse the disbelievers."
"It is a guidance guiding from error and good tidings for the believers who believe in it of Paradise;"
"And verily We sent to Thamūd their brother in terms of his belonging to the same tribe Sālih with the following decree ‘Worship God!’ affirm His Oneness. And lo! they then became two parties quarrelling with one another over religion one party having become believers upon his arrival as messenger to them and the other party disbelievers."
"They said ‘We augur evil ittayyarnā is actually tatayyarnā but the tā’ has been assimilated with the tā’ and a conjunctive hamza added of you and of those who are with you’ namely the believers — when they the tribe of Thamūd were deprived of rain and suffered hunger. He said ‘Your evil augury is with God — He has given it to you; nay but you are a people being tried’ being tested with good and evil turns of fortune."
"Say O Muhammad (s) ‘Praise be to God for the destruction of the disbelievers of past communities and peace be on His servants whom He has chosen’. Is God read a-Allāhu pronouncing both hamzas; or by substituting an alif for the second one; or by not pronouncing the second one but inserting an alif between the one not pronounced and the other one or without such an insertion better for those who worship Him or the partners which they ascribe? read either tushrikūna ‘you ascribe’ or yushrikūna ‘they ascribe’ they being the people of Mecca the partners they ascribe to Him in other words are such gods better for those who worship them?"
"They the disbelievers also asked him when the Hour will come to pass and the following was revealed Say ‘No one in the heavens or the earth knows be it angels or human beings the Unseen namely what is hidden from them except God He knows it and they are not aware the disbelievers of Mecca like others when is the time in which they will be resurrected."
"And the disbelievers say also in rejecting the idea of resurrection ‘What! When we and our fathers are dust shall we indeed be brought forth again? from the graves."
"And surely your Lord is bountiful to mankind an example of which is His deferring chastisement for the disbelievers but most of them are not thankful — disbelievers are not grateful for the deferring of chastisement since they reject the fact that it will ever come to pass."
"And there is not a thing hidden in the heaven and the earth the hā’ tā’ marbūta of ghā’ibatun is hyperbole in other words anything that is completely hidden from people but it is in a manifest Book namely in the Preserved Tablet al-lawh al-mahfūz and in God’s concealed knowledge an example of which is the time of the chastising of the disbelievers."
"And truly it is a guidance from error and a mercy for believers from chastisement."
"Surely your Lord will decide between them as He will with others on the Day of Resurrection of His judgement that is His justice. And He is the Mighty the Victor the Knower of what He judges so that none will be able to oppose Him in the way that the disbelievers have opposed His prophets in this world."
"So rely on God trust in Him for you are indeed upon the manifest truth upon the manifest religion the sequel shall be in your favour with victory over the disbelievers. God then draws comparisons between them and the dead the deaf and the blind saying"
"And when the word of judgement falls upon them when they deserve that chastisement befalls them as well as all other disbelievers We shall bring forth for them a beast from the earth which shall speak to them saying that is which shall speak in Arabic to those who are alive at the time when it appears among its other statements it will say to them on Our behalf ‘Indeed mankind read tukallimuhum inna’l-nāsa; a variant has tukallimuhum bi-anna’l-nāsa ‘to tell them that mankind’ had no faith in Our signs’ in other words they did not believe in the Qur’ān and what it comprises of the mention of resurrection reckoning and requital. With its the beast’s appearance the enjoining of decency and forbidding of indecency will cease and thereafter no disbeliever will believe — just as God revealed to Noah when He said to him None of your people will believe except he who has already believed Q. 1136."
"Do they not see that We made We created the night that they like others may rest in it and the day for sight? meaning for people to see in it so that they may go about their business therein. Surely in that there are signs indications of His power exalted be He for a people who believe — they the believers are singled out for mention because they benefit from such signs in their faith in contrast to the disbelievers."
"and to recite the Qur’ān to you as a call to faith. So whoever is guided to it is guided only for his own sake since the reward for his being guided will be his; and whoever goes astray from faith and errs from the path of guidance say to him ‘I am just one of the warners’ the threateners and therefore my duty is only to deliver the Message — this was revealed before the command to fight against the disbelievers."
"And the heart of Moses’s mother when she found out that they had picked him up became empty of everything other than him. Indeed in softened from the hardened form its subject omitted in other words understand it as innaha she was about to expose him that is as being her son had We not fortified her heart with patience that is We made it at peace that she might be of the believers of those who have faith in God’s promise the response to the conditional lawlā ‘had … not’ is given by the preceding statement."
"He said ‘My Lord forasmuch as You have been gracious to me with forgiveness protect me so I will never be a partisan a supporter of the criminals’ the disbelievers henceforth if you were to protect me."
"And Moses said wa-qāla or qāla without the ‘and’ ‘My Lord knows best who brings guidance from Him the suffixed pronoun in ‘indihi refers to the Lord and whose man here is a supplement to the previous man will be read takūna or yakūna the sequel of the Blissful Abode that is to say the praiseworthy sequel in the Abode of the Hereafter in other words it is I Moses in both cases and I speak truthfully in what I have brought you. Truly the evildoers the disbelievers will not be successful’."
"Otherwise if an affliction a punishment should befall them because of what their own hands have sent before them in the way of disbelief and otherwise they might say ‘Our Lord why did You not send a messenger to us that we might have followed Your signs the ones sent with the messengers and been of the believers?’ the response to the conditional particle lawlā ‘if’ has been omitted and what follows it is a new subject; the meaning is ‘were it not for the affliction that is the cause of their saying’ or ‘were it not for their saying that is the cause of their affliction We would have hastened on for them their punishment and We would not have sent you as a messenger to them’."
"And when they hear vanity vile words and hurtful intent from the disbelievers they disregard it and say ‘To us belong our deeds and to you belong your deeds. Peace to you — a parting truce salām mutāraka in other words you are secure from any abuse or the like on our part. We do not desire friendship with the ignorant’ we do not seek companionship with them."
"Indeed Korah belonged to the people of Moses — being his paternal and maternal cousin and he had believed in him in Moses — but he became insolent towards them through his disdain haughtiness and great wealth. For We had given him so many treasures that the number of their keys would verily have burdened a group of strong men in other words they would have been too heavy for such men the bā’ of bi’l-‘usbati ‘a group’ is to render transitive the intransitive verb; the number of such men required is estimated to be 70 40 or 10; other estimates are also given. Mention when his people the believers among the Children of Israel said to him ‘Do not be exultant in your great wealth an exultation of insolence; truly God does not love the exultant in such things;"
"Indeed He Who has prescribed for you the Qur’ān He Who has revealed it will surely restore you to a place of return to Mecca — he had yearned for it. Say ‘My Lord knows best him who brings guidance and him who is in manifest error’ — this was revealed in order to refute what the Meccan disbelievers had said to him ‘Indeed you are error’. In other words God is saying that he the Prophet is the one who has brought guidance while they are the ones in error."
"And you never expected that the Scripture the Qur’ān would be conferred on you; but it was conferred on you as a mercy from your Lord. So never be a supporter of the disbelievers in that religion of theirs to which they summon you."
"And among people there are those who say ‘We believe in God’ but if such a person suffers hurt in God’s cause he takes people’s persecution that is their harming of him to be the same as God’s chastisement in terms of his fear of it and so he obeys them and behaves hypocritically. Yet if la-in the lām is for oaths there comes help to believers from your Lord and they take spoils they will assuredly say la-yaqūlunna the final nūn of the indicative has been omitted because of the other nūn coming after it and likewise the wāw indicating the plural person has been replaced by a damma because of two unvocalised consonants coming together ‘We were indeed with you’ in faith so give us a share of the booty. God exalted be He says Does God not know best what is in the breasts of all creatures? what is in their hearts of faith or hypocrisy? Indeed He does."
"And they shall certainly bear their own burdens their sins and other burdens along with their own burdens as punishment for saying to believers Follow our path previous verse and for their leading astray those who follow them blindly; and on the Day of Resurrection they shall surely be questioned concerning what they used to invent what they used to fabricate of lies against God a questioning of rebuke the lām in both verbs la-yahmilunna and la-yus’alunna is for oaths; in both verbs the plural indicators of the subject wāw and nūn -ūna have been omitted."
"Do people suppose that they will be left to say that is that they will be left alone because of their saying ‘We believe’ and they will not be tried? tested with that which will reveal the sincerity of their belief. This verse was revealed regarding a group of individuals who when they became believers endured suffering at the hands of the idolaters."
"And when Our messengers came to Abraham with the good tidings of Isaac and Jacob after him they said ‘We shall assuredly destroy the people of this town namely the town of Lot for truly its people are evildoers’ disbelievers."
"God created the heavens and the earth with truth that is rightly. Surely in that there is a sign indicating His power exalted be He for believers — they are specifically mentioned because they are the ones to benefit thereby in their faith in contrast to disbelievers."
"Thus have We revealed to you the Book the Qur’ān in the same way that We have revealed to them the Torah and other scripture. And so those to whom We have given the Scripture the Torah such as ‘Abd Allāh b. Salām and others believe in it in the Qur’ān and of these people of Mecca there are some who believe in it; and none denies Our signs after they have been manifested except disbelievers namely the Jews and those for whom it was apparent that the Qur’ān was the truth and that the one who brought it was truthful but still denied it."
"Nay but it that is the Qur’ān which you have brought is clear signs in the breasts of those who have been given knowledge namely the believers who preserve it in their hearts and none denies Our signs except wrongdoers namely the Jews — they denied them after they were manifested to them."
"And they namely the disbelievers of Mecca say ‘Why has not some sign been sent down to him to Muhammad (s) from his Lord?’ āyatun ‘sign’ a variant reading has āyātun ‘signs’ such as the she-camel of Sālih or the staff of Moses or the Table of Jesus. Say to them ‘Signs are only with God and He sends them down as He will and I am only a plain warner’ making manifest my warning of the punishment of the Fire for disobedient people."
"And they ask you to hasten the chastisement in this world. And lo! Hell shall encompass the disbelievers"
"And if wa-la-in the lām is for oaths you were to ask them namely the disbelievers ‘Who created the heavens and the earth and disposed the sun and the moon?’ They would assuredly say ‘God.’ So how then are they turned away? from affirming His Oneness after affirming that God created them."
"And who — in other words there is none who — does greater wrong than he who invents a lie against God by ascribing partners to Him or denies truth be it the Prophet or the Book when it comes to him? Is there not in Hell a lodging an abode for the disbelievers? in other words there is such an abode therein and such a person belongs with them."
"But as for those who struggle for Our sake for Our truth We shall assuredly guide them in Our ways that is the means to come to Us and truly God is with the virtuous the believers assisting and helping."
"And on the Day when the Hour comes that day yawma’idhin is repeated for emphasis they believers and disbelievers shall be separated."
"The Byzantines — who are among the People of the Scripture — have been vanquished; the Persians vanquished them and they are not people of a scripture but worship graven images. The Meccan disbelievers rejoiced in this defeat of the Byzantines and said to the Muslims ‘We shall vanquish you as the Persians vanquished the Byzantines’;"
"So set your purpose O Muhammad (s) for religion as a hanīf as one inclining to it — in other words devote your religion you and whoever follows you purely to God — a nature given by God upon which He originated mankind and this nature is His religion in other words adhere to it. There is no changing God’s creation His religion that is to say do not change it by becoming idolaters. That is the upright religion the belief in God’s Oneness but most people namely the Meccan disbelievers do not know anything of God’s Oneness —"
"And when some distress some hardship befalls people that is people such as the Meccan disbelievers they call on their Lord turning returning in penitence to Him alone. Then when He lets them taste mercy from Him by way of rain lo! a party of them ascribe partners to their Lord."
"And when We let people that is people such as the disbelievers of Mecca and others taste some mercy some grace they exult in it an exultation of arrogance. But if some evil some hardship befalls them for what their own hands have sent ahead behold! they despair of mercy. It is in the nature of a believer to give thanks in times of grace and to hope for mercy from his Lord in times of hardship."
"in a few years bid‘ usually means between three and nine or ten years. So the two armies met again seven years after this former encounter and the Byzantines defeated the Persians. To God belongs the command before and after that is before the defeat of the Byzantines and thereafter that is to say the Persian victory at first and the Byzantine victory later were the result of God’s command in other words His will and on that day the day when the Byzantines will be victorious the believers shall rejoice"
"Say to the Meccan disbelievers ‘Travel in the land and behold how was the consequence for those who were before; most of them were idolaters’ and so they were destroyed because of their idolatry and their dwellings and habitations lie desolate in ruin."
"that He may requite li-yajziya is semantically connected to yassadda‘ūna ‘they shall be sundered’ those who believe and perform righteous deeds out of His bounty that He may reward them. Indeed He does not like the disbelievers in other words He will punish them."
"And verily We sent before you messengers to their people and they brought them clear signs plain proofs of their sincerity concerning their Message to them but they denied them. Then We took vengeance upon those who were guilty We destroyed those who denied them and it was ever incumbent upon Us to give victory to the believers over the disbelievers by destroying these and delivering the believers."
"in God’s help to them against the Persians. They the believers indeed rejoiced in this as they came to know of it on the day that it took place on the day of the battle of Badr when Gabriel came down with this news thereon in addition to their rejoicing in their victory over the idolaters on that same day. He helps whomever He will; and He is the Mighty the Victor the Merciful to believers."
"And on the Day when the Hour comes the guilty the disbelievers shall swear that they had not remained more than an hour in the grave. God exalted be He says That is how they use to be deceived how they used to be turned away from the truth — the Resurrection — similar to the way in which they have now been turned away from the real truth about how long they had remained."
"The promise of God wa‘da’Llāhi is the verbal noun substituting for the full verbal construction; it is actually wa‘adahumu’Llāhu al-nasr ‘God promised them victory’. God does not fail His promise of such help but most people namely the disbelievers of Mecca are not aware of His promise to help them to victory."
"Have they not contemplated themselves? so that they might emerge from their oblivion. God did not create the heavens and the earth and what is between them except with the truth and an appointed term for that creation at the conclusion of which this creation will perish and after which will be the Resurrection. But indeed many people that is to say such as the Meccan disbelievers disbelieve in the encounter with their Lord that is they do not believe in resurrection after death."
"Have they not travelled in the land and beheld how was the consequence for those before them? of past communities which was that they were destroyed for denying their messengers. They were more powerful than them — such were ‘Ād and Thamūd — and they effected the land they tilled it and churned it up to sow crops and cultivate trees and developed it more than these the Meccan disbelievers have developed it; and their messengers brought them clear signs manifest proofs for God would never wrong them by destroying them without being guilty but they used to wrong themselves by denying their messengers."
"Do you not see do you not realise O you who are being addressed that God has disposed for you whatever is in the heavens such as the sun the moon and the stars that you may benefit from them and whatever is in the earth of fruits rivers and animals and He has showered He has made abundant and made complete His favours upon you both outwardly namely by giving you your wholesome form even limbs and otherwise and inwardly? that is by giving you knowledge and so on. Yet among people that is people such as the Meccan disbelievers there are those who dispute concerning God without any knowledge or guidance from a messenger or an illuminating scripture revealed by God rather they dispute by blindly imitating others."
"And if waves cover them that is if these rise above the disbelievers like awnings like mountains that act as awnings over those below them they call on God sincere before Him in their faith that is in their supplication that He may deliver them in other words they do not call on any other god with Him; but when He delivers them to land some of them compromise middling between belief and disbelief while others persist in their disbelief. And none denies Our signs an example of which is Our delivering them from such treacherous waves except every perfidious ingrate ungrateful for God’s graces exalted be He."
"And if could you but see the guilty the disbelievers hanging their heads low before their Lord lowering them in shame saying ‘Our Lord! We have seen the resurrection that we denied and heard from You the confirmation of the truth of the messengers concerning that in which we used to call them liars. So send us back to the world so that we may act righteously therein for indeed we are convinced’ now. But none of this is of any use to them and they will not be sent back the response to the conditional clause beginning with law ‘if’ is an implicit ‘you would see a terrible thing’."
"Is he who is a believer like him who is a transgressor? They are not equal namely the believers and the transgressors."
"Or is it not an indication for them how many generations communities on account of their disbelief We destroyed before them that is to say has not Our destruction of many generations become clear to the disbelievers of Mecca amid whose dwellings they walk yamshūna is a circumstantial qualifier referring to the person of the pronoun lahum ‘for them’ during their travels to Syria and other places so that they might take heed? Surely in that there are signs indications of Our power. Are they not able to hear? in a way so as to reflect and be admonished."
"And they say to the believers ‘When will this decisive Judgement between us and yourselves be if you are truthful?’"
"Say ‘On the day of this Judgement which will be effected by sending the chastisement on them their newly found faith then shall not benefit those who had been disbelievers nor shall they be given respite to make repentance or offer excuses."
"God is He Who created the heavens and the earth and whatever is between them in six days the first of which was Sunday and the last of which was Friday then He presided upon the Throne al-‘arsh in the classical Arabic idiom denotes the seat of a king a presiding worthy of Him. You do not have O disbelievers of Mecca besides Him in other words other than Him any protector min waliyyin is the subject of the particle mā with the min added extra in other words any helper or intercessor to ward off His chastisement from you. Will you not then remember? this and become believers."
"O Prophet! Fear God remain in fear of Him and do not obey the disbelievers and the hypocrites and so follow them in what contravenes your Law. Truly God is Knower of what will happens before it happens Wise in what He creates."
"it was there that the believers were sorely tried there they were tested to distinguish the sincere individual from the one otherwise and were shaken with a mighty shock because of the severity of the terror."
"They suppose that the confederates of disbelievers have not yet departed to Mecca because of their fear of them and were the confederates to come a second time they would wish that they were in the desert with the Bedouins asking about your news your encounters with the disbelievers. And if they were among you this second time they would fight but a little for show and for fear of being reviled."
"And when the believers saw the confederates of disbelievers they said ‘This is what God and His Messenger promised us in the way of trial and assistance to victory and God and His Messenger were truthful’ about the promise. And that only increased them in faith in belief in God’s promise and submission to His command."
"Among the believers are men who are true to the covenant they made with God in steadfastly remaining alongside the Prophet s. Some of them have fulfilled their vow having died or been killed fighting for God’s cause and some are still awaiting for this fate and they have not changed their commitment to the covenant in the least and they stand in contrast to the situation with the hypocrites;"
"And God repulsed those who were disbelievers namely the confederates in their rage without their attaining any good without achieving their desire in any way to triumph over the believers. And God spared the believers from fighting by unleashing the wind and the angels. And truly God is Strong in bringing about what He wants Mighty prevailing with His way."
"And when idh is dependent because of an implied preceding udhkur ‘mention when’ you said to him to whom God had shown favour by guiding him to Islam and to whom you too had shown favour by manumitting him — this was Zayd b. Hāritha who had been a prisoner of war before the coming of Islam in the period of al-jāhiliyya. The Messenger of God s purchased him before his call to prophethood and then manumitted him and adopted him as his son — ‘Retain your wife for yourself and fear God’ before divorcing her. But you had hidden in your heart what God was to disclose what He was to manifest of your love for her and of the fact that should Zayd part with her you would marry her and you feared people would say ‘He has married his son’s wife!’ though God is worthier that you should fear Him in all things so take her in marriage and do not be concerned with what people say. Zayd subsequently divorced her and her obligatory waiting period was completed. God exalted be He says So when Zayd had fulfilled whatever need he had of her We joined her in marriage to you — the Prophet consummated his marriage with her without the customary permission from her legal guardian and gratified the Muslims with a feast of bread and meat — so that there may not be any restriction for the believers in respect of the wives of their adopted sons when the latter have fulfilled whatever wish they have of them. And God’s commandment that which He has decreed is bound to be realised."
"God has not placed two hearts inside any man this was revealed in order to refute those disbelievers who said that they each had two hearts with which they could reason better than Muhammad’s single mind; nor has He made your wives whom read as allā’ī or allā’ you repudiate by zihār read tazzahharūna or tuzāhirūna; the original tā’ of tatazāharūna has been assimilated with the zā’ — a man would say to his wife for example ‘You are for me as untouchable as my mother’s back’ — your mothers in other words He has not made you wives like your mothers so that they are illicit for conjugality in that respect a practice which in pre-Islamic times was considered a valid form of divorce. An atonement with necessary conditions is necessary in such a case as mentioned in sūrat al-Mujādila Q. 582-3. Nor has He made those whom you claim as adopted sons ad‘iyā’ the plural of da‘iyy which is one claimed as the son of one who is not his biological father your sons in reality. That is a mere utterance of your mouths namely of the Jews and the hypocrites. When the Prophet s married Zaynab bt. Jahsh who had been Zayd b. Hāritha’s wife the adopted son of the Prophet s they said ‘Muhammad married his son’s wife!’ and so God proved them liars in this. But God speaks the truth in this matter and He guides to the way the way of truth."
"It is He Who blesses you that is to say Who shows mercy to you and His angels ask forgiveness for you that He may bring you forth that He may always bring you forth from darkness namely from disbelief into light namely faith. And He is Merciful to the believers."
"And give good tidings to the believers that there will be for them a great bounty from God namely Paradise."
"And do not obey the disbelievers and the hypocrites in assenting to do what contravenes your Law; and disregard leave aside their injuriousness — do not retaliate against them for it until you receive a command from God regarding how to deal with them. And put your trust in God for He will suffice you and God suffices as Guardian One to Whom matters are entrusted."
"O Prophet! Indeed We have made lawful for you your wives whom you have given their dowries and what your right hand owns of those whom God has given you as spoils of war from the disbelievers whom you have taken captive such as Safiyya and Juwayriyya and the daughters of your paternal uncles and the daughters of your paternal aunts and the daughters of your maternal uncles and the daughters of your maternal aunts who emigrated with you as opposed to those who did not emigrate and any believing woman if she gift herself in marriage to the Prophet and if the Prophet desire to take her in marriage and ask for her hand in marriage without paying her a dowry — a privilege for you exclusively not for the rest of the believers nikāh ‘marriage’ when expressed by the term hiba ‘gift’ denotes marriage without dowry. Indeed We know what We have imposed upon them namely the believers with respect to their wives in the way of rulings to the effect that they should not take more than four wives and should only marry with the consent of a legal guardian the presence of witnesses and the payment of a dowry and with respect to what their right hands own of slavegirls in the way of purchase or otherwise so that the handmaiden be one lawful for her master such as a slavegirl belonging to the People of the Scripture kitābiyya and not a Magian or an idolater and that she should be ascertained as not carrying child with the necessary waiting period istibrā’ before copulation; so that li-kaylā is semantically connected to what came before this last statement there may be no unnecessary restriction for you no constraint in marriage for you. And God is Forgiving of what is difficult to guard against Merciful in giving dispensations allowing for latitude in this respect."
"Indeed those who are injurious to God and His Messenger — and they are the disbelievers who attribute to God what He is exalted above of such things as His having a son or a partner and they deny His Messenger — God has cursed them in this world and the Hereafter He has banished them from His mercy and has prepared for them a humiliating chastisement and that is the Fire."
"O Prophet! Tell your wives and daughters and the women of the believers to draw their cloaks closely over themselves jalābīb is the plural of jilbāb which is a wrap that covers a woman totally — in other words let them pull part of it also over their faces leaving one eye visible when they need to leave the house for something. That makes it likelier that they will be known to be free women and not be molested by being approached. In contrast slavegirls did not use to cover their faces and so the disbelievers used to pester them. And God is Forgiving of any occasion in the past when they may have neglected to cover themselves Merciful to them in His veiling them."
"The Prophet is closer to the believers than their own souls in terms of what he calls them to and what their own souls have called them to contravene and his wives are their mothers insofar as they the believers are forbidden to marry them. And those related by blood kinsmen are more entitled to inherit from one another in the Book of God than the other believers and the Emigrants in other words than inheriting on account of their sharing faith and the Emigration which had been the case at the beginning of Islam but was then abrogated; barring any favour you may do your friends by making a bequest which is permissible. This namely the abrogation of inheritance on account of shared faith and Emigration by the inheritance on account of kinship is written in the Book — in both instances al-kitāb ‘the Book’ denotes the Preserved Tablet al-lawh al-mahfūz."
"If la-in the lām is for oaths the hypocrites do not desist from their hypocrisy and likewise those in whose hearts is a sickness in their urge to fornicate as well as the scaremongers in the city who alarm the believers by saying to them things like ‘Your enemy is here and your raiding parties have been massacred!’ or they say to them ‘They have been defeated!’. Assuredly We will urge you to take action against them We will give you sway over them then they will not be your neighbours they will not dwell near you in it except for a little while after which they will depart."
"God’s precedent in other words God has made this His precedent in dealing with those who passed away before with regard to the hypocrites of past communities who used to alarm believers with their scaremongery and you will find that there is no changing God’s precedent no changing of it from Him."
"God has indeed cursed the disbelievers He has banished them from His mercy and prepared for them a blaze a violent fire into which they shall be admitted"
"so that God may chastise li-yu‘adhdhiba the lām therein is semantically connected to ‘aradnā ‘We offered’ which resulted in ‘Adam’s undertaking’ the hypocrites men and women and the idolaters men and women those who forsake the Trust and that God may relent to the believing men and believing women who fulfil the Trust. And God is Forgiving to believers Merciful to them."
"that He God may question the truthful about their truthfulness in delivering the Message as a way thereby to justifiably reproach the disbelievers; and He exalted be He has prepared for those who disbelieve in them a painful chastisement ‘adhāban alīman is a supplement to akhadhnā ‘We took’."
"O you who believe! Remember God’s favour to you when hosts of disbelievers came against you as confederates at the time the Ditch al-khandaq was being dug and We unleashed against them a great wind and hosts of angels you did not see. And God is ever Seer of what you do read ta‘malūna to imply ‘in the way of your digging of the ditch’; or read ya‘malūna ‘of what they do’ to imply ‘the idolaters’ forming of a confederation’."
"But they were disregardful of giving thanks to Him and became disbelievers so We unleashed upon them the flood of the Dam al-‘arim is the plural of ‘arima which is a structure or something similar that holds water back to be stored for when it is needed in other words We unleashed upon them the flood-waters of their valley which had been held back by the mentioned structure so that they engulfed their two gardens together with all their property. And We gave them in place of their two gardens two gardens bearing dhawātay a dual form of feminine plural dhawāt; usually the form dhātay from the singular would have been used bitter fruit bitter and vile ukul may be read as a genitive annexation ukulin khamtin in the sense of ‘that which is eaten thereof being bitter; or it may be read without as ukuli khamtin; and this phrase is supplemented by the following wa-athlin wa-shay’in min sidrin qalīl and tamarisk and sparse lote trees."
"And verily Iblīs proved true read sadaqa or saddaqa his opinion of them that is of the disbelievers among them — the folk of Sheba — which was that by his tempting them to go astray they would follow him. So they followed him if the verb above is read sadaqa this would mean that ‘he was right in his opinion’ and if read saddaqa it would mean that ‘he found this opinion of his to be true’ — all except a group of the believers mina’l-mu’minīna the min ‘of’ is explicative not partitive in other words all except that group who were the believers they did not follow him."
"Say O Muhammad (s) to the disbelievers of Mecca ‘Call on those whom you have asserted those whom you have asserted to be gods besides God in other words other than Him so that they might benefit you as you are wont to assert. God exalted be He says of them They do not possess even so much as the weight of an atom of good or evil in the heavens or in the earth and they do not have any share in either of them nor has He exalted be He among them the gods any auxiliary’ anyone required as His helper."
"And We did not send you except to all kāffatan is a circumstantial qualifier referring to al-nās ‘mankind’ and is made to precede li’l-nās because of the importance attached to it of mankind both as a bearer of good tidings to believers of Paradise and a warner to the disbelievers of chastisement but most people such as the disbelievers of Mecca do not know this."
"And those who disbelieve from among the people of Mecca say ‘We will not believe in this Qur’ān nor in that which was revealed before it’ — in other words what preceded it such as the Torah and the Gospel both of which contain proofs of the Resurrection — because they reject the truth of this last. God exalted be He says of them But if you were to see O Muhammad (s) when the evildoers the disbelievers are brought to stand before their Lord bandying arguments against one another. Those who were oppressed — the followers — will say to those who were arrogant — the leaders ‘Had it not been for you barring us from faith we would have been believers’ in the Prophet."
"And those who were oppressed will say to those who were arrogant ‘Nay but it was your scheming night and day in other words such were your schemes against us during both of these times when you used to command us to disbelieve in God and set up partners with Him’. And they that is the two parties will conceal their remorse for not having believed in Him when they see the chastisement in other words each person will hide it his remorse from the next for fear of being reviled; and We will place fetters around the necks of the disbelievers while they are in the Fire. Shall they be requited except the requital for what they used to do? in the world."
"And they say ‘We possess more wealth and children than those who are believers and we shall not be chastised’."
"Say ‘Truly my Lord extends provision He makes it abundant for whomever He will as a test and restricts it for whomever He will to try them but most people such as the disbelievers of Mecca do not know’ this truth."
"They will say ‘Glory be to You exalted above that You should have an associate! You are our Supporter not they in other words as far as we are concerned there are no bonds of association between us and them. Nay bal is to indicate transition rather they used to worship the jinn the devils in other words they used to obey them and agree to worship us; most of them were believers in them’ accepting as truth what these jinn used to say to them."
"And those who have been given knowledge — the believers from among the People of the Scripture such as ‘Abd Allāh b. Salām and his companions — see they know that what has been revealed to you from your Lord that is the Qur’ān is the decisive truth and that it guides to the path the way of the Mighty the Praised in other words of God the Lord of Might Who is ever-praised."
"nor are the living equal to the dead the believers and the disbelievers respectively the addition of the particle lā ‘nor’ in all three instances is for emphasis. Indeed God makes to hear whomever He will to be guided so that such a person then responds to Him by embracing faith. But you cannot make those who are in the graves to hear namely the disbelievers — whom He has likened to the dead — to hear and so respond."
"And of humans and beasts and cattle there are diverse hues likewise like the diversity of the hues of fruits and mountains. Indeed only those of God’s servants who have knowledge fear Him in contrast to the ignorant such as the disbelievers of Mecca. Truly God is Mighty in His kingdom Forgiving of the sins of His faithful servants."
"While therein they will be crying out calling for help in distress howling and saying ‘Our Lord! Bring us forth from it and we will act righteously other than how we used to act’. But it will be said to them ‘Did We not give you long life enough time in which to take heed for him who would take heed? And moreover the warner the Messenger came to you but you did not respond to his call so taste now this chastisement! For the evildoers the disbelievers have no helper’ to ward off from them the chastisement."
"It is He Who made you successors in the earth khalā’if ‘successors’ is the plural of khalīfa in other words one succeeding the other. So whoever disbelieves of you his disbelief will be to his own detriment that is the evil consequences of his disbelief will be so. And their disbelief does not increase the disbelievers with their Lord in anything except disfavour wrath. And their disbelief does not increase the disbelievers in anything except loss of the reward of the Hereafter."
"Say ‘Have you considered your associates on whom you call those whom you worship besides God? in other words other than God — and they are the idols whom you asserted to be partners of God exalted be He. Show me apprise me of what part of the earth they have created. Or do they have some partnership some share alongside God in the creation of the heavens?’ Or have We given them a scripture so that they are acting upon a clear proof a definitive argument therefrom? to the effect that they have some partnership with Me? Nothing of the sort! Nay but the evildoers the disbelievers promise one another nothing but delusion falsehood when they say that the idols will intercede for them."
"Truly God sustains the heavens and the earth lest they disappear in other words He prevents them from disappearing. And if wa-la-in the lām is for oaths they were to disappear there is none that can sustain them after Him in other words other than Him. Truly He is ever Forbearing Forgiving in deferring the punishment of the disbelievers."
"And they that is the disbelievers of Mecca swore by God their most solemn oaths they swore with utmost effort to be sincere in them that if a warner a messenger were to come to them they would be more readily guided than any one of the communities than the Jews the Christians or others in other words more readily guided than any one of these — having themselves seen the extent to which these groups called each other liars given that The Jews say ‘The Christians stand on nothing’ and the Christians say ‘The Jews stand on nothing’ Q. 2113. But when a warner namely Muhammad (s) did come to them this coming of his only increased them in aversion further away from right guidance"
"Were God to take mankind to task for what they have acquired of acts of disobedience He would not leave on its surface that is the earth’s a single creature a single living thing moving thereon. But He reprieves them to an appointed term namely to the Day of Resurrection. And when their term comes — then truly they will know that God is ever Seer of His servants and so He will requite them according to the nature of their deeds rewarding the believers and punishing the disbelievers."
"on a ‘alā is semantically connected to the preceding statement straight path that is you follow the way of the prophets before you enjoining the affirmation of God’s Oneness and guidance the emphasis expressed by the oath in ‘by the definitive Qur’ān’ and the remainder of the statement is a response to the disbelievers’ saying to him ‘You have not been sent by God!’ Q. 1343."
"They the disbelievers among them will say ‘O yā is for calling attention to something woe to us! waylanā means halākanā ‘O our destruction!’ and it is a verbal noun which has no regular verbal conjugation Who has raised us from our place of sleep? they say this because they will have been asleep in the interval between the two blasts and will not have been punished yet. This that is this raising is that which the Compassionate One had promised and regarding which the messengers had spoken the truth’ they affirm this truth when such affirmation is no longer of any benefit to them — but it is also said that this is said to them."
"And He says ‘Stand apart O you sinners on this day! in other words separate yourselves from the believers — said to them upon their mingling with the latter."
"Today We shall seal up their mouths namely the mouths of the disbelievers for their saying By God our Lord we were never idolaters!’ Q. 623; and their hands shall speak to Us and their feet shall bear witness as will other parts of their bodies concerning what they used to earn and so each limb will speak of that sinful action which issued from it."
"And whomever We give long life by prolonging his term of life We cause him to regress nankushu; a variant reading has 2nd verbal form nunakkishu derived from al-tankīs in creation that is in terms of his physical form so that after having enjoyed strength and youth he becomes feeble and decrepit. Will they then not understand? that One Who is able to effect such a state — with which they are familiar — is also able to resurrect that they might then become believers? a variant reading for ya‘qilūna ‘they understand’ has the second person plural ta‘qilūna ‘you understand’."
"that he may warn li-yundhira; or read li-tundhira ‘that you may warn’ therewith whoever is alive able to comprehend what is being said to him — and such are the believers — and that the Word of chastisement from God may be fulfilled against the disbelievers who are like the dead unable to comprehend what is said to them."
"And there are other benefits for them therein such as their wool fur and hairs and drinks made from their milk mashārib is the plural of mashrab meaning shurb ‘a drink’; or what is meant is the place from which the drink issues. Will they not then give thanks? to the One Who has bestowed these graces upon them and so become believers? In other words they do not do any of this."
"— all except God’s delivered servants namely the believers who will be saved from it"
"‘Peace from Us be to Elias!’. It is said that this ilyāsīn is the same Elias mentioned above; but it is also said that this denotes him together with all those who were believers with him and so they have been coupled under the same term with him being the predominant as when one might say al-Muhallabūn ‘the Muhallabids’ to mean al-Muhallab and his folk; a variant reading has āl yāsīn by which is meant his family as well as Elias himself."
"Then We destroyed all the others the disbelievers from among his people."
"So ask them inquire of the Meccan disbelievers by way of reproach are daughters to be for your Lord after their claim that the angels were God’s daughters while sons are to be for them? so that the best becomes exclusively theirs?"
"— all except God’s devoted servants namely believers the exceptive clause here is discontinuous in other words that is because they declare that God transcends what such individuals attribute to Him."
"And indeed in is softened in place of the hardened one they the Meccan disbelievers used to say"
"and assuredly Our hosts namely the believers they will indeed be the victors over the disbelievers by their being given the definitive proofs and assistance against them in this world. And if some of these believers are not victorious over them in this world then assuredly in the Hereafter they will be so."
"So leave them in other words shun the Meccan disbelievers for a while until such time as you are commanded to fight them;"
"And praise be to God Lord of the Worlds for granting these messengers victory and destroying the disbelievers."
"And they the disbelievers will say ‘O yā is for calling attention woe to us!’ O our destruction is here waylanā is a verbal noun without any regular verbal conjugation. And the angels will say to them ‘This is the Day of Retribution’ the Day of Reckoning and Requital."
"They the ones who were followed say to them the followers ‘On the contrary! You were simply not believers for it would only be true that we led you astray if you had actually been believers in the first place and then rejected faith and followed us."
"Except for God’s sincere servants namely the believers the exception clause here is a discontinuous one"
"We have indeed made it for that reason sc. its being a tree in the Fire a trial for the wrongdoers? namely for the disbelievers of Mecca for they said ‘Fire consumes trees so how can it make them grow forth?’"
"And indeed they the disbelievers will eat of it despite its vileness because of the severity of their hunger and will fill their bellies from it."
"So behold how was the consequence for them who were warned namely the disbelievers in other words the sequel for them was that they ended up in the chastisement;"
"all except God’s sincere servants namely the believers who are saved from chastisement because they were sincere in their worship mukhlisīna; or if one reads mukhlasīna because God has made them sincerely devoted to such worship."
"Then We did drown the others the disbelievers from among his folk."
"Sād God knows best what He means by this letter. By the Qur’ān bearing the Remembrance that is bearing the Pronouncement; or what is meant is that the Qur’ān is a Book of renown the response to this oath has been omitted in other words ‘It is not as the Meccan disbelievers say that there are many gods’."
"And these that is the disbelievers of Mecca do not await but a single Cry namely the Blast of the Resurrection that will herald chastisement for them for which there will be no revoking read fawāq or fuwāq."
"‘O David! We have indeed made you a vicegerent on the earth managing the affairs of people; so judge justly between people and do not follow desire that is the desires of the soul that it then lead you astray from the way of God that is to say from the proofs that indicate the truth of His Oneness. Truly those who go astray from the way of God in other words from belief in God — for them there will be a severe chastisement because of their forgetting the Day of Reckoning’ as a result of their having neglected faith. For had they been certain of the truth of the Day of Reckoning they would have first been believers in this world."
"And We did not create the heavens and the earth and all that is between them in vain frivolously. That namely the creation of what has been mentioned as being for no particular purpose is the supposition of those who disbelieve from among the people of Mecca. So woe — a valley in hell-fire — to the disbelievers from the Fire!"
"Or shall We treat those who believe and perform righteous deeds like those who cause corruption in the earth; or shall We treat the God-fearing like the profligate? This was revealed when the Meccan disbelievers said to the believers ‘In the Hereafter we will receive the same reward as that which you will receive’ am ‘or’ contains the rhetorical hamza of denial."
"A Book kitābun the predicate of a missing subject namely hādhā ‘this is’ that We have revealed to you full of blessing that they may contemplate yaddabbarū is actually yatadabbarū but the tā’ has been assimilated with the dāl its signs that they may reflect upon its meanings and become believers and that they may remember that they may be admonished — those people of pith those possessors of intellect."
"How many — in other words many — a generation a community of past communities We have destroyed before them and they cried out when the chastisement was sent down on them when it was no longer the time for escape that is to say the time was not one for fleeing the suffixed tā’ of wa-lāta is extra; the sentence is a circumstantial qualifier referring to the subject of the verb nādaw ‘they cried out’ in other words they called for help but the situation was such that there could be no escape or deliverance; but still the Meccan disbelievers have not taken heed from their example."
"That which is mentioned will be the reward for the believers is so; but for the insolent this is a new sentence there will surely be an evil place of return —"
"And they the disbelievers of Mecca say while they are in the Fire ‘What is the matter with us that we do not see here men whom we used to count in the world among the wicked?"
"Say O Muhammad (s) to the disbelievers of Mecca ‘I am only a warner to threaten disbelievers with punishment in the Fire. And there is no god except God the One the All-Compelling of all His creatures;"
"except Iblīs the father of the jinn who was among the audience of angels; he was disdainful and he was one of the disbelievers according to God’s knowledge exalted be He."
"except those servants of Yours among them who will be saved’ namely the believers."
"And you will assuredly come to know O disbelievers of Mecca its tiding the news of its truth in due time’ that is to say on the Day of Resurrection ‘ilm ‘knowing’ is here being used in the sense of ‘urf ‘experience’; the prefixed lām in la-ta‘lamunna ‘you will assuredly know’ is for an implicit oath in other words what is meant is wa’Llāhi la-ta‘lamunna ‘By God you will assuredly know’."
"Say ‘O servants of Mine who believe! Fear your Lord that is to say fear His chastisement by being obedient to Him. For those who are virtuous in this world through obedience there will be good and that is Paradise and God’s earth is vast so emigrate throughout it away from the company of disbelievers and the sight of indecencies. Truly the steadfast in their obedience of God and in enduring whatever hardship they may be tested with will be paid their reward in full without any reckoning’ without any measure or any scales to work it out."
"So worship whatever you wish besides Him’ other than Him — herein is a threat for them as well as a declaration of the fact that they do not worship God exalted be He. Say ‘Indeed the losers are those who will have lost their souls and their families on the Day of Resurrection by condemning their souls to abide forever in the Fire and their failure to attaining the bliss promised among the black-eyed virgins who would have been prepared for them in Paradise had they been believers. Truly that is the manifest loss!’"
"Is he who will be fending off is he who will encounter with his face the awful chastisement on the Day of Resurrection …? that is the most severe chastisement when he is flung into the Fire with his hands bound to his neck in fetters is he like one who will be secure from it by entering Paradise? And it will be said to the wrongdoers namely the disbelievers of Mecca ‘Taste now what you used to earn’ that is taste the requital for it."
"Surely to God belongs pure religion none other than Him being deserving of it. And those who take besides Him the idols as patrons and they are the disbelievers of Mecca — they say ‘We only worship them so that they may bring us near to God’ zulfā a verbal noun with the sense of taqrīban ‘for the sake of nearness’. God will indeed judge between them and the Muslims concerning that about which they differ of religion and so admit the believers into Paradise and the disbelievers into the Fire. Truly God does not guide one who is a liar attributing a child to Him a disbeliever worshipping other than God."
"So who is — in other words none is — a greater wrongdoer than he who imputes falsehood to God by ascribing partners and child to Him and who denies the truth namely the Qur’ān when it reaches him? Is there not a fitting abode in Hell for the disbelievers? Indeed there is."
"And he who brings the truth — and that is the Prophet s — and those who confirm it namely the believers here alladhī ‘he who’ has the significance of alladhīna ‘those who’ those they are the ones who guard themselves against idolatry."
"or before that it should say when it sees the chastisement ‘If only there had been a second chance a return to this world I would be among the virtuous’ the believers. It is then said to him by God"
"‘Yes indeed! My signs came to you the Qur’ān — which is the means to guidance — but you denied them and were arrogant you disdained to believe in them and you were among the disbelievers’."
"If you are ungrateful indeed God is Independent of you though He does not approve of ingratitude for His servants even if He should will it to manifest itself in some of them. And if you give thanks to God and thus become believers He will approve of it read yardah or yardahu either lengthening the vowel or not that is of such thankfulness for you. And no burdened soul shall bear the burden of another soul in other words it will not bear the responsibility for it. Then to your Lord will be your return whereat He will inform you of what you used to do. Indeed He is Knower of what is in the breasts of what is in the hearts of men."
"And those who disbelieve will be driven violently to Hell in troops in separate groups until when they reach it its gates are opened futihat abwābuhā is the response to idhā ‘when’ and its keepers will say to them ‘Did there not come to you any messengers from among yourselves reciting to you the signs of your Lord the Qur’ān and otherwise and warning you of the encounter of this day of yours?’ They will say ‘Yes indeed; but the word of chastisement — namely the verse Assuredly I will fill Hell … Q. 11119 — against the disbelievers has been fulfilled’."
"And those who feared their Lord will be driven gently to Paradise in troops until when they reach it and its gates are opened wa-futihat the wāw here indicates a circumstantial qualifier implying qad ‘already’ and its keepers will say to them ‘Peace be to you! You are good! tibtum a circumstantial qualifier So enter it to abide therein’ — enter it with the decree that you are to abide in it forever the response to idhā ‘when’ is implicit and is in other words dakhalūhā ‘they enter it’. The manner of their being driven as well as the opening of the gates before their arrival is a way of honouring them; the driving of the disbelievers however and the opening of the gates only upon their arrival so that all of its heat is retained for them is a means of humiliating them."
"And you will see the angels encircling hāffīna a circumstantial qualifier all round the Throne from its every side glorifying yusabbihūn is a circumstantial qualifier referring to the person of the participle hāffīn with praise of their Lord continuously proclaiming His praise — in other words saying subhāna’Llāhi wa-bi-hamdih ‘Glory and praise be to God!’ — and judgement will be made between them that is between all creatures with truth in other words with justice so that believers enter Paradise while the disbelievers enter the Fire and it will be said ‘Praise be to God the Lord of the Worlds!’ — the final establishing of both groups in their respective abodes is concluded with this angelic praise."
"Indeed to those who disbelieve it will be proclaimed to them from the part of the angels as they disbelievers enter the Fire in utter loathing of themselves ‘Surely God’s loathing of you is greater than your loathing of yourselves as you were called during life in this world to faith but you used to disbelieve’."
"So supplicate God worship Him devoting your religion purely to Him free from any idolatry however much the disbelievers be averse to its being free of such idolatry."
"Exalter of ranks either means that God is One Whose attributes are majestic — or it means the raiser of the ranks of believers in Paradise — Lord of the Throne in other words the Creator thereof He casts the Spirit the Revelation of His command that is of His words upon whomever He will of His servants that he the one upon whom it is cast may warn them of that he may make people fear the Day of Encounter read yawma’l-talāqi omitting the final long yā’ or yawma’l-talāqī that is to say the Day of Resurrection so called because thereat the inhabitants of the heavens will encounter those of the earth and the worshipper will encounter the one whom he worshipped and the wrongdoer will encounter the person whom he wronged;"
"And God decrees with truth while those on whom they call whom they worship that is the disbelievers of Mecca read yad‘ūna ‘they call’ or tad‘ūna ‘you call’ besides Him — and these are the idols — do not decree by any means at all so how can they be God’s associates? Truly God is the Hearer of their sayings the Seer of their actions."
"So when he brought them the truth from Us they said ‘Slay the sons of those who believe with him and spare keep alive their women’. But the guile of the disbelievers is ever in error in perdition."
"Forgiver of sins for believers and Accepter of repentance from them al-tawb is the verbal noun Severe in punishment of disbelievers — in other words One Who makes it severe for them — One of abundant bounty bestower of abundant grace — God is eternally possessed of all of these attributes and so the annexation construction using the derivatives of these attributes is for the purposes of characterisation as in the case of the last. There is no god except Him; to Him is the journeying the ultimate return."
"No doubt verily that to which you call me to worship has no call that is heard in other words has no call answered in this world or in the Hereafter and indeed our return will be to God and indeed the prodigal the disbelievers it is they who will be the inhabitants of the Fire."
"And mention when they will be arguing when they the disbelievers will be disputing with one another in the Fire and the weak will say to those who were arrogant ‘Indeed we were your followers taba‘an is the plural of tābi‘; so will you now avail will you defend us against any portion of the Fire?’"
"Those who were arrogant will say ‘Indeed we are all together in it. God has indeed judged fairly between His servants’ admitting believers into Paradise and disbelievers into the Fire."
"They that is the keepers will say mockingly ‘Did not your messengers bring you clear signs?’ manifest miracles? They will say ‘Yes indeed’ — in other words they disbelieved them. They will say ‘Then supplicate God!’ yourselves for we do not intercede for disbelievers. God exalted be He says but the supplications of the disbelievers can only be misguided void."
"Truly We shall help Our messengers and those who believe in the life of this world and on the day when the witnesses rise up ashhād is the plural of shāhid — these are the angels who will testify in support of the messengers that they indeed delivered their Messages and against the disbelievers that they denied them;"
"The following was revealed regarding the deniers of resurrection Assuredly the creation of the heavens and the earth as an unprecedented first act is greater than the creation of mankind a second time — which is the restoration of them after death; but most people namely the disbelievers of Mecca do not know this and so they are like the blind whereas those who know it are like those who have sight."
"He it is Who created you from dust by having created your father Adam from it then from a drop of sperm then from a blood-clot congealed blood then He brings you forth as infants then He sustains you that you may come of age until you have attained your full strength — this being from the age of thirty to forty — then that you may become aged read shuyūkhan or shiyūkhan— though there are some of you who die earlier that is before coming of age or becoming aged. He does this to you so that you may live on and that you may complete an appointed term a defined length of time that perhaps you might understand the proofs of His Oneness and thus become believers."
"those who deny the Book the Qur’ān and that wherewith We have sent Our messengers in the way of the affirmation of God’s Oneness and belief in the Resurrection — and these deniers are the Meccan disbelievers. But they will come to know the punishment for their denials;"
"besides God?’ alongside Him and these are the idols. They will say ‘They have forsaken abandoned us and so we cannot see them. Nay but actually we were not invoking anything before’. They deny that they used to worship these idols; but then these idols are brought before them — which is where God exalted be He says ‘Truly you and what you worship besides God shall be fuel for Hell’ Q. 2198. So in the same way that these disbelievers have been led astray God leads astray the disbelievers."
"And verily We sent messengers before you. Of them are those whom We have recounted to you and of them are those whom We have not recounted to you it is reported that God exalted be He sent 8000 prophets 4000 prophets sent from among the Children of Israel and the other 4000 from among the remainder of mankind. And it was never permitted for any messenger from among them to bring a sign except with God’s permission for they are also servants enthralled by Him. Hence when God’s command comes for the chastisement to be sent down on the disbelievers judgement between the messengers and their deniers is passed justly; and it is thence that the advocates of falsehood become losers that is to say it is thence that the judgement and the loss become manifest for mankind although such advocates of falsehood will have always been losers always before that."
"And when their messengers brought them clear signs manifest miracles they the disbelievers exulted in the knowledge they the messengers possessed an exultation that entailed mockery and amusement as they rejected such knowledge and there besieged befell them that which they used to deride namely the chastisement."
"But their faith was of no benefit to them when they saw Our doom — This is God’s way sunnata’Llāhi is in the accusative because it functions as a verbal noun from an implicit verb of the same expression with the believers among all communities which is that faith is of no benefit to them once the chastisement has been sent down which has its precdent; and it is thence that the disbelievers will be losers — it is thence that their status as losers will become apparent to all of mankind even though they will have always been losers before that."
"But if they that is the Meccan disbelievers turn away from belief after this clear statement then say ‘I warn you of I threaten you with a thunderbolt like the thunderbolt of ‘Ād and Thamūd’ in other words a chastisement that will destroy you like the one that destroyed them."
"Nothing is said to you in terms of denial of you except the like of what has already been said to the messengers before you. Surely your Lord is One of forgiveness to believers and also One of painful punishment for disbelievers."
"Man never wearies of supplicating for good in other words he never ceases to ask his Lord for wealth and good health and other good things but should any ill befall him such as impoverishment or hardship then he becomes despondent despairing of God’s mercy — this and what follows relates to the attitude of disbelievers."
"Say ‘Consider this if it the Qur’ān is from God as the Prophet says and you disbelieve in it who — in other words none — will be further astray than one who is in extreme defiance?’ of the truth this third person singular address is used instead of ‘who will be further astray than you’ in order to point out their status as disbelievers."
"who do not pay the alms and who are disbelievers in the Hereafter the repetition of hum ‘they’ is for emphasis."
"And whatever you may differ with disbelievers in of religion or otherwise the verdict therein belongs it will return to God on the Day of Resurrection; He will judge between you. Say to them That then is God my Lord; in Him I have put my trust and to Him I turn penitently."
"And they did not become divided that is the adherents of the monotheistic religions did not become divided in religion — so that some affirmed the Oneness of God while others rejected it — except after the knowledge of His Oneness had come to them out of jealous rivalry on the part of the disbelievers among themselves. And were it not for a Word that preceded from your Lord to defer requital of them until an appointed term until the Day of Resurrection it would have already been judged between them to chastise the disbelievers in this world. And indeed those who were made heirs to the Scripture after them namely the Jews and the Christians are truly in grave doubt concerning him Muhammad (s)."
"Or have they the Meccan disbelievers associates — these being their devils — who have prescribed for them for the disbelievers a religion a corrupt religion which God has not given permission for? such as idolatry and denial of resurrection? And were it not for a prior decisive word in other words a prior decree to the effect that requital will take place on the Day of Resurrection it would have been judged between them and the believers by chastising the former in this world. Truly the wrongdoers the disbelievers will have a painful chastisement."
"And He answers those who believe and perform righteous deeds He grants them what they ask for and He enhances them of His bounty. And as for the disbelievers for them there will be a severe chastisement."
"And He it is Who sends down the saving rain after they have despaired after they have given up hope of its being sent down and unfolds His mercy He extends His rain and He is the true Patron the Benevolent towards believers the Praised by them."
"And whatever affliction whatever misfortune or hardship may befall you — this is an address to the believers — is on account of what your own hands have earned that is to say for the sins that you have committed — the use of ‘hands’ to express this is because most actions are effected by them. And He pardons much of these sins and does not requite them for God’s kindness is greater than that He should for example double the requital in the Hereafter; as for those who do not commit grave sins then what befalls them in this world of hardship raises their degree in the reward of the Hereafter."
"So whatever you — this is an address is to believers and others — have been given of the luxuries of this world is but the enjoyment of the life of this world enjoyed for the duration of it but then perishes. But what is with God of reward is better and more lasting for those who believe and put their trust in their Lord li’lladhīna āmanū wa-‘alā rabbihim yatawakkalūna is supplemented by the following clause"
"And you will see them being exposed to it namely the Fire submissive fearful and humbled by abasement looking at it with a furtive glance a slight look stealthily min of min tarfin khafiyyin ‘with a furtive glance’ is to indicate inceptiveness or it functions with the sense of a bā’ ‘with’ sc. bi-tarfin khafiyyin. And those who believe will say ‘Verily the true losers are those who have lost themselves and their families on the Day of Resurrection for being condemned to abide forever in the Fire and for not being able to attain the blissful company of the houris prepared for them in Paradise had they been believers the relative clause alladhīna khasirū... ‘those who have lost …’ constitutes the predicate of the particle inna ‘verily’. Truly the wrongdoers the disbelievers will be in lasting everlasting chastisement — these words constitute God’s speech exalted be He."
"The heavens are well-nigh read yakādu or takādu rent asunder yanfatirna a variant reading has yatafattarna from above one another in other words well-nigh is each one torn away from above the one below it because of the magnitude of God exalted be He and the angels glorify with praise of their Lord in other words they are continuously engaged in praise of Him and ask forgiveness for those believers on earth. Verily God is the Forgiving to His friends the Merciful to them."
"And had God willed He would have made them one community in other words following one religion and that is Islam; but He admits whomever He will into His mercy and the evildoers the disbelievers have neither guardian nor helper to ward off the chastisement from them."
"Or have they taken idols as guardians besides Him? am ‘or’ is disjunctive functioning with the sense of bal ‘nay but’ the one used to denote a shift in the subject matter; the hamza is for denial in other words ‘those who are taken’ as guardians are not in fact guardians of anything. But God He alone is the Guardian in other words then One who helps believers the fā’ of fa’Llāhu is merely for coordination and He revives the dead and He has power over all things."
"But when the truth the Qur’ān came to them they said ‘This is sorcery and we are indeed disbelievers in it’."
"And they said to Moses upon seeing the chastisement ‘O sorcerer! — that is to say ‘O knowledgeable perfect one’ since for them sorcery was an awesome form of knowledge — supplicate your Lord for us by the covenant that He has made with you to the effect that He would relieve us from chastisement if we believe. Assuredly we will be guided’ that is to say we will become believers."
"Are they that is the Meccan disbelievers awaiting anything that is to say — they are in fact awaiting nothing — but that Hour should come upon them an ta’tiyahum substitutes for al-sā‘ata ‘the Hour’ suddenly unexpectedly while they are unaware? of the time of its coming beforehand."
"Or have they that is the disbelievers of Mecca contrived consolidated some matter? in plotting against the Prophet Muhammad (s). For We too are indeed contriving We too are consolidating Our plan to destroy them."
"And those whom they the disbelievers call on those whom they worship besides Him that is besides God have no power of intercession for anyone except those who bear witness to the truth that is those who say ‘there is no god except God’ with full knowledge in their hearts of what they have testified to with their tongues — such are Jesus Ezra and the angels who will intercede for believers."
"So neither the heaven nor the earth wept for them — in contrast to the case with believers at the point of whose death weep both their places of prayer on earth and the route by which their deeds ascend the heaven; nor were they reprieved nor were they deferred until they were able to make repentance."
"Indeed these ones that is the Meccan disbelievers say"
"We did not create them and all that is between them except with the truth that is to say We created them rightfully so that one might infer thereby Our power and Our Oneness and other matters; but most of them that is the Meccan disbelievers do not know."
"except for him on whom God has mercy — and these are the believers for they will intercede for one another with God’s permission. He is indeed the Mighty the Victor in His retribution of the disbelievers the Merciful to believers."
"For We have made it easy We have facilitated the Qur’ān in your tongue in your language so that the Arabs may understand it from you that perhaps they may remember that perhaps they may be admonished and become believers — but they do not believe."
"Tell those who believe to forgive those who do not anticipate those who do not fear the days of God the events which He precipitates that is to say forgive the disbelievers the harm which they have caused you — this was before the command to struggle against them had been revealed — that He God may requite a variant reading for li-yajziya has li-najziya ‘that We may requite’ a people for what they used to earn when they used to forgive disbelievers the harm which they did."
"Assuredly they will not avail they will not protect you in any way against God against His chastisement. And assuredly the wrongdoers the disbelievers are allies of one another; but God is the ally only of the God-fearing."
"Or am has the significance of the rhetorical hamza of denial do those who have perpetrated evil acts such as disbelief and disobedience suppose that We shall treat them as those who believe and perform righteous deeds equally sawā’an is the predicate in their life and in their death? mahyāhum wa-mamātuhum this clause constitutes the subject and a supplement; the sentence itself is a substitution for the kāf of ka’lladhīna ‘as those’ and both suffixed pronouns -hum refer to the disbelievers. The meaning is do they suppose that in the Hereafter We will assign them a good fate like believers that they will enjoy a life of plenty one equal to their life in this world as when they said to the believers ‘Surely if we were to be resurrected we will be given the same good things that you will be given!’ God exalted be He says in accordance with His denial implicit in the rhetorical interrogative hamza How evil is that judgement which they make! In other words it will not be so for in the Hereafter they will be suffering in the chastisement in contrast to their lives in this world; the believers on the other hand will be delighting in the Reward in the Hereafter because of their righteous deeds in this world such as their observance of prayers their alms-giving fasting and otherwise the mā ‘that … which’ relates to the verbal action that is to say ba’isa hukman hukmuhum hādhā ‘awful as a judgement is this judgement of theirs’."
"And to God belongs the kingdom of the heavens and the earth. And on the day when the Hour sets in yawma taqūmu’l-sā‘atu is substituted by the following yawma’idhin on that day the followers of falsehood the disbelievers will be losers that is to say their loss will become manifest by their ending up in the Fire."
"Truly in the heavens and the earth that is to say in their creation there are signs indicating the power of God and His Oneness exalted be He for believers."
"And when it was said to you O disbelievers “God’s promise of resurrection is indeed true and there is no doubt about the Hour” read al-sā‘atu or al-sā‘ata you said “We do not know what the Hour is. We only make conjectures al-Mubarrad said that this actually means in nahnu illā nazunnu zannan and we are by no means certain” ’ that it will come to pass."
"These mentioned signs are the signs of God the proofs of His that indicate His Oneness which We recite relate to you with truth bi’l-haqqi is semantically connected to natlū ‘We recite’. So in what kind of discourse then after God that is to say after His discourse namely the Qur’ān and His signs His definitive arguments will they that is the disbelievers of Mecca believe? In other words they will not believe in anything a variant reading for yu’minūna ‘they believe’ has tu’minūna ‘you believe’."
"Yet before it that is before the Qur’ān there was the Book of Moses that is the Torah as a guidepost and a mercy for those who believed in it imāman wa-rahmatan are two circumstantial qualifiers and this Qur’ān is a Book that confirms scriptures before it in the Arabic tongue lisānan ‘arabiyyan is a circumstantial qualifier referring to the subject of musaddiqun ‘that confirms’ to warn those who do wrong the idolaters of Mecca and it is good tidings for the virtuous the believers."
"And We have enjoined man to be kind husnan a variant reading has ihsānan that is to say We have commanded him to act kindly towards both of them thus ihsānan is in the accusative as a verbal noun because of the implied verbal action; the same applies to husnan to his parents. His mother carries him in travail and gives birth to him in travail that is to say with suffering; and his gestation and his weaning from suckling take thirty months six months being the minimum period for gestation the remainder being the maximum period of suckling; it is also said that regardless of whether she bore him for six or nine months she should suckle him for the remainder. So that hattā is a particle of purpose for an implied sentence that is to say wa-‘āsha hattā ‘and he lived on so that …’ when he is mature namely at his prime in terms of his strength intellect and reasoning the minimum age for which is thirty or thirty three years and reaches forty years that is exactly forty years which is the maximum for attaining maturity he says ‘My Lord! this to the end of this verse was revealed regarding Abū Bakr al-Siddīq when he had reached forty years of age two years after the beginning of the Prophet’s Mission s. He Abū Bakr believed in him whereafter his parents believed in the Prophet followed by his son ‘Abd al-Rahmān then ‘Abd al-Rahmān’s son Abū ‘Atīq Muhammad b. ‘Abd al-Rahmān. Inspire me to give thanks for Your favour with which You have favoured me and my parents namely the grace of affirming God’s Oneness and that I may act righteously in a way that will please You thus he Abū Bakr emancipated nine believers who had been enduring torture at the hands of the idolaters for their belief in God and invest my seed with righteousness all of them were believers. Indeed I repent to You and I am truly of those who submit to You’."
"Those that is those who say such words Abū Bakr and others are they from whom We accept the best of what they do and overlook their misdeeds as they stand among the inhabitants of Paradise fī ashābi’ll-jannati a circumstantial qualifier in other words ‘being among them’ — this is the true promise which they were promised by His words God has promised the believers both men and women Gardens … Q. 972."
"And for each one of both categories believer and disbeliever there will be degrees of status  thus the degrees of the believers in Paradise are high while the degrees of disbelievers in the Fire are despicable according to what they have done that is to say according to what believers have done in the way of acts of obedience and disbelievers in the way of acts of disobedience and that He may recompense them fully namely God li-yuwaffiyahum a variant reading has li-nuwaffiyahum ‘that We may recompense them fully’ for their deeds that is pay them their deserts and they will not be wronged not even in a single thing that may be diminished for believers or increased for disbelievers."
"Have they not travelled in the land to see the nature of the consequence for those who were before them? God destroyed them — He destroyed them their children and their possessions; and a fate the like thereof will be for the disbelievers that is to say the like of the fate of those before them."
"That granting of victory to the believers and the vanquishing of the disbelievers is because God is Patron Ally and Helper of those who believe and because the disbelievers have no patron."
"Is he who follows a clear sign a definitive argument and proof from his Lord and these are the believers like those whose evil deeds have been adorned for them so that they see them as fair deeds and these are the disbelievers of Mecca and who follow their desires? by worshipping graven images. In other words there is no similarity between the two."
"And there are some among them namely the disbelievers who listen to you during the Friday sermon — and these are the hypocrites; until when they go forth from you they say to those who have been given knowledge that is to say to the knowledgeable ones among the Companions of the Prophet such as ‘Abd Allāh Ibn Mas‘ūd and ‘Abd Allāh Ibn ‘Abbās in derision and mockery ‘What was he saying just now?’ read ānifan or anifan meaning al-sā‘a ‘just now’. In other words they mean to say ‘we will not go back to listen to him again’. Those are the ones on whose hearts God has set a seal of disbelief and who follow their own desires in acting with hypocrisy."
"But those who are rightly guided namely the believers He God enhances their guidance and invests them with fear of Him He inspires them to do that by which they can be wary of ending up in the Fire."
"Do they then await they do not await namely the disbelievers of Mecca anything except that the Hour should come upon them an ta’tiyahum is an inclusive substitution for al-sā‘ata ‘the Hour’; in other words it cannot be other than that it will come upon them … suddenly? For already its portents the signs thereof have come among which are the sending of the Prophet s the splitting of the Moon Q. 541 and the Smoke Q. 4410. So when it the Hour has come upon them for what benefit will their reminder be? their remembering; in other words it will be of no benefit to them."
"Know then that there is no god except God that is to say adhere O Muhammad (s) to knowledge of this fact that will benefit you at the Resurrection and ask forgiveness for your sin — this was said to him despite his infallibility ‘isma so that his community might emulate him in this respect. Indeed he did do this. The Prophet s said ‘Verily I do ask God for forgiveness a hundred times every day’ — and for the believing men and believing women — herein is an honouring for them by having their Prophet enjoined to ask forgiveness for them. And God knows your going to and fro your bustle during the day in pursuit of your business and your place of rest when you retire to where you sleep at night. In other words He has knowledge of all your states nothing of which can be hidden from Him so be mindful of Him — the address in this verse is meant for believers as well as others."
"Or did those in whose hearts is a sickness suppose that God would not expose their rancour? that He would not bring to light their spite against the Prophet s and the believers."
"Indeed those who disbelieve and bar from the way of God His path namely guidance and then die as disbelievers God will never forgive them — this was revealed regarding the men of the Well al-qalīb."
"So do not falter do not be weak and do not call for peace read salm or silm that is to say a truce with the disbelievers should you encounter them when you have the upper hand al-a‘lawna the third letter of the triliteral root wāw has been omitted when you are the victors the vanquishers and God is with you helping and assisting and He will not stint you diminish you in the reward for your works that is to say of the reward for them."
"So when you encounter in battle those who disbelieve then attack them with a striking of the necks fa-darba’l-riqābi is a verbal noun in place of the full verbal construction that is to say fa’dribū riqābahum ‘then strike their necks’ in other words slay them — reference is made to the ‘striking of the necks’ because the predominant cause of being slayed is to be struck in the neck. Then when you have made thoroughly decimated them bind spare them take them captive and bind firmly the bonds al-wathāq is what is used to bind yūthaqu a captive. Thereafter either set them free by grace mannan is a verbal noun in place of the full verbal construction that is to say either show them grace by setting them free unconditionally; or by ransom ransoming them with payment or with Muslim captives until the war that is to say its participants lay down its burdens its heavy loads of weaponry and other things so that either the disbelievers surrender or enter into a treaty. This last clause constitutes the ‘purpose’ of enjoining the Muslims to slaying and taking captive. So shall it be dhālika is the predicate of an implied subject such as al-amr ‘the ordinance’ in other words ‘the ordinance of God regarding them is as mentioned’. And had God willed He could have Himself taken vengeance on them without any fighting but He has commanded you to do it that He may test some of you by means of others from among them by way of battle so that the slain among you will end up in Paradise while those slain among them will end up in the Fire. And those who are slain qutilū a variant reading has qātalū ‘those who fight’ — this verse was revealed on the day of the battle of Uhud after the dead and the wounded had become numerous among the Muslims — in the way of God He will not let their works go to waste He will not render them void."
"Nay bal in both instances marks a transition from one subject to another but you thought that the Messenger and the believers would never return to their families and that thought was adorned in your hearts that is to say you thought that they would be annihilated by being slain and would not return and you thought evil thoughts that just mentioned and other things and you were a ruined lot’ būr is the plural of bā’ir in other words a lot to be destroyed according to God for having entertained such evil thoughts."
"And whoever does not believe in God and His Messenger We have prepared for the disbelievers a blaze a severe fire."
"Verily God was pleased with the believers when they pledged allegiance to you at al-Hudaybiyya under the tree this was an acacia — they these believers numbered 1300 or more; he took an oath of allegiance from them that they would fight against Quraysh and not attempt to flee from death. And He God knew what was in their hearts of sincerity and loyalty so He sent down the spirit of Peace upon them and rewarded them with a near victory which was the conquest of Khaybar following their departure from al-Hudaybiyya"
"God has promised you abundant spoils which you will capture through the various conquests. So He has expedited this one the spoils of Khaybar for you and withheld men’s hands from you with regard to your families after you had set off on the campaign as the Jews had intended to plot against them; but God cast terror into their hearts; so that it the expedited one wa-li-takūna is a supplement to an implied verb that is to say li-tashkurūhu ‘that you may give thanks to Him’ may be a sign for the believers of their being assisted by God and that He may guide you on a straight path that is to say the way in which you should rely on Him and entrust any affair to Him exalted be He;"
"That is the way of God sunnata’Llāhi is a verbal noun emphasising the import of the preceding sentence about the defeat of the disbelievers and the victory of the believers that is to say sanna’Llāhu dhālika sunnatan ‘God has established this as His way of dealing with believers and disbelievers’ which has taken its course before and you will never find in God’s way any change by Him."
"They are the ones who disbelieved and barred you from the Sacred Mosque that is barred you from reaching it and prevented the offering wa’l-hadya is a supplement to the suffixed pronoun –kum ‘you’ of saddūkum ‘they barred you’ which was detained ma‘kūfan is a circumstantial qualifier from reaching its destination that is from the place at which it is customarily sacrificed namely the Sanctuary itself an yablugha mahillahu is an inclusive substitution. And were it not for some of the believing men and believing women being present at Mecca alongside the disbelievers whom you did not know to be believers — lest you should trample them that is to say lest you should slay them together with the disbelievers had you been given permission to embark on the conquest an tata’ūhum is an inclusive substitution for –hum ‘them’ of lam ta‘lamūhum ‘whom you did not know’ and thus incur sin on account of them without your knowing it … the third person pronouns in both groups of people predominantly imply males; the response to lawlā ‘were it not’ has been omitted through ellipsis being something along the lines of la-udhina lakum fī’l-fathi ‘you would have been permitted to embark on the conquest’ but permission for this was not given at the time so that God may admit into His mercy whom He will such as those believers mentioned. Had they been clearly separated had they the believers been distinguishable from the disbelievers We would have surely chastised the disbelievers among them of the people of Mecca immediately thereat by permitting you to go ahead with the conquest thereof with a painful chastisement."
"When those who disbelieve alladhīna kafarū is the subject of the following verb ja‘ala nourished idh ja‘ala is semantically connected to ‘adhdhabnā in their hearts zealotry al-hamiyya means ‘disdain of something’ the zealotry of pagandom hamiyyata’l-jāhiliyyati substitutes for al-hamiyyata ‘zealotry’ namely their barring of the Prophet and his Companions from visiting the Sacred Mosque but then God sent down His spirit of Peace upon His Messenger and the believers and so they the disbelievers made a truce with them on the condition that they the believers would be allowed to return the following year and such zealotry would not overcome them the believers as it did the disbelievers then until they would come to fight them later and He made them the believers abide by the word of God-fearing kalimata’l-taqwā ‘there is no god except God and Muhammad is His Messenger’ it kalima ‘word’ is annexed to al-taqwā because it is the cause of it for they were worthier of it of the word than the disbelievers and deserving of it wa-ahlahā is an explanatory supplement. And God is ever Knower of all things that is to say He is ever possessed of such an attribute and among the things He knows is that they are worthy of it."
"Verily God has fulfilled the vision for His Messenger in all truth The Messenger of God s saw in his sleep in the year of al-Hudaybiyya before his departure from Medina that he would enter Mecca together with his Companions safely whereafter they would shave completely or shorten their hair. He informed his Companions of this and they rejoiced. But when they set off with him from Medina and the disbelievers impeded them at al-Hudaybiyya such that they had to retreat which was distressing for them for some of the hypocrites began to have doubts about the Prophet’s sincerity this verse was revealed bi’l-haqqi ‘in all truth’ is semantically connected to sadaqa ‘fulfilled’ or it is a circumstantial qualifier referring to al-ru’yā ‘the vision’ and what comes after it is the explanation thereof ‘You will assuredly enter the Sacred Mosque God willing — this is said to secure blessings — in safety to shave your heads that is all the hair or to shorten it to shorten some of the hair both muhalliqīna and muqassirīna are implied circumstantial qualifiers without any fear’ ever. So He knew there to be in the truce what you did not know in the way of reconciliation between the believers and the Meccans and assigned you before that entry a near victory namely the conquest of Khaybar — the vision was fulfilled in the following year."
"Muhammad the subject is the Messenger of God its predicate and those who are with him that is his Companions from among the believers wa’lladhīna ma‘ahu another subject the predicate of which is the following ashiddā’u are hard tough against the disbelievers showing them no mercy but merciful among themselves ruhamā’u is a second predicate of wa’lladhīna ma‘ahu ‘and those who are with him’ that is to say they show mutual sympathy and affection for one another much like a father and a son. You see you observe them bowing prostrating in worship both rukka‘an and sujjadan are circumstantial qualifiers. They seek yabtaghūna is the beginning of a new sentence bounty from God and beatitude. Their mark sīmāhum is a subject their distinguishing feature is on their faces fī wujūhihim is its predicate this is a light and a radiance by which in the Hereafter they will be recognised as having been those who used to prostrate in this world from the effect of prostration min athari’l-sujūdi is semantically connected to the same thing to which the predicate is semantically connected that is to say kā’inatan ‘this being from the effect of prostration’; syntactically it is a circumstantial qualifier referring to the subject of kā’inatan which is also the subject of the predicate sc. wujūhihim ‘their faces’. That mentioned description is their description mathaluhum is the subject in the Torah fī’l-tawrāti is the predicate thereof; and their description in the Gospel wa-mathaluhum fī’l-injīli is a subject the predicate of which is what follows is as a seed that sends forth its shoot read shat’ahu or shata’ahu and strengthens it read āzarahu or azarahu nourishing it and assisting it and it grows stout and rises firmly becoming strong and upright upon its stalk its roots sūq is the plural of sāq delighting the sowers that is to say those who planted it on account of its fairness. The Companions may God be pleased with them are being described in this way for at the outset they were weak and very few in number; but then their number grew and they acquired strength in the most wholesome way so that He may enrage the disbelievers by them li-yaghīza bihimu’l-kuffāra is semantically connected to an omitted clause which is suggested by what preceded that is to say ‘they are likened to this so that God may enrage the disbelievers’. God has promised those of them who believe and perform righteous deeds the Companions minhum ‘of them’ min ‘of’ is an indicator of the genus and not partitive for they are all possessed of the mentioned attributes forgiveness and a great reward — Paradise. Both of these rewards will also be given to those who will come after them as is stated in other verses."
"He it is Who sent down the spirit of Peace Divine reassurance into the hearts of the believers that they might add faith to their faith by way of their embracing of the legal stipulations of religion for every time He revealed one of these they would believe in it — including the command to struggle. And to God belong the hosts of the heavens and the earth and so if He wanted to bring victory to His religion by means of others He would have done so. And God is ever Knower of His creatures Wise in His actions in other words He is ever possessed of such attributes;"
"and so that He may chastise the hypocrites men and women and the idolaters men and women and those who make evil assumptions about God read al-saw’ or al-sū’ ‘evil’ in all three places; they assumed that He will not assist Muhammad (s) and the believers. For them will be an evil turn of fortune by way of abasement and chastisement; and God is wroth with them and He has cursed them He has banished them far from His mercy and has prepared for them Hell — and it is an evil destination! an evil place to return to."
"The believers are indeed brothers in religion. Therefore always make peace between your brethren when they fall into dispute with one another a variant reading for the dual form akhawaykum ‘your two brethren’ has ikhwatakum ‘your brothers’ and fear God so that perhaps you might receive mercy."
"O you who believe shun much suspicion. Indeed some suspicions are sins that is to say it causes one to fall into sin. This suspicion may have many forms such as thinking ill of the good folk from among the believers — and such good folk are many — in contrast to the immoral individuals among them in whose case there is no sin so long as it the suspicion is in accordance with their outward behaviour. And do not spy tajassasū one of the two tā’ letters of tatajassasū has been omitted do not pursue the imperfections and faults of Muslims by searching them out; nor backbite one another do not speak of him by mentioning something which he is averse to having mentioned of himself even if it be true. Would any of you love to eat the flesh of his brother dead? read maytan or mayyitan. That is to say it would not be right for him to do so. You would abhor it. Thus to backbite him in life would be like eating his flesh when he is dead. This latter form of behaviour has been suggested to you and you were averse to it so be averse to the former too. And fear God that is His punishment for backbiting by repenting of it; assuredly God is Relenting accepting of the penitence of those who repent Merciful to them."
"The Bedouins — a group of men from among the Banū Asad — say ‘We believe’ we affirm the truth in our hearts. Say to them ‘You do not believe; but rather say “We have submitted” we are outwardly compliant; for faith has not yet entered into your hearts’ hitherto; however it is expected of you. Yet if you obey God and His Messenger by embracing faith and in other ways He will not diminish for you read ya’litkum or yalitkum by making the hamza an alif anything of your deeds that is of the reward for them. God is indeed Forgiving to believers Merciful to them."
"The true believers that is those who are true in their affirmation of faith — as He makes explicit in what follows — are only those who believe in God and His Messenger and then have not doubted they have not been uncertain of their faith and who strive with their wealth and their souls for the cause of God hence their striving manifests the sincerity of their faith. It is they who are sincere in their faith not those who say ‘We believe’ and from whom all that has been forthcoming is their submission to the religion."
"And if two parties of believers in tā’ifatāni mina’l-mu’minīna... to the end of the verse was revealed regarding a particular incident where the Prophet s was riding a donkey and happened to pass by Ibn Ubayy; the donkey urinated and so Ibn Ubayy held his nose whereupon ‘Abd Allāh Ibn Rawāhā said ‘By God the smell of the donkey’s urine is sweeter-smelling than your musk. Fighting then ensued between the two clans with fists sandals and palm branches being thrown about fall to fighting iqtatalū the plural is used on account of the plural import for each party is made up of several individuals; a variant reading has the dual form iqtatalatā make peace between them baynahumā the dual here takes into account the actual dual form of tā’ifatān ‘two parties’. And if one of them aggresses against the other fight the one which aggresses until it returns to God’s ordinance to the truth. Then if it returns reconcile them fairly and act justly. Surely God loves the just."
"Qāf God knows best what He means by this letter. By the glorious Qur’ān by the noble Qur’ān the disbelievers of Mecca have certainly not believed in Muhammad (s)."
"Nay but they consider it odd that there should have come to them a warner from among themselves a messenger who is one of them to threaten them with the punishment of the Fire after resurrection. So the disbelievers say ‘This warning is an odd thing!"
"And the Trumpet will be blown for resurrection. That namely the day of the blast is the Day of the Promised Threat of chastisement for the disbelievers."
"And how many a generation We destroyed before them that is before the disbelievers of Quraysh We destroyed many generations of disbelievers who were mightier than these in prowess and who then searched throughout the land wondering is there any escape? for them and others from death but they found none."
"We know best what they the disbelievers of the Quraysh say and you are not to be a coercer of them so as to coerce them to embrace faith — but this was revealed before the command to struggle against these disbelievers. So admonish by the Qur’ān those who fear My threat namely believers."
"They said ‘Lo! we have been sent to a guilty folk disbelievers — these were the people of Lot —"
"So We brought forth those in them that is in the towns of the people of Lot who were believers in order to destroy the disbelievers;"
"And We left therein after destroying the disbelievers a sign an indication of their destruction for those who fear the painful chastisement so that they may not do what these sinners did."
"And remind admonish by the Qur’ān for reminding truly benefits believers these being those whom God knows that they will believe."
"And I did not create the jinn and mankind except that they may worship Me the fact that disbelievers do not worship God does not contradict this statement since a purpose does not have to be realised in an act for it to be valid as when you may say ‘I sharpened this pencil in order to write with it’ even though you might not actually write with it."
"So shun him who turns away from Our Remembrance that is from the Qur’ān and desires nothing but the life of this world — this was revealed before the command to struggle against the disbelievers."
"And if they the disbelievers among Quraysh see a sign a miracle of the Prophet s they turn away and say this is ‘A powerful sorcery!’ mustamirr ‘powerful’ derives from al-mirra meaning ‘strength’; or it mustamirr means ‘incessant’."
"Are your disbelievers O Quraysh better than those? mentioned beginning from the people of Noah to those of Pharaoh which is why they have not been chastised? Or have you O disbelievers of Quraysh been granted some immunity from chastisement in the Scriptures? the Books? the interrogative in both instances is meant as a denial in other words it is not so."
"Or do they the disbelievers of Quraysh say ‘We are a host that will be helped to victory’? against Muhammad (s)? When Abū Jahl on the day of Badr said ‘We are a host that will be helped to victory’ the following was revealed"
"scrambling hastening with their necks stretched out toward the Summoner. The disbelievers among them will say ‘This is a hard day!’ a difficult one for disbelievers — as is stated in sūrat al-Muddaththir a day of hardship for the disbelievers Q. 749-10."
"yet there will remain the countenance of your Lord His Essence the countenance of majesty magnificence and munificence towards believers through His graces to them."
"The day when the hypocrites men and women will say to those who believe ‘Look at us unzurūnā a variant reading has anzirūnā meaning ‘Give us a chance’ that we may glean something of your light!’ It will be said to them in mockery of them ‘Step back and seek light!’ So they step back then there will be set up between them and the believers a wall — this is said to be the wall of ‘the Heights’ cf. Q. 746 — with a gate the inner side of which contains mercy the side of the believers and the outer side of which the side of the hypocrites faces toward the chastisement."
"They will call out to them ‘Did we not use to be with you?’ upon the path of obedience. They will say ‘Yes indeed! But you caused your souls to fall into temptation by engaging in hypocrisy and you awaited reversals of fortune for the believers and you doubted you were uncertain about the religion of Islam and false hopes greedy desires deceived you until God’s ordinance death came; and the Deceiver Satan deceived you concerning God."
"Know — an address to the believers just mentioned — that God revives the earth after its death by bringing forth vegetation and likewise He is able to do with your hearts restoring them to humbleness. We have certainly made clear for you the signs that testify to Our power with this mentioned example and others that perhaps you may understand."
"Know that the life of this world is merely play and diversion and glitter the frequent adornment of oneself and mutual vainglory in respect of wealth and children that is preoccupation with such things — but as for acts of obedience and incentives thereto these are the concerns of the Hereafter; as the likeness of that is to say it in the manner in which you admire it and in the manner in which it will disappear is as the likeness of rain whose vegetation which results from this rain the disbelievers the sowers admire; but then it withers it becomes dried-up and you see it turn yellow then it becomes chaff scatters vanishing with the winds. And in the Hereafter there is a severe chastisement for those who prefer this world to it and forgiveness from God and beatitude for those who have not preferred this world to it; and the life of this world that is to say the comfort enjoyed in it is but the comfort of delusion."
"So that the People of the Scripture the Torah — those who did not believe in Muhammad (s) — may know in other words I inform you of this so that they the People of the Scripture may know that a of a-llā is softened in place of the hardened form an-lā its subject being the pronoun of the matter that is to say understand it as being annahum they have no power over anything of God’s bounty contrary to their claims that they are God’s beloved and those who deserve His beatitude and that all bounty is in God’s hand; He gives it to whomever He will and hence He has given the believers in the Prophet among them their reward twofold as stated above; and God is dispenser of tremendous bounty."
"And why should you not believe — an address to the disbelievers — in other words there is nothing to prevent you from believing in God when the Messenger is calling you to believe in your Lord and a pledge has been taken from you reading it as ukhidha mīthāqukum; otherwise akhadha mīthāqakum ‘He has taken a pledge from you’ concerning it — that is to say God took this pledge from you in the world of atoms when He made them bear witness against themselves ‘Am I not your Lord?’ They said ‘Yea indeed’ Q. 7172 — if you are believers? that is to say if your intention is to believe in Him then apply yourselves to this duty of faith."
"Secret conversations tainted with sin and the like are of the work of Satan a result of his deception that those who believe may end up grieving; but he cannot harm them in any way except God’s leave that is except by His will. And in God let the believers put all their trust."
"Have you not regarded have you not seen those who — these being the hypocrites — fraternise with a folk — these being the Jews — at whom God is wrathful? They the hypocrites neither belong with you the believers nor with them the Jews but are suspended in between and they swear falsely in other words saying that they are believers while they know that they are lying in this."
"They have taken their oaths as a shield a means of protection for themselves and their possessions and so they bar thereby the believers from the way of God that is from engaging in a struggle against them thereby slaying them and seizing their possessions. So for them there will be a humiliating chastisement."
"Mention the day when God will raise them all together whereupon they will swear to Him that they are believers just as they swear to you now and suppose that they are standing on something beneficial by swearing in Hereafter just as they supposed it to have been beneficial for them in this world. Yet assuredly it is they who are the liars!"
"You will not find a people who believe in God and the Last Day loving befriending those who oppose God and His Messenger even though they the opposers were their fathers that is to say the believers’ fathers or their sons or their brothers or their clan rather you will find that they intend to do them harm and they fight them over the question of faith as occurred on one occasion with some Companions may God be pleased with them. For those the ones who are not loving of them He has inscribed He has established faith upon their hearts and reinforced them with a spirit a light from Him exalted be He and He will admit them into gardens underneath which rivers flow wherein they will abide God being pleased with them for their obedience of Him and they being pleased with Him because of His reward. Those they are God’s confederates following His command and refraining from what He has forbidden. Assuredly it is God’s confederates who are the successful the winners."
"Have you not seen have you not observed those who were forbidden from conversing in secret but then returned to that they had been forbidden and all the while hold secret conversations tainted with sin and plans for enmity and disobedience to the Messenger? These were the Jews whom the Prophet s had forbidden them what they used to do in their secret talks that is their habit of conversing secretly with one another and giving the believers looks in order to cast doubt into their hearts about the faith. And who when they come to you they greet you O Prophet with that with which God never greeted you — namely their saying to the Prophet al-sāmu ‘alayka meaning ‘Death be upon you’ and they say within themselves ‘Why does God not chastise us for what we say?’ in the way of such a greeting and our saying that he is not a prophet if he truly were a prophet. Hell will suffice them! In it they will be made to burn — and what an evil journey’s end! it is."
"So the sequel for both will be that is the sequel for both the one who leads astray and the one led astray a variant reading for ‘āqibatahumā has the nominative ‘āqibatuhumā as the subject of kāna ‘will be’ that they are in the Fire therein abiding. And that is the requital of the evildoers that is the disbelievers."
"It is He Who expelled those who disbelieved of the People of the Scripture namely the Jews of the Banū al-Nadīr from their homelands from their dwellings at Medina at the first exile that is their exile to Syria the last exile being their banishment to Khaybar by ‘Umar during his caliphate. You did not think O believers that they would go forth and they thought that they would be protected māni‘atuhum is the predicate of an ‘that’ by their fortresses husūnuhum the agent of the verb māni‘atuhum with which the predication is completed from God from His chastisement. But God His command and His chastisement came at them from whence they had not reckoned from whence had never occurred to them from the part of the believers and He cast terror ru‘b or ru‘ub into their hearts by having their chief Ka‘b b. al-Ashraf slain destroying as they did read yukharribūna; or yukhribūna derived from 4th form akhraba their houses in order to take away with them what they valued of wood and so on with their own hands and the hands of the believers. So take heed O you who have eyes!"
"Had We sent down this Qur’ān upon a mountain and had it the mountain been endowed with a faculty of discernment like man you would have surely seen it humbled rent asunder by the fear of God. And such similitudes as those mentioned — do We strike for mankind that perhaps they may reflect and so become believers."
"O you who believe do not take My enemy and your enemy namely the disbelievers of Mecca for friends. You offer you communicate to them the Prophet’s plan s to attack them which he had confided to you and had kept secret at Hunayn communicating this to them out of affection between you and them. Hātib b. Abī Balta‘a sent them a letter to that effect on account of his having children and close relatives idolaters among them. The Prophet s intercepted it from the person to whom he Hātib had given it to deliver after God apprised him of this. Hātib’s excuse for this conduct of his was accepted by the Prophet; when verily they have disbelieved in the truth that has come to you that is in the religion of Islam and the Qur’ān expelling the Messenger and you from Mecca by oppressing you because you believe in God your Lord. If you have gone forth to struggle in My way and to seek My pleasure … the response to the conditional is indicated by what preceded that is to say understand it as being ‘then do not take them as friends’. You secretly harbour affection for them when I know well what you hide and what you proclaim. And whoever among you does that that is to secretly communicate the Prophet’s news to them has verily strayed from the right way he has missed the path of guidance originally al-sawā’ means ‘the middle way’."
"O you who believe when believing women come to you saying with their tongues that they are emigrating from the company of disbelievers — this was following the truce concluded with them the disbelievers at al-Hudaybiyya to the effect that if any of their number should go to join the believers that person should be sent back — test them by making them swear that they had only gone forth from Mecca because of their sincere wish to embrace Islam and not out of some hatred for their disbelieving husbands nor because they might be enamoured by some Muslim man that was how the Prophet s used to take from them their oaths. God knows best the state of their faith. Then if you know them if you suppose them on the basis of their oaths to be believers do not send them back to the disbelievers. They the women are not lawful for them nor are they the disbelievers lawful for them. And give them that is to say their disbelieving husbands what they have expended on them on such women in the way of dowries. And you would not be at fault if you marry them on that previous condition when you have given them their dowries. And do not hold on read tumassikū or tumsikū to the conjugal ties of disbelieving women your wives for your Islam automatically prohibits you from this or to the ties of those apostatising women who return to the idolaters for likewise their apostatising automatically prohibits you from marrying them and ask for demand the return of what you have expended on these women of dowries in the event of apostasy from those disbelievers to whom they are married. And let them ask for what they have expended on those women who have emigrated as explained above that it may be repaid to them. That is God’s judgement. He judges between you therewith and God is Knower Wise."
"And if you lose any of your wives that is to say if you lose one or more of them — or it means if you lose anything of their dowries — by their going to the disbelievers as apostates and so you retaliate you embark upon a raid and capture spoils from them then give those whose wives have gone from the spoils the like of what they have expended for their having lost it to the disbelievers. And fear God in Whom you believe. And indeed the believers did what they had been commanded to do in the way of paying back the disbelievers the dowries of their former wives and the believers the dowries of the women who had apostatised. Afterwards however this stipulation was annulled."
"O you who believe do not befriend a people against whom God is wrathful namely the Jews. They have truly despaired of the Hereafter of attaining its reward — despite their being certain of its truth out of obstinacy towards the Prophet even though they know him to be sincere — just as the disbelievers have despaired — they themselves being — of those who are in the tombs that is to say those who are entombed and barred from the good of the Hereafter for they are shown both their would-have-been places in Paradise had they believed and the Fire for which they are destined."
"Your relatives and your children the idolatrous ones for whose sake you secretly communicated the news will not avail you against the chastisement in the Hereafter. On the Day of Resurrection you will be separated passive yufsalu; or read active yafsilu ‘He will separate you’ from them so that you will be in Paradise while they will be alongside the disbelievers in the Fire. And God is Seer of what you do."
"Verily there is for you a good example read iswa or uswa in both instances meaning qudwa in the person of Abraham in terms of his sayings and deeds and those who were with him of believers when they said to their people ‘We are indeed innocent of you bura’ā’ is the plural of barī’ similar in form to zarīf ‘charming’ and of what you worship besides God. We repudiate you we disavow you and between us and you there has arisen enmity and hate forever wa’l-baghdā’u abadan pronounce both hamzas fully or replace the second one with a wāw until you come to believe in God alone’ except for Abraham’s saying to his father ‘I shall ask forgiveness for you — this statement is excepted from ‘a good example’ so it is not right for you to follow his example in this respect by asking forgiveness for disbelievers. As for his saying but I cannot avail you anything against God’ — that is either against His chastisement or to secure for you of His reward — he Abraham is using it to intimate to his father that he can do nothing for him other than to ask forgiveness for him which saying is itself based on that former statement albeit excepted from it in terms of what is meant by it even if on the face of it it would seem to be semantically part of the good example to be followed Say ‘Who can avail you anything against God’ Q. 4811; his Abraham’s plea of forgiveness for him was before it became evident to him that he his father was an enemy of God as mentioned in sūrat Barā’a Q. 9114. ‘Our Lord in You we put our trust and to You we turn penitently and to You is the journeying these are the words of the Friend of God Abraham and those who were with him in other words they were saying"
"Verily there is for you O community of Muhammad (s) laqad kāna lakum is the response to an implied oath in them a good example for those of you who li-man kāna is an inclusive substitution for –kum of lakum ‘for you’ with the same preposition li- repeated anticipate God and the Last Day that is for those who fear these two or who expect reward or punishment. And whoever turns away by befriending the disbelievers should know that God is the Independent without need of His creatures the Worthy of Praise to those who obey Him."
"It may be that God will bring about between you and those of them with whom you are at enmity from among the disbelievers of Mecca out of your obedience to God exalted be He affection by His guiding them to faith so that they then become your friends. For God is Powerful able to do that — and He did do this after the conquest of Mecca — and God is Forgiving to them of their past deeds Merciful to them also."
"God does not forbid you in regard to those who did not wage war against you from among the disbelievers on account of religion and did not expel you from your homes that you should treat them kindly an tabarrūhum is an inclusive substitution for alladhīna ‘those who’ and deal with them justly this was revealed before the command to struggle against them. Assuredly God loves the just."
"And He will give you another grace which you love help from God and a victory near at hand. And give good tidings to the believers of assistance and victory."
"And mention when Moses said to his people ‘O my people why do you harm me — for they had said that he had a hernia in his testicles which he did not have and they denied him — when certainly qad is for confirmation you know that I am the messenger of God to you?’ annī rasūlu’Llāhi ilaykum this sentence is a circumstantial qualifier and when you know that messengers ought to be respected. So when they deviated when they swerved away from the truth by harming him God caused their hearts to deviate He turned them away from guidance in accordance to what He had preordained since pre-eternity and God does not guide the immoral folk those who in His knowledge are disbelievers."
"And mention when Jesus son of Mary said ‘O Children of Israel — he did not say ‘O my people’ as did Moses because he was not related to them in any way — I am indeed God’s messenger to you confirming what is before me of the Torah and bringing good tidings of a messenger who will come after me whose name is Ahmad.’ God exalted be He says Yet when he brought them when Ahmad brought the disbelievers the clear signs the revelations and the indications they said ‘This namely what has been brought is manifest sorcery!’ sihrun a variant reading has sāhirun ‘a sorcerer’ meaning the one who has brought them is a manifest sorcerer."
"They desire to extinguish li-yutfi’ū is in the subjunctive form because of an implicit an sc. an yutfi’ū the lām being extra the light of God His Law and His proofs with their mouths with their sayings that this is sorcery or poetry or soothsaying; but God will perfect He will manifest His light mutimmun nūrahu some have read this in the form of a genitive annextation mutimmu nūrihi though the disbelievers be averse to this."
"It is He Who has sent His Messenger with the guidance and the religion of truth that He may make it prevail that He may raise it over all other religions over all the religions which oppose it though the disbelievers be averse to this."
"The likeness of those who were entrusted with the Torah those who were charged with implementing it then failed to uphold it then failed to act in accordance with it in what pertains to the descriptions of the Prophet s and so did not believe in him is as the likeness of an ass carrying books in that it does not benefit from them. Evil is the likeness of the people who deny God’s signs those confirming the truth of the Prophet s — the object of rebuke is omitted but is implied to be hādhā’l-mathalu ‘this likeness’. And God does not guide the evildoing folk the disbelievers."
"But they will never long for it because of what their hands have sent ahead in the way of their disbelief of the Prophet which itself is a necessary consequence of their denial; and God is Knower of the evildoers the disbelievers."
"And when you see them their figures please you on account of their fairness; and if they speak you listen to their speech because of its eloquence. Yet they are by virtue of the enormous size of their figures yet in their lack of comprehension like blocks of timber read khushbun or khushubun that have been propped-up set reclining against a wall. They assume that every cry made like a battle-cry or one made to retrieve a lost camel is directed against them because of the extent of terror in their hearts lest something should be revealed deeming their blood licit. They are the enemy so beware of them for they communicate your secrets to the disbelievers. May God assail them! destroy them! How can they deviate? how can they be turned away from faith after the proofs for it have been established?"
"They say ‘Surely if we return from the raid against the Banū al-Mustaliq to Medina the powerful by which they meant themselves will soon expel from it the weaker’ by which they meant the believers. Yet the real might victory belongs to God and to His Messenger and to the believers but the hypocrites do not know that."
"God — there is no god except Him. And in God let all believers put their trust."
"It is He Who created you. Then some of you are disbelievers and some of you are believers in terms of your original disposition; then He makes you die and brings you back to life in that same disposition; and God is Seer of what you do."
"Has there not come to you O disbelievers of Mecca the tidings the story of those who disbelieved before and thus tasted the evil consequences of their conduct? they tasted the punishment for disbelief in this world. And there will be for them in the Hereafter a painful chastisement?"
"Mention the day when He will gather you for the Day of Gathering the Day of Resurrection that will be the Day of Dispossession on which the believers will dupe the disbelievers by occupying what would have been their places in Paradise had they believed as well as appropriating their believing spouses. And as for those who believe in God and act righteously He will absolve them of their misdeeds and admit them into gardens underneath which rivers flow a variant reading for both verbs has the first person plural wherein they will abide. That is the supreme triumph."
"God has struck a similitude for those who disbelieve the wife of Noah and the wife of Lot. They were under two of Our righteous servants yet they betrayed them in their religion for they both disbelieved — Noah’s wife called Wāhila used to say to his people that he was a madman while Lot’s wife called Wā‘ila used to tell his people the whereabouts of his guests when they stayed with him at night by lighting a fire and during the day by making smoke. So they that is Noah and Lot did not avail the two women in any way against God against His chastisement and it was said to the two women ‘Enter both of you the Fire along with the incomers’ from among the disbelievers of the peoples of Noah and Lot."
"If the two of you namely Hafsa and ‘Ā’isha repent to God … for your hearts were certainly inclined towards the prohibition of Māriya that is to say your keeping this secret despite knowing the Prophet’s s dislike of it which is itself a sin the response to the conditional ‘if the two of you repent to God’ has been omitted to be understood as ‘it will be accepted of both of you’; the use of the plural qulūb ‘hearts’ instead of the dual qalbayn ‘both your hearts’ is on account of the cumbersomeness of putting two duals together in what is effectively the same word; and if you support one another tazzāharā the original second tā’ of tatazāharā has been assimilated with the zā’; a variant reading has it without this assimilation tazāharā against him that is the Prophet in what he is averse to then know that God He huwa a pronoun for separation is indeed his Protector His supporter and Gabriel and the righteous among the believers Abū Bakr and ‘Umar may God be pleased with both of them wa-Jibrīlu wa-sālihu’l-mu’minīna is a supplement to the syntactical locus of the subject of inna sc. ‘God’ who will also be his supporters and the angels furthermore further to the support of God and those mentioned are his supporters assistants of his in supporting him to prevail over both of you."
"O you who believe! Guard yourselves and your families by enjoining obedience to God against a Fire whose fuel is disbelieving people and stones such as those idols of theirs made of that stone — the meaning is that it is extremely hot fuelled by the above-mentioned unlike the fire of this world which is fuelled by wood and the like — over which stand angels its keepers — numbering nineteen as will be stated in sūrat al-Muddaththir Q. 7430 — stern a sternness of the heart mighty in their power of assault who do not disobey God in what He commands them mā amarahum is a substitution for His Majesty ‘God’ in other words they do not disobey the command of God but do what they are commanded — this is reiterated for emphasis; the verse is meant as a threat to deter believers from apostatising and for hypocrites who believe only with their tongues and not with their hearts."
"O Prophet! Struggle against the disbelievers with the sword and the hypocrites by the tongue and with argument and be stern with them in rebuke and hatred. For their abode will be Hell — and what an evil journey’s end! it is."
"Or who am-man the subject is it hādhā its predicate that alladhī a substitution for hādhā ‘is it’ will be an army supporters for you lakum belongs to the relative clause of alladhī ‘that’ to help you yansurukum is an adjectival qualification of jundun ‘an army’ besides the Compassionate One? that is to say other than Him who is there that will be able to avert His chastisement from you in other words you have no helper. The disbelievers are in nothing but delusion Satan has deluded them into believing that the chastisement will not befall them."
"And they say to the believers ‘When will this promise be fulfilled the promise of the gathering if you are truthful?’ about it."
"Say ‘Have you considered If God destroys me and those with me of believers by His chastisement as you would have it or has mercy on us and does not chastise us who then will protect the disbelievers from a painful chastisement?’ in other words they will have no protector from it."
"almost exploding tamayyazu a variant reading has the original form tatamayyazu ripped apart with rage in wrath against the disbelievers. Whenever a host a group of them is flung into it its keepers ask them an interrogation of rebuke ‘Did there not come to you a warner?’ a messenger to warn you of God’s chastisement."
"They will say ‘Yes a warner did indeed come to us but we denied and said “God has not revealed anything; you are assuredly in great error”’ this last words may be the words of the angels spoken to the disbelievers when they are told of the denial or they may belong to the words of the disbelievers spoken to the warners."
"Such that is to say like the chastisement for these people will be the chastisement for those disbelievers of Mecca and others who contravene Our command; and the chastisement of the Hereafter is assuredly greater did they but know its chastisement they would not have contavened Our command. When they said ‘If we are resurrected we shall be given better than what you have been given the following was revealed"
"Ask them which of them will aver will guarantee for them that? that decision which they have made for themselves namely that they will be given better reward than the believers in the Hereafter?"
"so that We might make it namely this act the saving of the believers and the destruction of the disbelievers a reminder a lesson for you and that receptive ears ears which remember what they hear might remember it."
"which none shall eat but the sinners’ the disbelievers."
"And assuredly We know that some of you O people are deniers of the Qur’ān and some of you are believers in it."
"And assuredly it that is the Qur’ān is a cause of anguish for the disbelievers when they see the reward of those who affirmed its truth and the punishment of those who denied it."
"Nay! — a refutation of his wish. Lo! for him it namely the Fire will be the Churning Fire lazā — a name for Hell so called because it churns its flames tatalazzā against the disbelievers"
"— which in the case of the disbelievers none can avert this was al-Nadr b. al-Hārith who said ‘O God if this be indeed the truth from You … then rain down upon us stones from the heaven’ Q. 832"
"except those who perform prayers that is the believers"
"to the right and to the left of you in droves? ‘izīna is also a circumstantial qualifier in other words in groups standing in circles one next to the other saying in mockery of the believers ‘Verily if the likes of these are to enter Paradise we shall enter it before them’. God exalted be He says"
"What is wrong with you that you do not hope for dignity from God that is to say that you do not hope that God will dignify you by becoming believers"
"And Noah said ‘My Lord do not leave from among the disbelievers a single dweller upon the earth dayyār means ‘one who inhabits a dwelling dār’ in other words not one."
"My Lord forgive me and my parents — both of whom were believers — and whoever enters my house my dwelling or my place of worship as a believer and believing men and believing women to the Day of Resurrection and do not increase the evildoers except in ruin’ in destruction — and thus they were destroyed."
"And that among us some have become righteous after having listened to the Qur’ān and some of us are otherwise that is to say a folk who are unrighteous; we are made up of different sects opposing groups some submitters to God and others disbelievers."
"God exalted be He says the following about the Meccan disbelievers And it has been revealed to me that if they allaw softened in place of the hardened form its subject having been omitted that is to say annahum law which is a supplement to annahu istama‘a ‘that a company of jinn listened’ adopt the right path the path of submission to God We will give them abundant water to drink plenteous water from the heaven — this was after rain had been withheld from them for seven years —"
"He said in response to the disbelievers saying ‘Abandon this affair of yours!’ a variant reading for qāla ‘he said’ has qul ‘Say’ ‘I invoke only my Lord as God and I do not associate anyone with Him’."
"Such that when they see hattā is for inceptiveness but also entailing a purposive sense to an implied preceding clause that is to say they persist in their disbelief until they come to see … what they are promised of chastisement they will then know at the moment that it befalls them either on the day of Badr or on the Day of Resurrection who is weaker in supporters and fewer in numbers in assistants is it them or the believers — according to the former reading? Or is it Me or them according to the latter. Some of them said ‘When will this promise be fulfilled?’ whereupon the following was revealed"
"and bear patiently what they say that is the disbelievers of Mecca in the way of their maltreatment of you and part with them in a gracious manner without any anguish — this was revealed before the command to fight them."
"for the disbelievers not at all easy herein is an indication that it will be easy for believers despite its harshness."
"And We have appointed only angels as wardens of the Fire in other words and so they cannot be withstood as these disbelievers are wont to imagine; and We have made their number so only as a stumbling-block a cause for error for those who disbelieve when they then say ‘Why are there nineteen of them?’ so that those who were given the Scripture namely the Jews may be certain of the sincerity of the Prophet s in saying that they are nineteen for this concords with what is in their Scripture; and that those who believe from among the People of the Scripture may increase in faith in affirmation of the truth given that what the Prophet s has said concords with what is in their Scripture and that those given the Scripture and the believers those other than these Jews may not be in doubt concerning the number of these angels and that those in whose hearts there is a sickness an uncertainty those in Medina and the disbelievers in Mecca may say ‘What did God mean by this number as a similitude?’ mathalan they referred to it thus as a mathal on account of it being a curious matter; in terms of syntax it mathalan is a circumstantial qualifier. Thus that is just as the one who rejects this number is led astray and the one who affirms the truth of it is guided God leads astray whom He will and guides whom He will. And none knows the hosts of your Lord namely the angels none knows them in terms of their strength and their assistants except Him. And it that is Saqar is nothing but a reminder for humans."
"except those of the right hand namely the believers who will be saved from it and who will be"
"So submit patiently to your Lord’s decree to you to deliver His Message and do not obey of them that is of the disbelievers any sinner or disbeliever namely ‘Utba b. Rabī‘a and al-Walīd b. al-Mughīra — both of whom said to the Prophet s ‘Abandon this affair of yours!’; it is also possible that what is meant is every sinner or disbeliever in other words ‘Do not obey any of these whichever of the two he may be in what he may summon you to of sin or disbelief’."
"He admits whomever He will into His mercy His Paradise namely the believers; and as for the evildoers al-zālimīna is in the accusative because of an implied verb that is to say a‘adda ‘He has prepared’ as explained by what follows He has prepared for them a painful chastisement — these are the disbelievers."
"We have assuredly prepared for the disbelievers chains with which they are dragged through the Fire and fetters around their necks to which the chains will be attached and a hell-fire a fire set ablaze burning fiercely in which they shall be chastised."
"then made the latter folk follow them? the latter folk of those who denied such as the disbelievers of Mecca whom We will destroy."
"‘Eat and enjoy — addressing the disbelievers in this world — for a little time at the end of which comes death — this is meant as a threat for them. Indeed you are guilty!’"
"Surely that which you are promised O disbelievers of Mecca in the way of resurrection and chastisement will befall it will be without any doubt."
"for the rebellious the disbelievers who will not be able to avoid it it is a resort a retreat for them and so they will enter it"
"concerning which they are at variance for the believers affirm it while the disbelievers repudiate it."
"on the day yawma is the adverbial qualifier for lā yamlikūna ‘they will not be able to’ when the Spirit Gabriel or God’s hosts and the angels stand arrayed saffan is a circumstantial qualifier in other words mustaffīna. They creatures will not speak except him whom the Compassionate One permits to speak and who says what is right from among the believers and the angels as if meaning that they will intercede for he whom He approves of."
"Lo! We have warned you O disbelievers of Mecca of a chastisement that is near the chastisement of the impending Day of Resurrection — for anything that is impending is also near — the day yawma adverbially qualifies ‘adhāban ‘a chastisement’ by describing it when a person when every person will behold what his hands have sent ahead of good and evil and the disbeliever will say ‘O yā is a particle used to call attention to something would that I were dust!’ in other words and not be chastised. He says this when God exalted be He says to the beasts after each of them has retaliated against the other ‘Be dust!’."
"By those that wrest by the angels who wrest the souls of disbelievers violently;"
"by those that draw out by the angels who draw out the souls of believers gently;"
"by those that race forward by the angels who race forward to Paradise with the souls of believers;"
"They that is the disbelievers of Mecca will ask you about the Hour when will it set in? when will it come to pass and when will it begin?"
"and by those that direct the affair by the angels who direct the affairs of this world that is to say they descend with the directions for it from God the response to all of these oath clauses has been omitted understood to be something like la-tub‘athunna yā kuffāra Makka ‘you shall certainly be resurrected O disbelievers of Mecca!’ which is also the operator of the following clause"
"laughing joyous happy — these are the believers."
"Those the people of this predicament are the disbelievers the profligates those who have combined disbelief with profligacy."
"Indeed the pious the believers who are sincere in their faith shall be amid bliss in Paradise"
"and indeed the profligates the disbelievers shall be in Hell-fire a scorching fire"
"No indeed! — a deterrent against letting oneself be misled by the generosity of God exalted be He. Rather you that is disbelievers of Mecca deny Judgement requital for deeds;"
"Nay! verily the record of the pious that is the record of the deeds of the believers who were sincere in their faith is in ‘Illiyyūn — this is said to be the book containing all the good deeds of the angels and the believers from among the two heavy ones sc. mankind and jinn; but it is also said to be a place below the Throne in the seventh heaven;"
"Verily the guilty like Abū Jahl and his ilk used to laugh at the believers such as ‘Ammār b. Yāsir and Bilāl the Ethiopian and those like them in mockery of them;"
"and when they the believers passed them by they would wink at one another the guilty beckoned with their eyebrows and eyelids towards the believers in mockery;"
"and when they returned to their folks they would return blithely fākihīna a variant reading has fakihīna rejoicing in their disparaging mention of the believers;"
"and when they see them that is the believers they say ‘Lo! these men are astray!’ on account of their belief in Muhammad (s)."
"God exalted be He says Yet they that is the disbelievers were not sent as watchers over them over the believers to preserve them or to keep a record of their deeds and thus guide them back to what is best for them."
"So today that is the Day of Resurrection the believers will be laughing at the disbelievers"
"upon couches in Paradise gazing out from their dwellings at the disbelievers while they are being tortured; and they will laugh at them just as they the disbelievers had laughed at them in the world."
"Have the disbelievers been requited for what they used to do? Yes indeed!"
"Nay! verily the record of the profligates that is to say the record of the deeds of the disbelievers is in Sijjīn — this is said to be a book containing the record of all the deeds of the devils and the disbelievers; but it is also said to be a location in the lowermost part of the seventh earth the place of Satan and his hosts."
"So what is wrong with them that is the disbelievers that they do not have faith that is to say what is there to prevent them from embracing faith; or what argument do they have for neglecting it despite the existence of proofs for it"
"Nay but the disbelievers deny resurrection and other matters"
"Indeed those who persecute believing men and believing women by having them burnt then do not repent there will be for them the chastisement of Hell in return for their disbelief and there will also be for them the chastisement of burning that is to say the chastisement for their having had the believers burnt in the Hereafter; but it is also said that there is this chastisement for them in this world as when the fire rose up and burnt them as mentioned above."
"Assuredly your Lord’s assault against the disbelievers is severe as severe as He will it to be."
"and He is the Forgiving to sinning believers the Loving the One Who shows love to His friends through His acts of generosity"
"Nay but the disbelievers are engrossed in denial of the mentioned;"
"and they themselves to what they did to those who believed in God in the way of torturing them by hurling them into the fire when they did not recant their faith were witnesses they were themselves present thereat. It is reported in a hadīth that God saved the believers who had been thrown into the fire by taking their souls before they fell into it and that the fire then rose up and burnt all those sitting around it."
"to Whom belongs the kingdom of the heavens and the earth and God is Witness to all things in other words all that the disbelievers disavowed of the believers was their faith."
"Indeed they that is the disbelievers are devising a plot they are preparing plots against the Prophet s"
"So respite O Muhammad (s) the disbelievers; grant them respite reiterated as an emphasis one enhanced by the use of a different form mahhil amhil that is to say put them off for a little ruwaydā is a verbal noun emphasising the import of the operator and is the diminutive form of rūd or irwad with shortening of final consonant ruwaydan ruwaydā. Surely enough God exalted be He seized them at Badr and abrogated the dispensation of ‘granting respite’ by the ‘sword’ verse in other words by the command to fight and struggle."
"and mentions the Name of his Lord saying Allāhu akbar ‘God is Great’ and prays the five prayers — and such are the concerns of one working towards the Hereafter concerns which the Meccan disbelievers shun."
"Will they the Meccan disbelievers not consider by way of reflection the camels how they are created?"
"you are not a taskmaster over them a variant reading for musaytir has musaytir that is to say not one who has been given authority over them — this was revealed before the command to struggle against the disbelievers."
"No indeed! — a disavowal of this notion in other words honour is not about wealth nor is there any humiliation in poverty rather it has to do with obedience and disobedience respectively; but the disbelievers of Mecca unmindful of this. Rather they do not honour the orphan they do not treat him with kindness despite their wealth or it means that they do not give him what is his due from an inheritance"
"Is there in that oath an oath for one of sense? one of intellect the response to the oath has been omitted that is to say it is to be understood as something like la-tu‘adhdhabunna yā kuffāra Makka ‘you will assuredly be chastised O disbelievers of Mecca!’."
"he who gives his wealth to purify himself offering it as a means of self purification before God exalted be He by making this payment for the sake of God exalted be He and not for show or the sake of reputation so that he or the offering stands purified in the sight of God. This verse was revealed regarding the truthful one al-siddīq Abū Bakr may God be pleased with him when he purchased Bilāl the Ethiopian who was being tortured on account of his faith and then freed him whereat the disbelievers said ‘He only did this in return for a favour which he must have owed him’ and so the following was revealed"
"Your Lord has neither forsaken you He has not abandoned you O Muhammad (s) nor does He hate you this was revealed when after the revelation had not come to him for fifteen days the disbelievers said ‘His Lord has parted with him and hates him’."
"Truly with hardship comes ease the Prophet s suffered much hardship at the hands of the disbelievers but then he enjoyed ease when he was assisted to victory by God over them."
"The disbelievers from among min explicative the People of the Scripture and the idolaters that is the idol-worshippers wa’l-mushrikīna is a supplement to ahl ‘the People of’ were not going to leave off munfakkīna is the predicate of yakun ‘were’ that is to say they were not going to abandon their ways until the clear proof namely Muhammad (s) should come to them that is until it came to them;"
"Truly the disbelievers from among the People of the Scripture and the idolaters shall be in the fire of Hell to abide therein khālidīna an implied circumstantial qualifier in other words it will be decreed for them by God exalted be He to abide therein — those are the worst of creatures."
"Woe waylun an expression implying chastisement to every backbiter who is a slanderer frequently engaging in backbiting and slander that is to say defamation — this was revealed regarding those who slandered the Prophet s and the believers the likes of Umayya b. Khalaf al-Walīd b. al-Mughīra and others —"
"Say ‘O disbelievers!"
"nor will you worship in the future what I worship God knew that they would never become believers the use of the inanimate mā ‘what’ to refer to God is meant to counter the reference to ‘what thing’ they worship."
			}
		]
	}
]
